By Doublespace
>Here's your story asshole
#A young man living in a world with anthros uncovers his inner desires and learns where his feelings lie.

~~~~~ META ~~~~~~
Relationships:

        Dating Multiple Females
        HMOFA - Relationship

Characters:

        Ya Boy Styles
        That other dude
        James Gray
        Caitlyn Aymber
        Dhalia Kon
        Sava - Character
        Aparajita
        Bami
        Amy
        Stacy

Additional Tags:

        Implied Masturbation
        Fingering
        Voyeurism
        Rough Kissing
        Rough Sex
        Groping
        Extreme Personalities

Language:
    English 
Stats:

    Published:
        2021-09-09
    Updated:
        2021-11-05
    Words:
        66567
    Chapters:
        10/?
    Comments:
        8
    Kudos:
        124
    Bookmarks:
        11
    Hits:
        3779


================================================================================
Chapter 1: Speed Dating
Summary:

    James is dragged kicking and screaming to meet girls

Chapter Text

            The car was stuffy and filled with laughter.  My friends had won their little bet and weren’t going to let me live it down for a single second.  The new years party had everyone write down their goal, and my drunk ass thought that like any other year before I wasn’t going to be held to it; went first and wrote down that I’d get a girlfriend this year.

            Turns out, Adam had recorded every second of it, including everyone else writing down some dumb easy to accomplish new-year-new-me, and chose to not tell me that him and the guys were conspiring against me to take me to…  Speed dating.  This was just about the most humiliating outcome I could think of, and I’m sure they thought of worse ways to punish me but knew this would burn me up and frost me over the most.

            “We’re just about there Adam, you wanna play it again?!”  Be less happy, asshole.

            “Nah we’ve watched little James enough times, lets pull in; oh, and James, don’t forget to pull-out!”

            Everybody gave the traditional man noise of screaming ‘oooooooooh!’ and I would have joined them too; if not for being the absolute butt of the joke.

            I’d had my fair share to say back when the drive first started, threatening to call the police that I was being kidnapped.  I chose to pipe up again now, against my better judgment.  “Just so we’re clear, we all have to do it; otherwise they’ll make you all leave and wait while I do it.”

            “We’ll see James, but if we have to tag along to make sure you go, we will.”  Fat chance at that.

 

 

            Adams car fit into a spot between two trucks, him claiming if there wasn’t a tree for shade he could use their jacked up rides to give himself a bit of shade on the sides.  It was a hopeless cause though; the air was hot, and the blowing of the wind felt like the seventy percent water I was made of was being evaporated instantly.

            “Great, my asshole friends drag me to speed dating and I get to go in there covered in sweat.”  I was going to let them know in advanced that this was fruitless.  What the hell do you even do for speed dating?  I’d been wondering that for the whole ride downtown.

            “Cheer up James!”  Mike piped up;  “maybe some of them will like the smell…”   He elbowed me, pointing to the pair of anthros heading through the door.  Two short haired dog women in skirts could be seen for a moment before disappearing into the convention center.

            “The hell does that even mean?”  He started about how they have a stronger sense of smell and began rambling, but something had donned on me.  I looked at the building ahead, and read ‘Springs Inner City Convention Center’ in big gold lettering.  A LED board below showed a series of events and the dates they would be held.  Scouring for todays date led me to find it, and read it out loud.  “Annual Inter-species speed dating.”

            They all stopped where they stood, and stared at the board along with me.

            “Adam, what the fuck?” Mike sounded out first, in a tone that showed he didn’t know if he was mad or about to burst out laughing.

            I wasn’t about to laugh either.  “What, I’m really supposed to roll along with this?”

            Adam looked baffled.  “I uh…  I just looked up speed dating and booked two…  I didn’t...”

            “Didn’t what Adam?  Didn’t actually read what you signed up for?”  I wasn’t opposed to anthros as friends, Kyle could attest to that; but I wasn’t about to go inside and see if Lassie wanted to go to Applebees with me.

            “Alright, maybe it’s not gonna be that bad, don’t start hating out in public.”  Adam was trying to  disarm a situation that wasn’t even started.  “Look, I already paid for two, so I’ll go with you.”

            “How about you and somebody else go, I’m not into this at all Adam.”

            “Shut up, alright.”  Don’t tell me that now.  “You have to do dating shit, we have to make sure you do it.  I’m going with you, so that’s…”  He inhaled and sighed.  “That’s my punishment.”

            “Whatever fucker, let’s just get this over with.”  I spent the rest of the walk in silence, trying to think of how I could make every single person in there lose any and all interest in me, or better yet, just get kicked out.

 

 

            The AC of the convention center hit us like a sixty degree blanket, but it wasn’t the refreshing feeling it was meant to be.  Looking around for a moment we spotted a kiosk with a line.  Behind the desk was one of the young dog girls Mike had been teasing about.

            Our turn came rather fast, placing the four of us before her cheery brown face and droopy ears.

            “Hi!  Here for speed dating or the eco-friendly gardening panel?”  Adam lie to her, lie to her right now and tell her we grow tomatoes and want to cut back on watering; I beg you.

            “We uh, signed up for speed dating, we’ve got two with tickets two without; can our friends still…?”  You’re a genuine dick-suck.

            “Unfortunately your friends can’t join you, unless they want to buy tickets now, we did undersell this year so-”  She was cut off by Mike and Styles spewing nonsense about forgetting wallets or not being able to afford it.  The one time Styles speaks to me this whole trip is to tell me he’s abandoning me.

            Adam bid them farewell and gave his info to the kiosk dog before turning to hand me a lanyard.  It was a simple thing, with my name; age; and species on it.  Thank god at the bottom it said heterosexual, this was already weird I didn’t need to go talking to a bunch of faggots trying to give me their AIDs.  We threw them around our necks and walked into the main assembly area.  A sign right past the door explained that the speed dating became an annual thing as a means by which to encourage better relations between certain anthro peoples.  It gave some politically correct dribble about not calling ‘peoples with scales’ things like ‘snake’ and ‘cold-bloods’.  I glared at Adam as we both finished reading the sign.

            “Spare me, I’m doing this too.”  He said, knowing I had no intention to do so.

            We found ourselves in another line; people at the front were heading through archways and sitting at tables across from others.  Adam and I were among the rare few humans that could be spotted throughout the crowd.  At least we weren’t alone, although it was unlikely they were all here because of blackmail and poor reading comprehension.

            “Adam, what the fuck do we even do?” I was at a loss.  They were just sitting across form each other at desks like the ones you would find in a high school.

            “You just, y’know; sit there and talk to somebody.  You have a time limit, and you just ask shit you absolutely need to know if you were gonna date them.”  Adam had at least read up on what he was subjecting me to.  “I’m just gonna tell them I smoke.”

            “I think most of them would know you were lying.”  This was all your fault Adam.  I tried not to laugh as I imagined Adam going home with an anthro after this whole debacle.

            Just then Adam hit the front of the line and got pointed to the right.  I went to follow but was stopped by the attendant; who pointed me to the left.  I forced a smile and a nod before obliging.  Watching what the crowd did helped me blend in somewhat; and I sat at the first empty table.  A small cup was stuck to the center of the two small tables filled with pens, and each side had a drawing pad next to it, but what really caught my attention was the timer sitting to my left.

            “Two minutes?”  The thing was already going down rapidly

            “Actually three!” Piped up a voice, bringing me to realize I had been gawking at the desks and had failed to even look at who I was supposed to be talking to.  “First time here?  You kinda spaced out!”  She looked small in her chair, some kind of brown and gray dog mix.

            “Yeah, first time ever doing this, you?”  I should just try to make conversation, I don’t have to marry her, I don’t even have to say my name.

            “Oh I come every year!  It’s so much fun, especially since you can’t talk to anyone from your own species!”  Oh dear god in heaven.  “You can just run up to anyone who looks interesting, but I like to wait and see who comes to me!”  She was painfully chipper about this whole ordeal.

            “You ever meet anyone doing this?”

            “Yep!  My last two boyfriends I met speed dating!”  I almost worry that means she goes through a boyfriend a year.  “You looking for a fuzzy friend?”  What?  She batted her eyelashes at me for a moment before giggling.

            The timer gave a buzz that made me jump a bit.  A little red light popped on, definitely assuring me that our time was up.  “Thanks for the tips...” was all I managed as I got up and moved away from the desk.  She called out a lengthy “byeeeeee!” after me.

            There was a bored looking deer sitting strait ahead of me, and I decided to sit down in front of her.  She looked up from her phone, and stared for a moment.

            “Hi, I’m James...”

            “Caitlyn.  Smoke?”  Adam would have won this battle.

            “Uh, no.  You?”

            “No.  You looking for friends or more?”  Adam would have lost this battle.  Luckily with her taking the lead I could probably just answer her questions to kill some time.

            “Just friends, that’s all.”

            “Friends with benefits?”

            “Um, no no; just regular old friends.”  What kind of adam and eve, twitter cuck question was that?

            “Ah...”  She looked back at her phone, “You sure you like beastgirls?”

            “Well no, I just think I should be friends first; rather than run around looking for a girlfriend.”

            She looked up from her phone, one eyebrow higher and a frown.  “You’re looking for a friend to turn into a girlfriend?”

            “I...”

            “You should just say what you want.”

            What good did beating around the bush do?  “I don’t know what I want.  I came here because my friends want me to get a girlfriend, so they signed me up for speed dating not knowing I’d be talking to anthros.”

            “So you don’t like beastgirls?”

            “There’s nothing wrong with them, I just don’t want to do all this.”

            “Because of the beastgirls?”  Her eyes were half closed in the way a teenage girl might when she though she had the upper hand in a conversation.

            “Look I’m fine with beastgirls, or anthros; I just don’t think three minutes is enough to get to know somebody even well enough to know if I want to be their friend let alone date them.”

            She suddenly got up and reached over the table; grabbing my lanyard and holding it up and away from me, as far as the strap would let her.

            “What the fuck are you doing?”  Just as I finished I heard her phone make the fake shutter noise of a camera before the timer started buzzing again.  She moved out from the desk and smiled at me while walking away.  I sat there for a moment, speechless.

            My eyes wandered to the timer, still showing a red light.  I reached over and pushed the alarm clock like button on top and watched it refill to 3 minutes and lose its red light.  I sat there for a moment, realizing what I had done.  Any moment now some strange woman was going to waltz up and talk to me.  Maybe I could escape in time, run away and maybe find Adam.

            Just then the seat opposite me was filled up with the smuggest looking cat I had ever seen.  Opportunities squandered I went with the formalities again, with a second “Hi, I’m James.”

 

            When she had passed I planned to sit quietly and pretend to forget about resetting the timer.  It seemed to summon strangers like moths to a flame, but just as she was gone and I had put my plan into action a dark gray mass appeared before me in an instant.  I glanced at the timer which her hand had landed on and now slid off of.  Now at two fifty-nine.  I glanced back.  Two golden eyes, stark against the fur that brought them here were staring back at me.

            “Hi, I’m James; I’m just…  Uh…”  taking her all in at once was strange.  She looked old and young at the same time, a smug smile on her face shifted to a sharp toothed grin.  She didn’t say anything.  “I’m here cause my friends wanted me to, um…”  She was just staring at me.  I looked back at the timer.  Two forty-four.  I looked at her again.  She was a gray fox, through and through.  She seemed to like the idea of being gray, even her suit was gray.  She was wearing a suit, come to think of it, loosened tie and the top buttons of her shirt were undone.  I shot my eyes back up to meet her gaze again.  “Sorry, I just noticed you were wearing a suit!”  Smooth James, real smooth.  “Did you just get off work?”  Yeah dude, now laugh like you’re anxious and try to not cry.  Fuck.

            But nothing happened.  She just stared at me.  I turned full-face to the timer this time, I didn’t care if the creepy fox thought I was being an asshole at this point.

            One Fifty, jesus christ at least it wasn’t moving backwards.  I jumped for a moment as something brushed down my shin.  I realized instantly that it was this womans foot, and withdrew my feet.  She giggle, and picked up the pen in front of her; still without breaking her stare at me.  Come to think of it I hadn’t even seen her blink.  She dropped the pen back into the cup.

            I’d had enough.  I didn’t like losing control of the situation like this, and this needed to be over.   “Listen, if you’re not even gonna talk to me, why come sit down?”  Her grin spread wide showing all her fangs and molars.  She sat up strait and formal in her chair, still never taking her eyes off me, before finally; she spoke.

            “Hello James.  I’m Dhalia, and I’m gonna be your lover.”  I was, for the first time in my life; truly terrified.  The buzzer sounded, and I got up as fast as I could; still not faster than Dhalia though.  She was tiny compared to me, maybe only five feet tall; but there was something off about her.  A tall dog man in a shirt reading ‘staff’ came up and asked if we were all right.  Maybe I’d gotten up a bit too fast.

            “We’re quite fine.”  Said Dhalia, “But James here pointed out that I’ve lost my lanyard, do you think you could escort me out?”  He began offering to look for her lanyard, but I had long since elected to move away.  Very far away.  I walked to the farthest part of the hall, and sat down across from a tiger.

            “Hi, I’m James; I just ran away from a psycho fox.  Do you smoke?”

            She stared at me wide eyed for a moment before bursting into laughter.  “Holy shit dude, no I don’t smoke; but what happened?”  I ran her through the short version, leading to more laughter.

            “I feel kinda bad wasting your time like this, I just needed to get it all off my chest as soon as possible.”

            “Nah it’s cool James, I’m Sava by the way.  As for wasting time…”  She reached over and held down the alarm button while it was still only at ten seconds.  The timer sped down to zero, then without a sound climbed back up to three.  “We’re all stuck here for two hours, but there’s no reason to suffer through all of it.”

            “You know Sava, I think you’re competing with my friend Kyle for the position of my favorite anthro.”  I had just kind of spit it out, but now she had leaned forwards a bit.

            “That’s crazy, cause you’re definitely my favorite human so far.”  She said it almost flirtingly.  I was reminded that where we were was called speed dating, and not speed therapy.  “Hey, give me your digits.”  She said pulling her phone out from between her breasts.

            I obliged and told her my number, and waited while she sent me a text so I had hers.  She reset the timer again.  “It’s not cheating unless you get caught!”  She said, to the frowning face of another tiger who had been sitting next to her.  “I worked here one year, they teach you all kinds of silly tricks in hopes you can catch people and stop them from doing the same.”

            “Was it fun working here?”

            “God no, it takes forever just to filter people.  They fired me cause I didn’t want to plug.”  She rolled her eyes.

            “Sorry you didn’t what?”

            “Oh, a plug; sometimes the staff cycles out and gets paid to plug as people in the event.  I didn’t want to do it for personal reasons.”

            “I can respect that, but how many people here are faking it?”

            “Oh, everybody is faking it right now; speed dating is wasted on horny people hoping they’ll get a quicky in, and people with no intention to actually go on a date.”  We both shared a half hearted laugh.  “That’s why I keep resetting the timer though…”  She smiled at me.  “You’re not faking.  You’re really genuine, and I’m grateful cause I get to be genuine as well.”

            I couldn’t think of anything to say, and we both quiet for a moment.  “Thanks.”  I said.  There wasn’t much more to say.  Curiosity got the better of me though, and I asked her; “Why did you come here?”

            She grinned and layed her ears down on her head.  “I, uh; lost a bet.”

            I stared at her for a moment as the timer went off for the first time, before finally cracking a big shit eating grin.  “Dude, me too!”  We shared a long laugh until staff came and said one of us had to move.

 

 

            People had begun filtering out of the conference room, while I sat alone at a desk with a depleted timer.  I had a few scraps of papers with phone numbers and names on them.  I had taken the time to scribble down a note or two about the particular anthro I’d spoken too, mostly the species of the particular person.  I thought about throwing some away, but didn’t want to do it where I could be seen.  The table jostled a bit and I looked up to see Adam looking at me with anger in his eyes.

            “Dude, you’re gonna be such a fucking prick to me; and I’m already mad at you.”

            “What are you on about?”

            “Fuck you, we’re getting burgers let’s go.”  He stood up and I followed shortly behind.  There were some people is staff shirts cleaning the desks throughout as a few others swept behind them.  I noticed the desk where I had spoken to Dhalia, and felt a shiver go up my back.  There was still the notepad on the desk, and the one pen in the cup.  I stopped and walked up to it, and realized there was still something scrawled on the pad.  It was a pair of hearts, one plain and rounded, the other made of lots of small lines adjacent to each other.  Almost like it was…  furry.  With a curled tail beneath it.  I stepped back.  It must have been somebody else, she wouldn’t have had enough time to draw all that.  I pulled away and started to jog a bit to catch up with Adam.

            A new dog was at the kiosk, wishing us a good evening as we fled the complex to a waiting car.

            “James!”  A familiar voice called out, and I turned to see Sava leaning out a car window.  “Keep it real!”  The car had started moving away, despite her yelling, “And text me!”  I waved back as she went back inside the car, until finally I was treated to another group ‘oooooooooh!’from the guys.  Styles and Mike took the opportunity to take the piss out of me and Adam while we were in the back seat of the car.

            “So James, how many stripes does she have on her ass?”  Very funny Styles.  Could probably google that and get a better answer.

            “Dude spare me, she was probably the dudeliest chick I spoke to the whole time.”  Rude of me, but it’s not insulting unless you get caught, I suppose.

            Mike turned on Styles; “Man you can’t talk shit on James, you fuck Kimberly but he’s gonna fuck a tiger; if he comes back with his dick still on he’s new team leader.”  Team leader was a joke we had set up about a year after we graduated high school.  It was a stupid reference to how Styles parents had wanted him to enlist in the army.  He hadn’t gone, and said he had to stick with his real unit, being us; and declared Adam was team leader, since he usually ended up deciding what we were all going to do together when we got the chance.  It might seem childish to bring it up nearly a decade later, but it was simply how our friend group worked.  How our team worked.

            “Bullshit, Adam what you got, you gonna fuck a lion and one up him?”

            “Man fuck you guys, she’s not a lion.”  Adam spat out, and Styles actually pumped the brakes a little.

            “Woah hold up, James is supposed to text a girl sure, but you sound like you’re actually hooking up?”

            “I couldn’t say no!  I forgot about the thing...”  Adam’s brow was sweaty, and he looked actually sick.

            “Adam, what were you saying I was gonna be a prick about?”  The memory had come back to me suddenly, and I was stuck between legitimate concern and trying to come up with ways to bust his balls about all of this.

            “I was just chilling, cause the whole smoking thing didn’t work for shit, right?  And I thought, ‘fuck it, nobody is gonna want to talk to me if I just lay low’ and it worked for a minute, but then this chick came up.”  He swallowed and sighed.  It couldn’t be as bad as he’s making it out.  “She was kinda nerdy, and looked like a dog or somethin’, at least I thought she was a dog.”

            “Skip to the part where you fucked up.”

            “Man fuck you Styles!  She was going on about how cool human dudes were, and I was like ‘I didn’t think beastgirls ever actually thought that shit’ and she was like, ‘no way, I’d only date human dudes if they’d just go out with me’ and she put me on the spot and asked me out.”

            “Skip to the part where you fucked up!”

            “Fuck you Styles she was a hyena!”  Styles brake checked the car behind us, leading to a series of honks emanating in a line.

            “Dude she’s got a dick dude!  A fake dick!”  Styles had pushed the gas pedal down and was hurling towards the Jam Burger on the corner.

            “I googled it, not all hyena’s have them!”

            “She’s got a dick Adam why do you think human men aren’t dating her!”

            “Shut the fuck up Styles!  I googled it!”  Adam sounded desperate, and Mike and I only looked on speechless.

            “You googled her dick?!”  Adam started kicking the seat drivers seat as Styles screamed at him.  “Adam, your moms gonna be pissed!”

 

 

            We sat in silence for a minute in the parking lot, the radio turned down low.  Glen Beck was rambling on about how the first gay president would inevitably come and doom us all because of the slippery slope.  Adam threw open the car door like he wanted it to come off the hinges and started storming towards the Jam Burger alone.

            “Alright.”  I scooted to the center seat to address Mike and Styles.  “We gotta either be supportive or get him out of this.”

            “Bro, I’m telling you; she’s gonna have a dick, what else can I do but warn his ass?”  Styles was useless.  It was a miracle he was the one with a long term girlfriend.

            “Alright, but Styles, James is right: we gotta figure out how we get him out of this.”  Mike wasn’t stoked on it either.  “Once he touches her balls he’s gay man, we can’t have any of us turning faggot on us alright.”

            “She-yena’s don’t have balls, but that’s besides the point, look; we need to figure out how to make her hate him.”  I scooted back and got to the door to let myself, while the others followed suite.

            Mike spoke up, loud enough for strangers on the sidewalk to hear.  “We gotta get double cheeseburgers, Mr Pibb, and Adam, and then we gotta get back to Jame’s place and brainstorm this whole girl-dick problem.”  Yep, people were looking at us.

 

 

            After getting home and designing an elaborate ruse wherein Beth, Mikes bitch Ex; would pretend to be Adams girlfriend, We finally asked Adam for a description of the Hyena in question, and his problems started to lessen dramatically.

            “That’s a fucking striped Jackal dude.”  Styles said, reading the description from the Anthromorph Species Awareness site.  Despite being sensitivity nonsense, the site proved useful in telling the difference between the girls we’d spoken to that evening.  I hadn’t even spoken to a deer, in fact; she was a gazelle, not that it was important.

            “Hey let me check fakebook.”  It was unimportant enough that I needed a distraction from the days bullshit.

            “Hold up, there’s some more entries I wanna check, can panthers be albino?”

            “Anything can be albino, look up a snow tiger first.”

            “Alright, get off Jame’s computer, he’s gotta check all zero of the notifications he’s got, since we’ve been with him all day.”  Mike was full of it, he knew Kyle would have left six or seven messages about his guilds raid, trying to drag me back into Fantasy Lance Online.

            I dropped my info in and let the site load up.  Sure enough there was notifications, but there was about three times as many as I had hoped for.  “Woah, Mr. Popular all of the sudden, what’s up?”  Adam was over my shoulder making announcements to bring the guys over.  “Who has nine alts and sent you a friend request on each?”

            The drop down menu revealed a somewhat familiar list of names, and a series of anthro profile pics.  I recognized Sava almost instantly, a couple different dog girls, then Caitlyn whose profile picture was her looking at her phone where somebody else must have taken the picture.

            “Alright let’s see the tiger chick!”  Adam had his arm on my head and his finger on the screen, and before I could even retort somebody else even further out of my view had grabbed the mouse and clicked on the picture.  The screen was filled with with her profile in an instant, her face on the left wasn’t as difficult to recognize as I thought it might be.

            “Dude, how does the tiger chick have a nice rack?”  Mike was as astute and to the point as always.  My eyes drifted to the banner, an image with Sava and some other tigers on a boat.  They all wore swimsuits, Sava in a two piece alongside two other female tigers with one older male.  I chose to believe this was her father, and family.  “James admit it, you want the tiger girl.”

            “Dude we just fucked around in there, he doesn’t want to go out with any of them.”

            “Just fucked around Adam?  You were just fucking around when you agreed to go on a date with a dick girl?”

            “She’s a jackal, she doesn’t have a dick Styles, fuck off.”  They were back at it again, but I ignored them.  I was still looking at Sava.  I hadn’t really looked at any of them really.  Just talked to them; about dumb shit more or less.  She wasn’t physically unattractive, at least her body wasn’t.  By the standards of a human she looked like somewhat of a tomboy.  Tall, slightly muscular build.  Outdoors, with some above average breasts, maybe a D.  She was…  Kind of good looking.  I had never really considered anthros attractive or not, every thought of girlfriends I had ever had was me and another human.  I thought back, quite a ways.  I’d been around anthros all my life.  We went to school with them, played football with them, even had them in our friend group before.  But I’d never really looked at anthro women as…  Well, women.

            But in a flash Styles decided for me to seal my fate.  He had grabbed the mouse, dropped open the notifications menu, and started clicked ‘accept request’ on every single installment.  By the time I’d grabbed the mouse and wrestled it from it there was only the very bottom request left, Sava’s.  Motherfucker had gone and accepted every single one but the one I was actually considering.

            “Gotchu fam, chat away!”  He proclaimed.  He started heading out, saying something about needing to get home to Kimberly.

            Adam followed him shortly after, and Mike finally hollered “Goodnight asshole!” down the hall and closed his door.  I was alone in my room now, and turned back to the computer.  I opened the notifications one more time, and accepted Sava’s request.  At the very least she was cool to talk to, nothing would come of it anyways.  I shut down the desktop, grabbed my phone and crawled onto my bed.  I’d watch youtube until sleep gripped me, it didn’t matter how long it took since I didn’t have work the next day.  I could go through and see about unfriending all of the randoms I barely remembered whenever I woke up.


================================================================================
Chapter 2: Digitigrade Dating
Summary:

    Our brave hero gets tricked into having a good time

Chapter Text

            The sun shining through my window wasn’t stopped by pulling blankets over my head, and so I was left with no choice but to leave my bed and take refuge at the desk.  I jammed my fingers in what I hoped was the direction of the power button until that familiar click retorted, leading into the sound of uncleaned fans trying their best to prevent a house fire.

            The calming green hill of windows XP default settings graced my eyes, granting a moment of relief before I remembered I was stuck using windows 10.  Click the internet, realize you’re hungry, go get cereal; like any other day off.

            Mike was on the couch staring at the television and shoveling scrambled eggs into his mouth, no doubt with a lethal amount of pepper on them.  I opted for the tooth-decay special, and poured a bowl of sugar coated death flakes for myself. Blasto Bits brand: the good stuff. Too bad they don't do decoder rings anymore…

            Back at my desk, I was finally awake enough to remember yesterdays events.  Fortunately, being embarrassed alone in the comfort of my own home was a hell of a lot better than having to be embarrassed in front of dozens of strangers for three minutes at a time.  I needed to log in and start un-friending strange anthro women, before anyone starts judging me for rapid onset of mental illness.

            Logged in, and find out it’s too late: 7 new messages and a bunch of notifications about photos added by people I don’t know well enough to care.  Fakebook is the kind of social media bullshit where enough boomers and gen X need to die, so that I can finally be free of my obligations to use it.  At the end of the day it’s just another chore; going through notifications to make the red number go away.

            “Yo I’m going to work!”  Mike called out from the living room before opening and closing the door.  Poor bitch.  Dropped the messages down, better actually check Kyle’s from last night.  There was more than seven now, however.  Last nights were about the raid and the need for more players, typical; but the more recent ones were from this morning, if you can call ten o clock morning that is.

            ‘What’s with the rando adds?’; ‘U get jacked?’; ‘Hello?  U drunk and messaging beastgirls?’  Jesus christ Kyle get some fucking sleep one day.

            ‘Went speed dating.  It was a mistake.’  Send.  Kyle didn’t need much info, at least I hoped he didn’t.  We met ages ago in the school library when I still played and we got stuck together in team arena matchmaking.  We clicked instantly and wasted too many nights of our young lives grinding together in our guild.  One day my build got patch-raped and not just that, they redid the tier system to move the goal post even further for all players.  I said fuck it and haven’t played since, but stayed in touch with Kyle.  We basically only talk about games, and only meet so he can make me his punching bag in fighting games and we can bitch about our jobs together.

            The computer dinged, shoving Kyles messages into my face once more.  ‘wtf y’  only the most eloquent of responses, thank you Kyle.

            ‘buying gf, no gp tho’  Cringy runescapes memes were sure to scare him away.

            ‘U like beastgirls’

            ‘dont think so, friends took me n said it was an accident.’

            ‘lol.’  Very astute Kyle, please let me die of shame in peace.

            Kyle aside, my news feed was populated with a colorful new array of faces.  Anthro faces.  I scrolled down for a minute, wondering of Sava would show up, but didn’t see her.  On the other hand, there was probably a hundred updates from Caitlyn.  Looks like she’s that bitch who runs around updating her location every time she gets the chance.  There was even one from yesterday, for being at the convention center.  Social media was a mistake.

            Another boop, another message from…  Not Kyle?  Speak of the gazelle, Caitlyn’s face had appeared at the bottom in place of Kyles jagged and scaly visage.

            ‘Thx for adding.  U up?’

            Any hour is too early an hour to make me talk to girls.  ‘NP, just woke up.’  Easy, over and done with.  Now we can do what rational grown adults do on fakebook and ignore each other until- boop!

            ‘Weekends boring.  U?’  She didn’t actually feel like talking did she?  I knew how to get her out of my inbox fast: the ultimate woman repellent.

            ‘Messaging my friend about videogames.’

            ‘Lame.’  Music to my ears.  ‘Wat do U play?’  Don’t feign interest, you know you hate me irrationally now.

            ‘Used to play FLO with my friend Kyle.’

            ‘Y stop?’

            This was bad.  I had revealed to a female that I no longer was a hard-core gamer, and could therefore be interesting to talk to.  Damage control needed to go into effect immediately.  ‘I just don’t play as much anymore, still in the guild and all tho.’  It was the perfect rebound.

            ‘KK’  Was all she wrote in response.  I could already see her rolling her split iris eyes and switching to a different conversation.  I felt a smug expression cross my face, but only for a moment.  I looked over the conversation and felt uneasy.  Why had I gone with the nuclear option of pretending videogames were more interesting than her?  I knew I wasn’t really trying to get a date in my life before all this, but there was a gross dystopia about the way I had treated her that didn’t set well with me.  I scooted my chair in and started typing.

            ‘Did U have plans?’  There was no way she didn’t, she seemed like the popular girl type.  Being polite couldn’t really hurt.

            In a few moments a picture of a coffee cup graced my screen.  A wide and fuzzy hand wrapped fingers around it, the thumb having a thick and hard nail that made up the fingers tip There was something charming about getting the picture, and a message that just said ‘coffee w friend, nothing after.’  Come on James, you can think of something else to say.  Practice on her, worst case scenario the gazelle chick unfriends you.

            ‘I like ur hand’  Why.  Why did I send that, what compelled me to send that.  The screen was silent, and I waited for her profile picture to turn gray before getting a line of red text saying I can longer reply to this message.

            But it didn’t come.  Instead another picture came; it was Caitlyns hand splayed out pressed against the table, her phone and one side of her face loosely reflecting in the glass.  All of her fingers were like her thumb, ending in a hard and thick hoof-nail.  It looked soft with its short light brown fur, a bit lighter than the rest of her was most likely.
            That had always been the strange part for me.  Every inch of anthros was covered in fur or scales, from head to toe.  I thought back to elementary school, when I had gym class seeing anthros change shirts.  There was a gross memory in there, as a kid you don’t realize it, but it’s not really about the fur or scales; it’s about how you don’t see skin.  In a way it’s like they don’t have skin, even if it’s just underneath.

            Looking at Caitlyns hand now though, there was something strange about it, that I couldn’t quite put my finger on.  Another boop ‘U like?’

            ‘Yes ty lol’  The part of me that wanted the conversation to be over had returned.

            ‘anytime lol’  I waited a moment to see if she would respond further, but nothing came.  I clicked on her picture bringing up the profile.  It was just an unending dump of status updates complete with pictures and locations.  Some shady pervert at the alphabet agency know her exact latitude and longitude at this very moment, and she was dumb enough to be fine with it.  Caitlyn hadn’t wronged me however, and it felt bad to think of her in such a shitty way.

            I closed the browser, and ran with my empty bowl to the kitchen.  The apartment was all mine for the day, it was time to play Powerwolf at a holy enough volume to grace the neighbors.

            But, at random intervals my time spent playing Tomb-Tenderizer was interrupted by Caitlyn messaging me.  Mostly stupid things about her day, she was stuck home with nothing to do.  Telling her to try videogames was met with another ‘Lame’, and it had culminated in my realization that she wasn’t planning on leaving me alone.

            ‘Y message me?’ it might be enough to make her remember she has a friend list of over five hundred people, and might get better results hunting for somebody who didn’t want to blow up zombies with a dynamite crossbow.

            ‘ur new n interesting.’  I have been new to you for all of maybe two hours; surely you’re sick of me by now.  Another boop.  ‘plus ur kinda hot.’  I stared at the message for a moment.  She didn’t really think that.  Any second now the LOL is gonna come through and let me know she thinks I’m ugly.  A buzz came, and a notification slid down from the top of the screen.  ‘Caitlyn liked your photo’  I jammed my thumb on shit so fast I dropped the phone into my lap.  Picking it up revealed a picture of me, Kyle and Mike at the pool.  It was ancient, our last day in highschool had been a field day, and we’d wandered to the pool to have a swim, since the three of us had met in gym class.  I wasn’t exactly fat or anything, but the picture was too old to make an assessment about the way I looked, right?  Something compelled me to hit pause on this shit and run to the bathroom.

            The face in the mirror was a bit unshaven, and had bed-head.  I wasn’t good looking, what did this bitch want?  Money?  Drugs?  Screenshots for a troll compilation?  I slapped off the lights and marched back to my room, rolling my eyes.

            The phone met the bed, where it could buzz and boop all it wanted: I had shit to shoot.

 

            Uncounted hours slipped by until the front door opened with Mike hollering that he had come back from work unscathed, god forbid his ass go to the wage cage cubicle and get a papercut or some other bitch-stitch injury.

            Strangely enough, he broke the tradition of marching strait into the shower and instead marched his white shirt and black pants into my room.

            “What’s up asshole?”  Be not deceived dear traveler, for this is a greeting among men.

            “Wasting away until work tomorrow, why?”

            “Some goat chick started liking old photos of me and you.”  Goosebumps formed on me.  By goat chick he could only mean some beastgirl with horns on her head and split iris eyes, probably staring at her phone even in her profile picture…  What the fuck?

            “What the hell are you on about?”

            “Some goat chick you friended on Fakebook dropped likes on photos of me and you from, like, highschool and shit man.”

            I needed to be innocent of these crimes, and fast.  “Yeah, some girl who took a picture of my lanyard friended me and Styles accepted it last night.

            “What, you didn’t already unfriend all the animal girls?”  Mike laughed at his own words, letting me know that I was the faggot, and not him.

            “Nah, I didn’t get around to it; been playing shit all day.”

            “Bro, check it.”  He had unlocked his phone and showed me his own notifications.  Six of them.  It wasn’t much, but it left me wondering how man I had accumulated.  I hadn’t been paying attention to my phone for hours now; but chose this time to get up and swipe it off the bed.

            Twenty six notifications are you fucking with me right now?  I get twenty notifications on my birthday when the internet reminds fuckers that I was born, and today is not that day.  But twenty six there were, and as far as I could tell, almost all of them were from Caitlyn…

            “Dude, James...”  Mike had been over my shoulder looking at my phone as well.  “I’m telling you to block her right now, this shit is creepy.  In fact, block all the fucking animal bitches Styles friended last night, holy shit.”  Mike retreated to the hallway without another word.  Maybe he was right, this was a bit excessive; the kind of shit that preambles a stalker flick.  I could see a few other posts from last week had likes from Fammy, some shaggy dog girl in an american flag shirt; but aside from her, it was all Caitlyn…  I looked to the top right again, and saw a few new messages had amassed, but at the top was one from Caitlyn.

            ‘You didn’t answer me yesterday?’  Didn’t answer what, the psycho alarm?  At this point it basically required context.  I didn’t have a choice but to respond and gauge the psycho-meter…

            ‘Which question?’  I stared at the screen.  There were a few more pictures she’d sent, a car radio playing Call me Maybe with a message declaring the song crazy old, and another hand-shot with a watch on it saying she wouldn’t buy it unless it had a different color.  Then the boop noise came.

            ‘Do you like beastgirls?’  I didn’t really need to think long and hard about it, did I?  I definitely didn’t like one beastgirl in particular, but unfriending her might have worse consequences than having to work twice as hard to clean my notifications.

            ‘can’t say I’m obsessed’  Women read way too much into subtext.  The internet told me so, so it must be true.  The word obsessed should ring loud like an insult in her girl brain, leading to an instant fit of anger.  It seemed to work for the most part, a solid minute transpired in tense silence aside from Mikes shower in the distance.  When he got out, he’d surely expect me to have exiled the anthro women from my fakebook, but he didn’t realize the level of crazy I was operating with here.  He had six notifications from her, but what was that in comparison to mine?  I went to the desktop and closed out Tomb-Tenderizer without saving.  This was more important than my demon-gem count… probably.

            Many of the notifications were just likes on posts and pictures.  Checking the oldest one, it was as Mike had said; another picture from highschool.  It was Mike, Adam and myself at a trailhead during summer break.  Who does something like this?  Scrolling through year old photos of somebody who you made internet friends with a day ago seemed like crazy-person territory.

            She messaged back though.  ‘I get that.’  No, I don’t think you do.  ‘You doing anything?’

            ‘Just playing videogames.’  There wasn’t even a hint anymore.  There’s nothing to say, you hate my hobbies you hate me by relation.  Boop!  There it is…

            ‘come to south wall.’  What?  The south wall?  I knew where it was only because you can see it whenever you drive into the city, the huge ghetto mural reads “SOUTH WALL” in barely legible trashy gang-tagging styled letters.  Why the fuck would I go there you psycho bitch?

            ‘what for?’

            ‘I’m lonely.’

            ‘what about coffee friend?’  No, be more adamant than that.  ‘I don’t really like south wall.’

            She took time responding, but the three dots let me know full and damn well she was working on a response.  ‘Crystals went home.  Drive me somewhere fun then gameboy’  Drop what I’m doing and do what now?  ‘south wall has an arcade, come see it.’  There was no way a shithole with… such cultural enrichment… had anything fun going on.

            ‘South wall doesn’t have an arcade?’  Wait, why was I getting distracted?  Tell the deer to fuck off and go to the arcade themselves.

            ‘its here I swear’   I frowned.  Just trust the internet stranger dude, why would she lie after liking all your posts throughout history.  I key-jammed to get Kyle on the screen too.

            ‘Kyle, you know that shithole south wall up in the city?’  It could be mere seconds up to in-game days before I got a response.

            ‘Yeah Y’  Mere seconds, thank God.

            ‘Is there an arcade there?’

            ‘Yeah Y’  Don’t custom up+enter macro me, you vegetable.

            ‘Crazy girl wants me to go to south wall’

            The silence was deafening.  Boop!  Not now crazy girl.  Boop!  Not now psycho female.  Boop!  Thank you Kyle.

            ‘Fakebook Gazelle?’  An actual punctuation mark.  Kyle was finally taking this serious.

            ‘Yeah, she called me hot and liked the pic, so I ignored her; now she’s blowing up my inbox.’  Kyle was my token beast-friend, a name he called himself back in highschool.  I didn’t have any other point of reference.

            ‘She’s probably talking about Sparky-Brew, it’s a barcade’  The fuck’s a barcade?

            ‘the fucks a barcade?’

            ‘Arcade w/bar dumbass’  Fuck you Kyle, go grind Sovereign Dragon Scales, or some other bullshit tiered item with rainbow coloring on its name.

            ‘kk,ty’ Kyle would switch back to FLO and forget about the world outside once more.  But for now I was stuck checking the messages left by Caitlyn.  Switching over, sure as shit it was a picture of a tacky neon sign emanating the words Sparky-Brew in big pink letters, probably to attract zoomers to nostalgia they pretended to appreciate.

            ‘See here’  Her finger pointed at the sign, specifically the atari joystick controller made of neon lights.  On the opposite end was a shot glass, literally framing the arcade-with-bar idea Kyle had mentioned, fuck him, that absolute legend.  The next message was different, a link to joogle maps; preambled by the words ‘Caitlyn has shared her location with you.’  Yeah just drop that anywhere, I could be a rapist serial killer or some shit, but just leave a live-feed of where you’re wandering around, it’s all chill, bitch.

            I was stuck, however.  I wanted to confront her, but I wanted to do it from the comfort of my own home.  That wasn’t how life worked however, I knew that all too well.  Beth was Mikes example, but my own was Jade.  Jade had orchestrated me and her breaking up, then gone on a warpath when it went well, go as far as accusing me of beating her to my own parents.  It was bullshit, and time proved me right, but I wasn’t about to put up with crazy over the internet.  That shit didn’t work; so I had no choice but to give Caitlyn what she wanted.  Six in the afternoon, and Mike is heading out of the shower when I storm past him.

            “Heading out.”

            “What for?  You going shopping?”

            “Gazelle girl says she wants to see me, so I guess this is all in-person now.”  I scooped my keys out of the bowl, and went out the door to the apartment an onto the staircase.  Mike called out to be cool about it, and I took it to heart.  Going on a rampage fixed nothing, this was all just to talk, after all.

 

            South Wall was every bit as much of a shithole as I had griped to myself it would be.  The old cinderblock wall that made up the back of south wall was horrifying to look upon: spattered with illegible graffiti and crudely produced anime faces done in spray paint by people who don’t actually know what shounen is, or where tits belong on a girl.  Pro-tip, they’re below the collar bone, not before it or worse yet: beneath the ribs.  There were a few beastfolk murals spattered throughout, but nowhere near as many.  I slid into a parking spot at the back of the lot; I’d rather walk the whole way than try to squeeze in between Prius’ and Volkswagons'.  Walking up to South Wall, the smell of cigarettes and food trucks greeted my nose: a final warning to go the other way.

            Instead, I pulled out my phone and unlocked it to check the joogle-maps again.  A dotted line connected the blue dot to the red dot, saying I would have to walk for less than one minute to my destination.  I glanced up in the alleged correct direction, and sure as shit between the moving crowds was a pair of dark grey-brown horns poking out from blond hair.  The closer I got the more I saw, until finally I had the whole picture: there was Caitlyn in the flesh, the same as when I first met her.  Bored and on her phone.

            Without moving her head, her hand lifted up and waved at me.  Damn split iris eyes would get me every time, she could likely see in every direction without shifting her head.  My hand raised up a bit, but lowered quickly and I pushed on through the crowd until I was to her little table.  I sat down opposite her and waited for a moment while she jabbed at her phone.  It didn’t take long.

            “I’m stoked you came, James.”  A small smile spread across her face.

            “Yeah, well; y’know gotta leave the house sometimes.”  Now, to use all accumulated people-skills at once to make this easy.  I didn’t need to introduce myself, so I could skip to a relevant personal link; “Speed dating was kinda neat I guess I met a lot of people.”  next, exchange necessary information; “You did kinda trip out my friends with all the fakebook likes though…”  And finally generate a tone for the overall discussion; “Why’d you do that?”

            She just stared and blinked for a moment before speaking, “Wow, that was like a robot.”  What can I say?  My first job was fast food.  “I was just bored and scrolling through your stuff cause I was curious about you.”

            It was suddenly a lot more reasonable.  My heart sank a bit with the answer, realizing I was the asshole in this situation.  “I’ll have to let them know I guess.”  What was worse, I had compared her to Jade…

            “Probably yeah.”  She picked up a red cup and swallowed the last of its contents leaving only the clatter of ice cubes.  “So, arcade then?”

            “I thought you kept saying videgames were lame?”

            “Well, they stuffed a whole building full of people playing them, so that can’t be awful; but thinking about some dude cooped up eating chips and throwing controllers around is pretty lame, sorry not sorry boo.”  She stood strait up and threw a tiny purse over her shoulder before turning to me and gesturing to follow with a single finger.

            I got up and griped, “Come on, I just sat down.”

            “Hush, the lady wants to see your videogames.”  I saw the neon sign from the picture she had sent dead ahead of us.  I stepped ahead and held the door open for her while shitty soundcloud-wannabe-DJ music flooded out.  “Oooh, a gentleman!”  Spare me, I just have manners.  Inside was dark, lit up mostly by black lights and TV screens hanging around in seemingly random places.  We went down the queue line to show our ID to some slothly creature that might have been meant to be a bouncer.

            “Expires this year.”  He gargled out, handing me back my ID.  “Good timing, we just went half off for couples ten minutes ago.”  I was about to graciously inform him he was getting full price when Caitlyn threw an arm around me.

            “We know, babe was bargain hunting for date night!”  Who is this woman?  Police please help, I need an adult and a stick.  I swiped my card and got two wristbands, both of which I desperately wished to throw away.  Caitlyn took hers and somehow applied the thing in one single motion while I still peeled the plastic cover off the glue.  Out of the line and into the…  ‘barcade’…  I hated everything about the place I was in, but at least it wasn’t some crowded club or the like.  “Now what?”  Caitlyns voice brought me away from staring at this place.

            I don’t know, I’ve never been to a barcade.  “If it’s an arcade, we need to find out what coins the machines take.”  I wandered to a nearby machine that wasn’t occupied and looked at the slots.  “They take nickles,” I stated “So, we find the ATM and change converter, or we go to a counter.”

            She pointed towards the opposite side of the building where a long counter lined with stand up menus sat and tall stools.  “I want to try that game.” That’s an open bar, you don’t play an open bar like a game, you sound stupid.

            The compulsion to be polite overcame me however.  If I’m stuck here I may as well try to have fun.  “What do you wanna get?”  I need a rum and coke if I’m gonna put up with this anyways.  We waded through the crowd the bar had amassed.   More people wanted a drink than they wanted to play arcade games it seemed.

            “I want sex on the beach.” First date isn't over yet.

            “I don’t know if they’re gonna have all that.”  Truth be told, I have no idea what goes into a sex on the beach drink, but it’s probably more elaborate than I’d hope to deal with.

            “No?  I’ve never had it, just like the name; but we’re doing new things today so yeahsies.”  Don’t say yeahsies, that’s not a word.

            “Isn’t it just some fruity drink?”  Too late, we hit the counter when I realized that she was still wrapped around my arm and started yelling ‘sex on the beach’ at some poor bartender who was now staring at us.  In fact, a lot of people were staring at us, mostly men.  This wasn’t exactly a man-cave; but it was still an arcade it seemed, and the attracted crowd was men older than me, if the humans were anything to go by.  I could only imagine the anthros were in the same demographic.

            The bartender looked at me now, “How about you?”

            “Just a rum and coke.”  Forget the coke, give me the bottle.  I got mine first, normally a really impolite gesture to the woman; as if I cared at this point.  Holding it made me even more conscious of Caitlyn, with her right arm wrapped around my left.  Her body was pressed against me, generating an uncomfortable level of body heat between us.  The bartender was looking under the table now, holding a sheet.  Did you really have to look up how to make a sex on the beach?  I mean sure, I don’t know either; but this isn’t about me.

            In a moment he came over with Caitlyns orange mess and scanned our wristbands.  I wanted to get away from here fast, the ire was starting to wear holes in me.  Caitlyn had managed to stay latched on like a leech despite getting her drink, so I steered her away from the bar while she hummed and sipped her drink.

            “What videogames do you play here?”

            “I’ve never been here.  They’ve probably got stuff like aftermarket Tron cabinets and what not for posterity sake, at least they should.”

            “Isn’t that a movie?”  The level of basic-bitch expressed by that sentence alone was enough to activate my autism.

            “The game came out right after the movie, circa nineteen-eighties and almost didn’t make it cause the videogame market crashed.  Now it’s just kind of a novelty to have 'disc wars' or 'lightracer' knock-offs in a collection of arcade games.”

            “Hmmm…”  Her straw sounded a long slurp.  She’d already finished the drink?  “I think I’d rather watch the movie!”  Her laughter sounding off made me remember who I was dealing with.  At least she talked better than she texted, and didn’t just say it was lame before changing the subject.

            “How was your drink?”

            “Didn’t taste like sex, so that sucked.”  What, you wanted a cup full of frustration, sweat, spit, and cum?  “Look.  Movie game.”  She pointed at a huge green and black machine with the Jurassic Park logo emblazoned on it.  She loosened from my arm and snatched my hand in hers while pulling me towards it.  I looked down and saw it seemingly for the first time.  It was soft and warm, the short fur poking me a bit.  Her nails were big and hard, pressing against the bottom of my hand.  We arrived at the machine and Caitlyn immediately crawled inside.  Fortunately it was empty inside as I came in as well, sitting on the false Jeep bench.  Two giant plastic abominations meant to resemble guns adorned the front before a huge TV displayed the ‘insert credit to begin’.  “I thought you said we needed nickles?”  She pointed at the screen.

            “Yeah, the machines will all call them credits, one coin is one credit, this one is eight to start.”  She was fiddling with her tiny purse for a moment, before abruptly scooting herself into me, adding much unneeded evidence to my theory that she lacked any concept of personal space.  She looked to the right at the space she’d just made on the bench and dumped her purse out completely.

            “Let’s see…” She turned in the seat, and looked over the mess she’d made.  Looking down I could see her tail making an imprint against the blue skirt she’d worn.  It gave a few wiggles making me flinch and look up.  She could definitely still see me, her head was turned a bit and I could see part of the split iris still in my direction; but she didn’t say anything.  Was the tail wiggle some kind of sign?  She leaned back and turned to me with a handful of several nickles.  “I’m short two, what do you have?”

            “I have a credit card and an expired costco membership.”  I slid forward to get up and out.  “Wait here, If anyone says anything tell them I’m getting some more coins.”  I wandered out and started crossing the floor.  The thought hit me to just up and leave her there, surely that would be enough to make her leave me alone forever.  I looked at my drink and realized I’d been slowly but surely downing it all, and wasn’t about to go driving anywhere.  Well fuck-a-duck, it’s nickle time I guess…

 

            Getting back to the booth with a ziploc full of change I found Caitlyn staring at her phone once more.  “Any trouble come knocking?”  I asked with a forced chuckle to emphasize I was joking.

            “Loser came and said he’d play with me instead, so I told him to get lost.”  Holy shit, just play the game with the guy.  I was forced to imagine some teenage gazelle boy trying to flirt with the hot older woman until I remembered the building was full of dudes in their late thirties getting drunk and talking about the ‘classics’.

            I sat down and placed the nickle baggy between us, hoping to erect an impenetrable barrier of deep earth metals to fend of the personal-space deer.  I jammed the last two coins in and the game gave a low quality dinosaur roar.

            It was simple to play, the gun cast a crosshairs on the screen, red for me blue for Caitlyn; and it gave a cutscene showing our characters running from knee-high low-poly dinos and hopping into a car to grab guns.  It was a jarring display to say the least, but the game flashed blood letters telling us to ‘FIGHT BACK!’

            What was strange however, was Caitlyns skill at the game.  It was a simple game to be sure, but it seemed like she should be worse than me.  We didn’t do amazing either, however, and had lost soon enough.

            “You’re actually really good.”

            She chuckled at me and pointer her thumb towards the big bloody ‘GAME OVER!’ that had appeared. “Screen says otherwise boo.”

            “No really, I figured you’d never played a videogame in your life.”

            “Pfft!  Nah I’ve played games before.  I just don’t care about them that much.”  Her phone was back out, but she held it to the side, still clicking away with her thumb.  “I get a lot of flak for these eyes, but I can see everything go on around me.”  The display was certainly impressive.  Somebody taking their eyes off their phone and still texting was doable, but she didn’t have to take her eyes off it.  She wouldn’t be double checking spelling errors from minor discrepancies in hand-eye coordination loss… Because there was no loss.  The perfect teenage girl, she can look at her parents when they’re talking to her and still text.  Jesus Christ how horrifying.

            “That’s actually pretty cool.”  Why am I complimenting her though?  This bitch dragged me out of the house for no reason other than she was bored.

            “Yeah, I bet you still like these more though, right?”  She held up a hand and splayed the fingers.  It wasn’t far from me, and I gave into the compulsion to feel it again, prodding it with my fingers, the pads on the palm and fingertips was a firm but smooth structure, not too unlike somebody with callous if the callous was smooth and warm.  I poked the nails next, and they weren’t fake secretary type nails, but were actually dense and hard, taking the place of the entire finger tip.

            “Yeah, they’re crazy…”

            She giggled and wiggled her fingers in a wave.  “Good crazy?”

            I snapped back and realized I was just sitting here looking at her hand like some kind of alien specimen, and released it.  “Well they aren’t bad crazy I guess, whatever that is.”  Change the fucking subject right now James.  “How do you still use your phone with the…  hoof-nails?”  That isn’t a different subject James!

            “Dunno.  Figured the phone knows it’s getting poked, so it does things.”  She waved the phone around in a circle like it was a magic wand.  Fitting really, seeing as how it seemed to be just like she said.

            “Technology, I guess.”  Technology don’t gotta explain shit.

            “You wanna see more?”  She wiggled her hand a bit, holding it up again.  In truth I kind of did, but there wasn’t any more to see.

            “Nah, thanks though.”

            “Anytime boo; look at the screen.”  She pointed with her thumb again and I looked.  It had gone back to demanding eight credits for a new game.  I thought for a moment thinking about how easy FPS games might be for her if she only gave them a chance..  However, like the many rulers in Lord of the Rings, I had been deceived.  The whole right side of me felt a sudden flash of warmth, and Caitlyns phone appeared before me.  I saw a look of shock on my face while Caitlyn entered the frame and placed her cheek against mine.  “Smile, gameboy!”  Years of Pavlovian training from my parents forced me to make a happy-face for the camera while Caitlyn snapped a shot.

            What the fuck?  “What, uh…”  She was back in her spot tapping away.  “What’s that for?”

            “Mm, Fakebook.”  She turned her phone towards me, showing a status update.  The real problem was what was written.  ‘date is gr8’.  I never agreed to a date, I came here to confront her about liking ancient internet posts.  It seemed stupid now, when I thought about it; even more so when I thought about who I was dealing with.

            “I didn’t realize this was a date.”

            “Boys and girls do stuff together hon, it’s called a date!”  She had quite the shit-eating grin for a deer with horns.  “Or were you still trying to find a friend to convert to a girlfriend?”

            “That’s the idea, yeah?”  Seemed pretty obvious to me.

            “You might suck at girls then, boo.”

            “What’s that supposed to mean?”

            “Girls don’t have friends on a spectrum.  You either are or you are not a friend with a girl.”  Her tone was condescending, and annoying too.

            “So yeah, you make friends and move from there.”  Still pretty fucking obvious bitch.

            “No, you don’t.  You’re a friend then.  You stay a friend.  The friend zone is real, because when you register as a friend, you stay a friend or you become not-a-friend.”  She was placing things back into her purse, a phone charger, a tube of lip gloss, other tiny shit that fit in the barely-a-bag.  “and not-a-friend means an enemy.  She sees you as a creep or a stalker, or some other kind of boogeyman.  It’s how girls work with their relationships.”  She turned to me and grinned.  “Somebody more vapid and insecure in her femininity wouldn’t tell you all this.  Truth is, the dating game is rigged from the start for girls.”  She pointed the phone screen at me.  The completed post included a heart-eyes emojii and the location.  “We know when we look at you if you’re gonna be boyfriend, just friend, or not-a-friend!”

            There was some strange dystopia about her words.  They made some sense, in retrospect at least; but I wasn’t asking for some miracle like she proposed.  “You’re saying no girl on earth wants to get to know a guy before she starts thinking he’s boyfriend material?”

            “Maybe there is hon, but she’s not here.”

            “And how do you figure out if a girl is going to like you?”

            She pointed her phone at me again, smiling.  “We just know.”  I froze.  The anthro girl was calling this a date, posting about it on the internet.  She was wrapping her arms around me, letting me play with her hand; she didn’t yell at me when I was staring at her tail like I was oogling her ass.

            “You’re not actually into me are you?”  You’re anthro, I’m human!  I can’t tack that on in a public place, unless I feel like getting screamed out of it and banned for life.  That might not be so bad in this particular case.

            “I’m finding out right now.  And it’s your turn to pick a game.”  Her smile warmed some part of me that was cold after the whole conversation.  Caitlyn was blunt to the point of being rude.  There was something about her being genuine and forward that was comforting and frustrating at the same time.  But I knew she wasn’t right.  Firsthand experience let me know what I wanted, and I was only looking for the right person this time.  The right person was human, however.

            “Yeah, it’s whatever I guess.  Let’s see if they have an ataxx machine, or another two player game like this.”  I could at least be polite, finish this up quick and get out of here.  I needed another rum and coke first.

 

            But the evening didn’t pass with such a somber tone.  We played a few games and both elected to stop drinking, mostly myself since I’d be driving myself home.  Outside the arcade the sun was almost down and the sidewalk was nearly empty.  I’d been secretly worried for some time now, after we’d been strutting around inside like we were one of those couples who were in it for the virtue signaling.  In the end it hadn’t been terrible, Caitlyn was just a bored girl looking for somebody to hang out with.

            “You sure you have a ride home?”

            “Yeah hon, Crystals is gonna come steal me from you, we’re gonna do a sleepover.”  She was tapping away at her phone once again.  I stood there in an awkward trance.  In the end, Caitlyn hadn’t been some gross stalker type; just a girl who spends too much time on social media.  I’d wait for her ride to arrive.  She might be a deer, but she’s still a girl.  I looked over to her.  It was just like the picture of Sava and her family; there was an almost uncanny set of characteristics about her.  Caitlyn didn’t have big round striped breasts like Sava in a bikini, she had smaller breasts; but was built with a wider bottom.  Come to think of it, her hips were wider than her shoulders.

            I’d definitely looked for too long again though, and saw the skirt shifting left and right once more; her tail wagging underneath it.  Shooting my eyes up again proved once more she was staring at me from behind her own head.  Turned slightly to the right she could almost certainly see all of me, but rather than getting mad, she wagged her tail.

            A car flashed it’s headlights off and on, and Caitlyn waved to it.  “That’s my ride here now, hon!”  I walked her over mostly to check on the driver, I had a need to know who on this earth had hippie-dipshit enough parents to name them ‘Crystals’…

 

            “It was a fucking goat Mike, I’m telling you.”  I had recapped the evening to a bewildered Mike, sitting in his chair, eyes staring in the cream filled center of the galaxy, desperately trying to take it all in.  I might have fudged a few things, like Caitlyn getting up and sitting on my lap to look for nickels… But it was for comedic value.

            “James, bro; you don’t get to ask me to believe that there’s a goat bitch named Crystals out there driving a beat up Honda, it’s not gonna happen.”

            “Fine asshole be that way!  She was a shaggy goat who wore fifty necklaces, but it's cool! Don’t believe my ass!”  It was good to laugh and unload the evening onto somebody who understood, at least to a degree.  We had our laughs and I left the room.  There was still something jarring about the whole day, despite finding out that Caitlyn was just attention starved.

            I flopped onto my bed and looked at my own phone.  Bunch of notifications from Caitlyn, holy shit bitch, chill out.  Was she sending me messages in the middle of the date or something?

            Oh.  Damnit.  Now I’m calling it a date too.  I stared at the text, somehow without reading it.  I guess in the end I actually did go on a date with an anthro.  I’d really gone and went to Applebees with Lassie.  I jabbed the status update I was tagged in.  She had added hearts in post, making me desperately hover over the options bar to see if I can request to be removed from an image, as well as this earth.  I jabbed Caitlyns picture instead, and saw her profile once again.  What was really unique was that it was devoid of the average girl selfies.  There weren’t piles of photos of her doing fuck all, but rather almost all her posts with her with other people.  She hadn’t posted anything since the photo with me, probably had actually gone to bed.  It accumulated another like, however; this one was from Sava however.

            The tiger came back to memory, and I clicked her name to bring up her profile instead.  I was drawn back to the banner photo, a family photo on the boat.  I hadn’t been wrong, Sava certainly had the distinct features that would make a human girl attractive.  The stripes on her body looked almost like they moved in a wave when I stared long enough, moving my eyes across her body… Strong arms and legs, round breasts…  Jesus christ what is moving around in my blanket?

            Nope.  I’m alone in my bed.  I’m not really gonna do this am I?  I look at the picture again.

            Just once isn’t gonna hurt.

================================================================================
Chapter 3: Styles took the day off work for this
Summary:

    MC is powerless against his friends quantum autism, and loses a round of 5D chess

Chapter Text

            My alarm clock was suicidal enough to dare attempting to wake me.  I gave the snooze button a smash, and dared that bastard to try it again.  Despite this, sleep didn’t return to me; but instead, my mind wandered over everything from yesterday.  I crawled to the edge of the bed and flung my feet onto the floor.  Didn’t know the day would come where I woke up and thought I should have a headache.

            Once a reason to get out of bed had been found it was shoes; wallet; phone; and then to the center of bedroom on the floor, in that order.  I took solace in the early hour and felt the night air seep through the window and onto my back for a moment.  Six in the AM is when a man wakes, so his crippling regrets and self-doubt can get washed away by exercising at such an ungodly hour.  I stood up full, the joints in my toes popping here and there; and began stretching top to bottom.

            “Seventy, seventy and then one hundred.”  Sit-ups; then pushups, and then squats.  Then the dumbbells, then the shower, then work.  It’s not too much work, but good God not being fat is such a pain in the ass.  But the worst is yet to come.  It is Monday; and Monday is bike eighteen miles to get to work day…

            Not too much work.  But good God fucking damnit why can’t I just be skinny without it.

 

            My battered ten speed managed to accomplish the task once more, despite the uphill abuse.  The metal shop I called my job was still there, which was a bummer.  I pushed my bike through the bay door, and shoved it into a corner in the break room with the others.  Throw on a pair of overalls and into the fray I go.

            Station 6, with its cut plate reading ‘James’ is my wage cage where I sit and use artificial lightning to build shit.  Sixteen feet by sixteen feet, with an LN in the corner and enough clamps to hold an entire bridge together.  Welding is like any other trade: there’s an art to it, and you personally will never learn it, because I did instead.

            The day breezed by with nothing but attaching base plates; and lunch came in no time.  Lunch was the one time I stared at my phone for an elongated period of time, the little shit bricks job was to get calls and texts, because I needed it to; and in its down-time it could show me mildly entertaining garbage from the internet.  But this time was of course different; as my notifications had once more piled up.  Time to uninstall fakebook, swear to fucking God; I do not need to know whenever somebody liked and commented on Caitlyns stupid picture.  Almost three hundred likes, from people who don’t matter and I don’t care about.  In a curious bout I turned to the angry reactions to find a whopping eighty-some-odd.  Unsurprisingly, it was a horde of anthros, however; what was surprising is that it appeared to mostly female anthros.  Normally, the anti-colonialism efforts are the produce of enraged males engaging in tribalism that yet another female has been stolen by the white man.

            Instead, the angry-babies list was populated by a diverse cast of characters, including a number of other gazelles.  One stood out from the rest, however; because she had the teeny-tiniest horns I could see out of the bunch.  Once her profile was up, there was a moment of shock for me: she was a hybrid.  Instead of the dark brown split iris eyes, typical of all the horse and kinda-like-a-horse women; there were a pair of bright blue binocular eyes.  Just like a human might have.  Her horns were barely there, maybe only one or two inches long, and her fur was pale like the blond hair on her head.

            There was something outstanding about her, beyond that; but I couldn’t quite put my finger on it.  She was captivating.  A chair scooting out in front of me threw me off guard for a moment, as Kate, the front desk employee; had elected to sit across from me.

            “Hey!”

            “Hey!”  Yeah, just respond immediately like you’ve been waiting all day to shotgun that word out.  “What’s up?”

            “Oh nothing, thought I’d eat lunch with Mr. popular guy is all!”  Oh shit oh fuck oh shit oh fuck.

            “What do you mean?”

            “Saw you roll across my feed in some pic a friend commented on, thought it was crazy.  I didn’t know you were into antrho girls.”

            Kyle wasn’t here to give me some woman-hating explanation of this sudden behavior.  I would have to rely on previous knowledge obtained about the weird roundabout bullshit women pull to try to get basic yes or no questions answered.  “I did for the first time, I guess everybody knows that now though.”

            “Oh, I mean, I saw it; but I wouldn’t say everybody… How did it go though?”

            Time to use my superpowers and freeze time.  Precious seconds become hours or more at my will, and I can finally think about the situation.  This can play out in one of two ways: one; she’s from the office and has never done any real work in her life.  She answers the phone, and taps on a keyboard; and is slowly turning more every day into another zombie who shares and retweets the overlord-approved diversity bullshit that plasters reality and wants to congratulate me on joining her brainwashed horde.

            Or two; she’s a hardcore racist who hates anthros and needs to know if I’ve betrayed the species or not.  Every moment of her off-work time is spent browsing the dark web where conspiracy theories about the lizard-people having always been here, and are blending in with the anthros they bio-engineered so that they can better manipulate humanity into betraying Christ and taking up drinking and masturbation.  There is nothing more evil than a cool wine aunt, because they are not cool and can’t produce children because they didn’t vote for Trump…

            Seeing as how she’s a girl; it’s more likely that--

            “James?  Hello?”

            “Oh shit, I can’t freeze time…”

            “What?”

            “It’s nothing!  I had fun, I guess; ‘barcades’ aren’t my thing, I don’t think.”

            “Oh, that’s too bad I think; but at least you had fun… Hey my friend is here now, I’m gonna go sit with her, sorry!  Bye!”  Yes, leave; please.  Oh God, wait; she’s going to sit with another girl; you’ve been ousted as a racist, you’re about to get fired, stop her!

            “Yeah, see ya!”  The screaming in my head must be audible to those around me, there’s no way it isn’t loud enough for the people in the break room to hear…

 

            Like muh-ancestors before me getting to school, it’s uphill both ways.  Home is at the top of a hill, and work is at the top of a different hill.  I imagine this is supposed to be a source of joy to me, working out is meant to improve physical abilities and in turn change ones mood.  But that begs the question why it makes me so miserable.

            Bike chained back up at the bike rack, and I’m headed inside for the night.  Mike is sitting on the couch playing Warzone and cursing into the microphone, just like a proper adult should be at six in the afternoon.  I retreated to the bathroom and stripped down.  No matter how tight you set your coveralls, you’ll still be covered in metal at the end of the day.  The daily abuse for the showers drains commenced, and ended; and I wandered to my room.

            I went to my room to lay down for a bit, the way I normally would.  However, flopping down on my bed, however; made me sick somehow.  I rolled off of it almost instantly, a deep guttural feeling penetrating me.  I leaned down and smelled the sheets.  They could be cleaned, sure; but they weren’t filthy.  So why did it feel like there were bugs crawling on me now?

            I rounded them up anyways, taking them to the hallway and opening the sliding door revealing the stacking washer and dryer.  I beat the sheets into the tiny washing machine, thinking about how there wouldn’t be anything but a mattress for me to sleep on unless I started now.  What was wrong with them though?  I couldn’t put my finger on it…

            If I’m waiting for the wash though, there is no other choice to relax except at the computer.  I crashed into the chair with the contents of my pockets in my hands.  I spilled them out next to the keyboard, and took up my phone.  First time I’ve looked at it all day long, a weirdly comforting thought as I unlock it.  And it’s fakebook open to Sava’s profile, so now I get that shame back on my mind.  A pile of notifications swarms the thing again, dear god how many friends of Caitlyn are gonna like the stupid picture good God.

            I boomer my way into figuring out how to not give a shit about the post.  I didn’t want this to be my life, sucked into some shitty virtual world.  What kind of weird bastard cares what strangers on the internet think?  I don’t care what people I know think of what I do, imagine how valueless the opinions of some literally-who must be.

            I have to ignore this, for my own sanity.  Videogame, James; play videogame and be happy.

            But, in what seems like no time at all, the dryer has beeped, and I rush to experience the joy of rolling around in hot sheets.  Digging them out of the dryer, they certainly don’t smell bad, but the memory of the earlier feeling still came to haunt me.  This would not stop me from rolling around in freshly dried laundry, and oh boy did I.  After making the bed I managed to forget the corrupted sensation, and rolled into bed.

            Sleep took me quickly, at least it felt that way.

 

            The work week was the same as it ever was.  I can’t imagine keeping a journal, it would be the same set of words on paper for years.  It was actually a bit depressing to think about, even if I mostly liked my job.  Imagine the recent entries though:

            “Dear Journal; fluffy women have invaded my world.”  It made me think about history class, when we learned about the 1860 comet.  It was that same era that had a comic book series featuring space radiation causing people to mutate.  Some people took it as some kind of premonition: what had happened was something out of a sci-fi story of any age.  A series of comets passed by earth, and showered the earth in some kind of radiation, later given the stupid nickname ‘anthro-waves’.  It was a few years before anyone noticed what had changed, since there was a conspiracy at the time that it was a man-made bioweapon of some kind that started changing the animals.  It was scary to learn about, animals walking out of the forest, trying to get up onto two legs with malformed front paws.  They showed a desperate attraction to civilization, and no matter how much they were hunted they kept coming back, like some kind of sickening zombie flick.

            Eventually they had passed laws preventing their extermination, since their mutation went against all the natural laws we knew.  They were turning into people, or so some claimed.  In the end, only around thirty years later; anthros were being brought out of the woods and into cities.  They were held at military bases and college campuses.  They were taught languages, and other subjects; and it shows how well they learned.

            They adapted to society, but faced oppression for years.  They held civil rights marches alongside other minority groups of humans, resulting in the constant place-of-origin-sensitivity training we all put up with.  It didn’t seem like it was necessary to me, growing up.

            But here we were.  Anyone who still didn’t tolerate anthro’s and called them beasts was a dinosaur themselves, or a religious nutjob; if not both.

            My phone vibrated on the desk as I came back into my room.  Good God I will burn this earth down just to not have to hear that noise…

            ‘No call no text no nothing?’ Who the hell is this- oh no it’s Sava.  I never texted Sava.

            ‘Been at work all week, sorry.’

            ‘Time for a sexy date thoooooo!’  Oh God no don’t do this to me.  ‘JK!’  At least that came.

            ‘I really am sorry about not texting you I meant to.’  I didn’t want to do stupid lingo with her for some reason.

            ‘How was your date though?’

            ‘Please it wasn’t a date just met somebody over a misunderstanding’

            ‘What didn’t they understand?’

            ‘Just thought they were cyber-stalking me going and liking a lot of old pictures turns out she just was bored and looking me up’

            There was some silence for a bit, when suddenly my phone gave the default ringtone.  Wait what the fuck is going on why are you calling?  Do I hit the red or the green?  Why are you calling I want to scream, I am pressing the green phone button against my will.

            “Hello?”  I ask, hearing the confusion in my own voice.

            “Hello!”  I started recognizing the voice almost immediately.

            “What’s up?”

            “Oh I just don’t wanna text forever.  Talking’s easier.  That alright?”

            “Yeah, it’s all good.”  Don’t make me talk to you, what do I do?

            “So yeah, I dunno dude she sounds creepy.”

            “Who does?”

            “The girl going through your fakebook, duh.”  Ah yes, Caitlyn; the person we were talking about before I had to sperg out of a phone call.

            “I guess a little at first, but she turned out alright I think.”

            “Guess if you say so.  Fun date then?”

            “I still don’t want to call it that.”

            “Right, sorry.”  Her laugh was refreshing.  Sava was different from other girls in that way.  Tomboys really are superior I guess.

            “So, what are you up to?”

            “Got off work a bit ago, just got out of the shower.”  Don’t imagine her naked, don’t imagine her naked, don’t imagine her naked and soaking wet.

            “Same story here actually, your text came just as I walked in my room.”

            “We’ve gotta stop syncing up like that dude!”  Now that you mention it, yeah probably.  “What are you doing tomorrow then, work?”

            “Nah, I’ve got the day off.  You syncing up on that too?”

            “Oh?  What’s this?  Am I gonna be some story about how it wasn’t a date?”

            “Oh haha, like you aren’t busy.”

            “Actually I am both free and busy.”  What are you talking about?

            “How’s that?”

            “My parents have this thing, somebody always has to be at their house, or it’s gonna get robbed or something.  Kinda paranoid I guess, but I grew up with it sooo…”

            “You live with them?”

            “Yeah, I’m a huge loser I rent a room in their basement; my sister still lives with them too, but she’s desperate to get out all the time.”  She gave a yawn, and sounds of shifting could be heard.  “So I usually end up watching the house while she chases off boys at the mall.”

            “People still go to the mall?”

            “Don’t be hating on the mall dude, that’s where my record store is at!”

            “Vinyl junky, huh?”

            “Oh yeah, huge money sink; can’t wait for my family to sell them off at half price to pay for my funeral.”

            “I guess it’s better than getting them buried with you.”

            “There isn’t a coffin big enough to take all my shit with me.”

            “You ought to send me a pic of your cavern sometime.”

            “Hey, like I said I’m not busy I’m just here.  Come see it yourself.”
            I paused and had to manually restart the process of breathing and blinking.  What did she say?  Just come on over?  “What do you mean?”

            “Come.  See.  My.  Dragon.  Hoard.  Dude it’s not hard, you got a car?”

            “Yeah, I’ve got a car, but you don’t know me really, and you’re just gonna have me come over to your house?”

            “I mean if it’s you it’s cool I think.  Why what’s wrong with that?”  A lot of things, actually.

            “I just thought you’d probably want to meet again somewhere public, maybe get to know me better?  I dunno…”

            “Dude.  You’re so real-world it hurts sometimes.”

            “I don’t know if that’s a compliment this time.”

            “Don’t make it weird, I mean; what’s gonna happen?  You think I’m gonna kill you or something?”

            “No, I just-”

            “Well hold on.  Are you gonna steal my moms shit?  Is this you being shocked I’m just gonna let a thief in?”

            “No, I would never-”

            “You gonna rape me?”  My heart skipped several beats, and a dark image plopped itself in my head like a horse-shit on a shiny baking sheet.  The feeling of cold water pouring down me faded fast, and after restarting my breathing and blinking manually a second time I was hot.

            “That’s fucking horrible, why would you even say that!”  I had almost yelled.  What kind of fucked up question was that?

            I could hear a sigh on the other end of the line.  “That’s great to hear.  I didn’t think you would either.  So I’m not the bad guy, and neither are you, so what’s the problem?”  The problem is you turned out sick in the head.

            “I guess it’s just weird to run strait into some strangers house.”

            “You got invited in by somebody you know.”

            “I guess I also don’t feel like it, right now.”

            “Cause of what I said?”

            “Yeah.  Kinda.  I don’t know.”  Fucking hang up on her James, what are you doing?

            “If it’s any good to know, I’m glad it upset you.”

            “What’s that supposed to mean?”

            “Good guys can laugh at a nasty joke, but only somebody whose thought about it before can take a comment like that in stride.”  I was only silent.  That was some weird backwards ass logic.  It wasn’t even logic.  A rapist would say how awful rape is then show up with a length of rope anyways.  “You there?”

            “Yeah.”

            “Sorry bro; I just thought it might help, I dunno; break the ice.”

            “Oh, I, yeah, uhhh it did.”  That was almost a sentence.  Not really though.

            “I’m still gonna leave the invitation open.  You’re a cool dude, I wanna see you, and soon.”

            “Yeah, I’m gonna think about it still; no worries.”

            I can’t even remember how it wrapped up.  Something was said, and then goodbye was said.  The phone went quiet and I resisted the urge to chuck it against the wall.  I couldn’t even explain why I was so upset.  It was a dumb question, sure; but who asks that?  It was weird to think about a girl non-nonchalantly asking a guy if she could expect to be raped that evening.

            It festered in me for a bit, until it became my resolve to actually go see her.  Some part of me wanted to prove I was trustworthy, as a childish way of combating the ‘icebreaker’ question.  I swirled in my chair back and forth, thinking about turning on the computer.  I knew what I really wanted though, and got up to head to the fridge.  Mike and I kept the beer on top of the fridge, to keep it lukewarm.  We both agreed it was better that way, and I slid one bottle out of the pack and wandered back to my room.  One and done, I needed the sleep more than anything else.

 

            It was the hell nap, though.  I closed my eyes.  The world went dark.  And three seconds later I opened my eyes to find it that hours had passed.

            And I hadn’t gotten any real sleep from any of them.  It was about two in the morning, and I could tell from tossing and turning for thirty minutes I wasn’t getting back to bed.  I got up and did what any normal person would do instead, and fired up my computer.  The screen came to life and raped my eyes with the force of sixteen-hundred-suns.  Some shirtless monkey with morning wood was covering his eyes against the power of technology at two in the morning.  My God humanity has come so far.

            I sat there slouched in the chair with my eyes closed waiting for them to adjust.  After a minute I could finally log in, and load up the desktop.  Nothing left to do but to play something, at least until I could feel sleepy again.

            Last played on the list was Tomb-Tenderizer, but I didn’t want a random date from Caitlyn to show up.  What else was there?

            No.  There was only one option, only one game that would allow my mind to go blank and the hours to slip by… I launched the farming sim.  Green pastures of beets and cows slowly filled the screen as years of a life wasted rendered.  God, I want a tractor in real life, I don’t even know what I would do with it.  I harvested; plowed; dug and chopped, all while sinking virtual days down the drain; until finally the sun was coming up.

            The computer booped.  My God, it’s Styles; calling me a homo-girl for playing simulation games.  If only I could have foreseen this outcome.

            ‘Fuku Styles’ I’m gonna plow the shit out of this farm.

            ‘Gameday or free?’  I recalled the conversation with Sava.  I had the perfect out now, bro’s came way before gross phone calls.

            ‘Anything in mind?’

            ‘Gonna spy on Adam!’

            ‘wtf y?’

            ‘dates today’ Oh shit.  Adam is going out with the jackal, and like good friends the plan is to stalk him relentlessly and possibly ruin the occasion?

            ‘hell yeah, gets me out of mine’

            ‘ur what’  Oh no.  Oh God no.  ‘you’re going on date?’

            I have to play it cool.  ‘got asked didnt say id go.’

            Styles, the sick fuck; replied with a single word.  ‘Tiger?’

            ‘nah man, besides I wanna see Adam’

            ‘LIAR’

            ‘Whatever lets see Adam’

            ‘Tiger’ No Styles, don’t do this to me; you don’t mean it.  I attacked the keyboard

            ‘I dont want to see her if we can spy on Adam’

            Styles took a minute to respond, I’d almost gone back to my game rather than wait.  ‘when were you gonna date the tiger?’  I don’t know, I didn’t even want to go see her.

            ‘dunno, she got weird and I didnt want to go’

            ‘we’ll go see Adam on one condition’  No Styles, don’t make stalking Adam into something awful for me.  ‘you gotta see Tiger.’

            I leaned back in my chair.  I could just lie and say I went.  ‘Why are you torturing me?’

            ‘I don’t care who you go see but you’re gonna die from loneliness unless you go meet some girl somewhere.’

            ‘You know I don’t want to date a tiger right?’  Let him have it; ‘I don’t want to date any anthro girl.’

            ‘Don’t care, see a girl.’

            ‘My date with the gazelle doesn’t count then?’

            ‘No.’  Bitch you don’t get to make that call; I went out with a girl.  I slouched even further into my chair, and looked back at the alarm clock.  Seven forty: a reasonable hour to be awake, and yet a time when most people were asleep.  I placed my hand on the desk like a rake, and dragged my phone towards me.  Jump into the messages and see Sava’s right on top.  Perfect.

            ‘What time is Adam’s date?’  I plugged into the keyboard before lifting the phone.

            ‘They’re going to a soup place at 1 is what Adam said’

            Styles responded immediately, but I could work as fast as I needed too.  I switched to my phone, and to Sava.  ‘What would be a good time to come over?’  I could work her around to asking me to come anywhere from noon onwards then Styles had no ground to stand on, since I could only make one.

            Sava was online even at this hour.  Weird enough, but good.  ‘We could meet whenever, like I said why? You coming?’

            ‘When would be a good time tho?’

            ‘Dude LOL whenever?’  A deep droning noise emanated from my throat as my body attempted to force the frustration out of it.  Keywords.  Insinuate something.

            ‘Should I come by at noon if I can make it?’

            ‘Yeah dude, swing by at noon or something; that’d be cool LOL’ I read the sentence a couple times.  This was too fucking perfect.  I held my finger down on my and her previous messages to delete everything except her saying ‘We could meet whenever…’ and ‘Yeah dude, swing by at noon…”  and looked at it for another minute.

            I asked when to come.  She gave a vague answer, then specified a time.  Bulletproof, fuck you Styles.  I screen-shotted the abridged talk and shared it to Styles.  ‘Looks like it’s you or her dude lmao.’  It took him a moment to respond, even if all he wrote was

            ‘haha!’  That’s right, admit defeat and let me tag along, I gotta see this shit.  Another buzz.  Styles sent a screenshot to me back?  I opened it.  It was a text between him and Adam from yesterday… He was asking Adam when the date was and Adam had responded it was Saturday at ten…

            My blood went cold.  Hold on a damn second.  Wait just a fucking minute.  Give me the whole fucking rain check, in fact; Adam’s date was at ten?  Three hours from now, breakfast at a soup place, Adams words right there.  My phone buzzed, giving a box at the top saying there was a new message for Styles…  ‘Actually you’ve got plenty of time for both Casanova!’

            Oh, caps lock is on you fucking piece of shit; ‘WTF WHY LIE ASSHOLE’

            Another screenshot, or rather an edited version of my screenshot from before.  A red circle was outlining… Nothing?  It had an arrow pointing at…  Wait a minute.  The gaps between mine and Sava’s messages…  Where I’d deleted the two messages there was a wider gap than the one before…  It was only a fucking pixel!  ‘U 1st!’  God fucking damnit!  Fuck you Styles!

            ‘How the fuck do you even see that?’

            ‘I know my friends too well!’  God had made Styles to be some kind of penultimate war-faring general who was, at all times, about eight hundred moves and a couple dimensions of already-won chess games ahead of all of his opponents.  And he used that power to do this shit to me instead.

 

            I probably looked like a child standing outside with my arms folded waiting for Styles to pull up.  We were on a holy mission to make sure Adam came out alright.  Alright from what?  Well, we won’t know unless we stalk him the whole time he’s on this date; as only good friends would do.

            I slid into the passenger seat of Styles car and buckled up.

            “You think he’ll get there early?”  I asked, ready to take bets on how this would go.

            “Nah, he’ll hide in his car until ten o clock on-the-tock; then wander out to meet her in the parking lot.”

            “Probably.  What have you got for tunes?”

            “Don’t bring it up.  Radio stopped working yesterday, I need to get it fixed.”

            “Fuggin bummer Styles.”

            “I’ll make it.”  He laughed it off.

 

            It only took a couple minutes to reach the strip with the restaurant on it.  I’d seen the soup places around, but had only ever gone in once.  The place was expensive trash; way too many dollars for half a bowl of soup.  Thinking about it, however; the movie theater was nearby so you could do lunch a movie.  That was mine and Jades first date, at least.

            “Yo!  Target spotted!”  Styles broke my concentration.  I looked out the windshield towards the restaurant.  I didn’t see Adam, but instead there was an obvious anthro woman standing outside.  She looked at her phone, occasionally taking breaks to glance up at the parking lot.  The dark line going from her nose, over her head, and presumably down her back gave it away.  This was Adam’s striped jackal date almost certainly.

            She looked up from her phone again, and glanced around the parking lot until her gaze landed on Styles car, and she looked right at me.  Like the God-awful social reject that I am, I failed to zip my gaze away and pretend I was looking at something else; and instead lifted a hand and waved to her.

            She stood there for a moment, adjusting her ears up and down; before finally raising a hand and waiving it a tiny bit.  A smile broke out across her face, and she turned away.  I turned to Styles who was staring at me, wide-eyed; and with the biggest shit eating grin he could manage spread across his face, in an expression that screamed to me how retarded I was.

            “You gonna blow our cover?”

            “I panicked!  I didn’t know what to do, she looked straight at me!”

            “Go on, go make friends; go steal Adams date, that would fucking hilarious!”  He was laughing and rocking in his seat.

            “I wouldn’t ruin this golden opportunity for Adam to find true love.”  Sarcasm, “But whats the deal with you trying to choke me into dating anthros?  I’m getting kinda sick of it dude.”

            “You like them.”

            “I really don’t though.”

            “You just waved at an anthro girl just cause she looked at you.  You stared at Miss Coles ass all through chemistry.  You turn into a giant spazz around any and all girls you come across.”  Styles turned to face me eye to eye.  “Then you go against your will to meet anthro girls and come out on top somehow.”

            “Desperate girls go to speed dating, big whoop!”

            “Why haven’t you unfriended any anthros?”

            “What?”

            “You check fakebook every day to clear notifications and talk to Kyle.  Once in a while, you share music videos until the stars align and you update your profile picture and show the world your welds like somebody knows what they’re looking at.  You could have dumped them all in the memory hole.  And after a whole week; you haven’t shunned a single anthro, and even went on a date with one.”

            “I didn’t want to.  I wanted to clear up-”

            “You ran to the arcade and hung out with a chick.  At the drop of a hat, too.  Mike told me you practically threw yourself out the door.”

            “Mikes a lying bitch.”

            “Ten o clock.”  I looked at the time, and it was in fact nine-fifty-nine.  Before retorting I took a slap to the shoulder; “Your other ten o clock.”  I looked back to the jackal, who was now talking to Adam.

            As they headed inside, Styles turned the car back on and pulled forward to the closer parking.  We could see through the glass window, and watched them go through the line.

            “You don’t really think I was staring at Miss Coles, do you?”

            “Dude, come on; you sat front row and got an A then told us you hated chemistry.”

            “Maybe I wanted to not have to retake a science course.”

            “Remember when she was trying to reach the projector, the fancy new one on the ceiling?”  God, I hated this story…  “She held the yard stick and was still too short, so she hopped up and down trying to jab the power button…”

            “Shut up dude.”

            “She finally hit it, and came crashing down on you, and big fat cow tits knocked you in the head!”

            “It wasn’t even a hard course, you passed it to; were you staring at her ass?”

            “Hell yeah, that thing could crush six soda cans in a line and she wouldn’t know she sat on them!”

            “Well, I wasn’t!”  I thought back to the class.  It wasn’t wrong that I had in fact looked at Miss Coles.  I was a teenager, and she had assets that made boys with cracking voices yearn to get their virginity bulldozed.  The problem was that everything I looked at was underneath blue jeans or a shirt.  I could at least pretend she was human then, minus the tail of course.

            I stared back into the restaurant.  Adam and the jackal were talking, but Adam looked like he might be about to run away.  I looked to the jackal instead.  Her smile looked disingenuous, and tired.

            “He’s faking and she knows it.”  I said to Styles, hoping to remind him why we came here.

            “Yeah, he’s clearly talking out his ass.  What about her though?”

            “Look at her face; she’s actually getting upset.”

            Styles was quiet for a moment.  “Like, angry or…”

            “No, like feelings hurt and shit.”  I stared at her face, the movements it made were obvious if you paid attention.

            “Well fuck then; see what I mean?”

            “What are you on about now?”

            “You can see her face through a damn window and figure out her emotions accurately!”

            “What, I have good vision for being a welder?  Fuck are you on about?”

            “I can barely tell what anthros are thinking or feeling when I’m a few feet away and can see them clearly.”

            “Styles, shut the fuck up.”

            “Be mad all you want, James.  But I’m only shitting up your day cause I think you need it, asshole.”  Styles started the engine, and turned on the AC.  More time than we had thought must have passed, because Adam and the jackal were getting up; still beaming at each other with fake smiles.  We stared in fake wonder, while the real reason Styles invited me slowly crept into my mind and made me annoyed.  It was all to lecture me.

            When the two had left the restaurant, Adam gave a short wave; and marched away.  The jackal girl, however; just kind of stood there on the sidewalk.  She looked tired, and a bit sad.  I turned to Styles.

            “You really can’t see how she feels right now?”

            He turned to face me.  “She looks like a dog staring into space, James.”

            I looked back to her, and saw she had been looking at her phone but was looking up at the same time.  Our eyes met again, and she smiled and gave another soft, awkward wave.  I raised my hand strait up and held it there for a moment, before putting it down, and pulling out my own phone.  It was twelve on the dot when Styles started backing the car out of its spot.  We saw Adam’s car on our way out of the parking lot.

            I guess it was time for my date…  No.  This wasn’t a date either, the thing with Caitlyn was a fluke, and Sava was just cool.  We weren’t going to dinner or some shit, we were just going to hang out at her place, like friends who already know each other.  It’s not a date, and I knew it.

            “You know…”  Styles starting talking some more shit, “I’m thinking you might not really be into anthros.”

            “Gee, what could have given you that idea?”

            “It seems like you just kinda get them as well as people.  Maybe that’s it.”

            “I thought everyone did up until that shit a minute ago.  Figured reading the room was how you meet people.”

            “You seen Kyle lately?”

            “No, he’s in the locker a lot lately.”

            “Fucking hell…”

            “Why?  You miss his scaley ass?”

            “Like a fat kid misses the free-candy-van.  We text now and then, but I know you talk with him more than anyone else.”

            “What made you bring him up?”

            “I wonder if he thinks you’re into other kinds.”

            “You can’t call them that Styles, the government is gonna use the microphone in your car to hear it and put your bitch ass on a watch list.”

            “That’s retarded!”  He laughed.  “By listening to everyone's phone calls, they’ve already put all of us on a watch list!”

            “He asked me if I was drunk and messaging anthros is all.”

            “Oh, he did talk to you about it?”

            “Yeah, him and Mike about had panic attacks that their notifications had girls in them.”

            “Guess you can find out for yourself how you feel in an hour, yeah?”

            It wasn’t a date.  Going to see Sava wasn’t a date in the slightest.  “Yeah, Styles, I’ll try to have fun on my date.”

================================================================================
Chapter 4: Great White Tiger
Summary:

    Our brave hero deserves a slap

Chapter Text

            I stared at the text I’d sent as Styles drove away.  ‘Gonna head over now.’  Four words for a whole lotta wasted time.  She’d almost immediately texted back.

            ‘Sweet dude see you soon!’  With a maps pin attached.  She was only a fifteen-minute drive away, the next city over; in a suburb it looked like.  The spaghetti of roads looked like a pain to travel, so I was grateful for the map link.  But I was here, sitting in my car, instead of driving it.  My life was so radically different.  I didn’t want to be doing all this, I wanted to be in my routine.  I wanted to get off of work, shower, have a beer and look forward to spending the whole weekend winding down.

            I started the car and pulled out of the apartment complex’s driveway.  Even going on a drive was hell though, everywhere I looked were anthros.  I wasn’t the type to hate them, far from it; they aren’t that different from people.  But, at the same time; the differences were plain as day.  If hearing somebody explain how different races of human were actually different species was too hard to handle, surely looking at anthros was a perfect illustration of it.

            But, even as I drove out of my own neighborhood where I had lived for a few damn years now; it seemed like there were only anthros in my vision.  An older looking dog man at the bus stop.  A woman with tall ears leaving the great clips.  Two rabbit girls running in sports clothes.  I had stopped at the light though, and had the chance to look longer.  If Styles was right, I should be bursting out of my own pants, right?  Some sick fetish for not-my-species was chewing its way out of my head, and I was destined to be with an anthro.  I looked on for a moment: they weren’t ugly.  One held her ears up, and was looking excited waiting for the light to change, and her partner was clearly breathing heavier.  They were short, maybe four and a half feet tall, their breasts small from sports-bras visable through loose white t shirts.  Their legs were probably their best asset…  If not their asses.  Christ, the excited looking one had a tight bottom.

            Her friends arm went up suddenly, and I realized she was flipping me the bird, scowling.  I probably needed that.  The one that could actually go for a run, however; was laughing hysterically.  She turned her back to me and looked over her shoulder with a smug enough face to make me feel bad for looking again when she did her twirl.  Her friend was looking at her now instead, clearly yammering something about encouraging me.

            The light was green.  It was time to be very far from here…

 

            Sava’s house wasn’t the biggest one in the neighborhood, but rested in a big yard.  I pulled into the driveway and threw it in park behind the SUV.  Taking off my seatbelt I looked to the left and saw the front door go wide and a big orange mass slid out to wave at me.  I waved back and swung my own door wide.  This all still felt a bit weird, yet it was nice to see Sava again.

            “What’s up dude?”

            “Not much, good to see you Sava.”

            “Hey, slide your ride out to in front of the house please?  You might actually meet my mom and she’ll want her spot.”

            I slid back into the drivers seat and backed out and plopped myself in front of the curb.  “Your mom cool?”

            “I bought her a mug that says number one mom, so she better be.  Yo, get inside, it’s hot.”  Please just talk to me on your porch for like five minutes to an hour… inside we went though.  The living room was something out of a modern décor magazine.  White table with black bowl, black couch with white pillows.  Looks like zebras should be living in here for the cliché.

            “Nice place.”

            “Eww, no!  This way.”  She pointed her thumb and moved to the opposite side of the living room where a staircase rested against the wall.  Instead of going up we rounded it to its back where Sava opened a… wall?

            “No fuckin’ way, you got a hidden door and everything?”

            “Yeah!”  she looked so giddy, like a child showing their treehouse to a friend.  We both scaled the stairs down into the basement.  It was a finished basement boot, complete with ceiling fan and doors between rooms.  My dad had told me how great it was going to be when he finished the basement, but I had spent my childhood in a home where the basement had insulation hanging off the walls and turning on the light required walking into the black void and screwing in the bulb by hand.

            “Sweet spot…”  I was taken aback.  TV, bed, desk all crammed into a tiny cool room… it was like a dream come true.

            Sava landed on her couch, a far cry from the one upstairs; it was battered brown pleather.  “Oh yeah, worth mom squeezing me for rent!”

            “Yeah, I can see that, this is dope.”  She then proceeded to open an actual mini fridge next to her couch and pull a soda out to offer me.  “Okay, if you move out let me know so I can move in.”  It got a laugh out of her.  This wasn’t going as bad as I had thought it would, this wasn’t a date with pressure and nonsense.  Just friends hanging out.

            “Yeah, watching the house while our parents are out became mine and my sisters chore; once we were old enough, but I’ve made it comfy since then.”  I landed on a chair to the side of the couch.  “So, now with my dad gone it’s been more frequently I’m stick home…”

            “Your dad isn’t around anymore?”

            “Ah, yeah; my parents got divorced about four years ago.”

            “God, I’m sorry to hear that.”  I feared he was dead, but the news was brighter than that.  “Your mom’s been remarried?”

            “What?”  her face shifted from downtrodden to confused with a high brow.  “No, what made you think that?”

            “It’s just, when you invited me over; you said you were watching in in place of your parents.”

            “Did I?”  She looked up in thought, but gave up quickly.  “Must have been out of habit…”  she laughed it off before rebounding: “So, how was your thing?”

            “My thing?  Oh, with Styles!  It…”  The conversation from the car drifted back, and it dawned on me how everything that transpired must have been part of Styles’ scheme to lecture me about girls.  “It was alright.  Ended up being kinda dumb, but yeah.”

            “At least you went, yeah?  I need to go see my friends Kate and Gab…”

            “At least they aren’t named ‘Crystals’”

            “Say what now?”

            “That ‘date’ I went on, she had her friend pick her up and her friend was named ‘Crystals’”

            “Plural, Every time?”

            “That’s how she said it, yeah.”

            “Whacky.”  She took a long drink to empty her can before basketball tossing it into a bin by the desk.

            “So, what are your hobbies?”

            “Now that there is a speed dating question!”  She laughed at me, but I was a good sport and chuckled back.              She got up and moved towards the desk “I, spend way too much time doing college online to have a real hobby.”  She unfolded a bright blue laptop “but in my free time I’m kind of an audiophile.”  She lifted a pair of huge headphones up to hand to me.  “Check these out.”

            I donned the strange apparatus, feeling like some cheap sci-fi character that didn’t belong in the century of Bluetooth earbuds.  Once on, I turned and asked “now what?”  only to be greeted by silence.  Sava grinned a sharp smile and nodded rapidly.  I took the headphones off.

            “Good shit, right?”

            “Yeah, I couldn’t even hear myself talk.”

            “Put em back on, check this out…”  She started playing with the knobs on a box before turning to her laptop.  I replaced the headphones while I looked on at her working on the laptop.  She had pulled up something that resembled iTunes, with lists of music and what-not.  She raised a hand and gave me a thumbs-up.

            The sound came only a moment later.  It was already familiar to me, yet a bit different.  The lyrics coming out confirmed my suspicions.

            Sweet Dreams played in my ears in unrelenting clarity; though it must have been a cover of the song, because even the voice was different.  But it was obvious the quality of the headphones was her goal in showing me, and it was almost like a personal concert.  The music faded in my head like songs always do.  Sava had stopped watching my reaction, and was looking at some setting on her laptop.  What a strange hobby: liking noise to sound good.

            The song went on for a while, Sava checking my reaction now and then, giggling and making a smug expression.  Maybe it was more common than I thought.  Sava didn’t seem like a shut in or a nerd, far from it actually.

            I stood up straighter after realizing the headphones had an enormous cord on them, and glanced around the room.  There was a TV, and a small movie rack, but both paled in comparison to the wall I’d somehow glazed over coming into her room.  It was completely filled with old media, records and cassettes, things I only recognized from my parents owning or a trip to the goodwill…  It was a staggering collection even to somebody who didn’t know anything about it.  I jumped when a warmth gripped my wrist, giving a soft squeeze.  I looked down to see Sava tapping on her ear.  I removed the headphones thinking there might be a problem.

            “Great, right?!”  She was just excited to know my reaction, and quite frankly I didn’t have one.

            “They’re pretty cool, probably the best headphones I’ve ever used.”

            “Yeah, but like; what did you feel, dude?”  Her emphasis on the word ‘feel’ was strange.  I felt like noise was getting pumped into my ears.

            “I dunno what you want me to say, man.  They’re sweet headphones, better than mine.  Was that a cover of Sweet Dreams are made of these?”

            “Yeah, yeah, it’s the Weezer cover.  But like…”

            “What’s up?”

            “I dunno, I mean; don’t you feel like you just get transported to a world where there’s only music?”  What a strange question.  In a way, it made sense; the headphones deprived you of being able to hear anything outside of what they poured into your ears.

            “I guess so, you really can only hear the music so I can see that.”

            “Yeah…”  She looked down at the headphones with an endearing gaze.  “I think it’s fascinating to imagine a world with only music in it.”  She turned and started tapping at the laptop again.  “Alright!  My turn, so sit down and have another drink!”  Before I could retort, she had placed the headphones on and sunk deep into the big squishy boss-man chair she had at her feeble looking ikea desk.

            Her eyes were shut tight, and she looked genuinely immersed in her little world of music.  She didn’t hum along or anything, just sat there breathing, presumably consumed in her music-world.

            I wandered about and took another look around the room.  Every time I did, I saw something new; like an I-spy book.  She had a tiny cot in the corner with a trunk on the end and some lifting weights underneath it.  It explained the muscles, at least she wasn’t a body builder or anything like that.  I looked back to her, still consumed in whatever music she had chosen.  She really did have muscles on her, her baggy tank top and shorts made that apparent enough.

            It was actually quite a bit baggy.  I wandered closer, and she sat almost completely still.  Once again, looking at Sava; I found myself asking if I was really going to do this…

            Craning my neck a bit to match the lean she placed on the chair…  A jet-black bra could be seen, with small tufts of white fur overflowing the top of it.  Her breasts looked so soft, soft like the marshmallows from a cartoon: squeezing them might provide similar elasticity, even.  I laughed a bit, knowing the headphones would stop somebody from feeling themselves get squeezed.

            God, maybe Styles was right about me…  At the very least I’m enough of a deviant to grab a peepshow of an anthro girl at the drop of a hat…  Did the rabbits from earlier count?  A pattern was forming for me, one where I turned my boner on and noticed that anthro women had the same assets my own human women had.  The differences were almost becoming fascinating.  I reflected on my date with Caitlyn, how she’d let me feel her hand for so long.  Sure, she sucked at personal space, but maybe it was also a normal thing anthros experienced: human curiosity.  I caught myself in the middle of these thoughts, still staring at the big fluffy breasts Sava had to haul around.  I don’t think she would be interested in letting me fondle them out of curiosity, but I did wonder how different her hands might be from Caitlyns.  Her feet too; where Caitlyn had a broad cloven hoof on each foot, Sava had a wide…  Paw.  Exactly like a tiger should, I guess.  I don’t know when, but she had brought one foot up and onto the chair.

            Uhhhhhhh…  No-way-no-way-no-way, don’t do it James, fuck…  I kept my gaze fixed on her face as I took a few steps forward to be in front of her.  She shifted her neck, and had to replace her tank tops lapel back onto her shoulder as it tried to fall.  Still, she hadn’t opened her eyes.  Either she really was in her own little world, or she was goading me.  Probably both, so…  Fuck it…  I leaned to the side and put my head on my shoulder.

            Hmm.  A matching black.  Don’t know what I expected, but the view here was just as nice.

            But for only a moment.  I started writing my obituary in my head when I jumped and stood straight up at the sound of something banging.  However; Sava remained in her seat, and it dawned on me that the noise had come from upstairs.  Somehow, the caveman I am tried to look through the damn floor boards to spot what it was, but this of course did not work.  Sounds of somebody walking around…  “Hey Sava…”  A loud thump, some more footsteps going deeper into the house.  “Hey Sava, I think somebody is…”  I turned to look and remembered the headphones.

            I didn’t want to interrupt her song, since she seemed so absorbed in it.  After all, it wasn’t like I was doing anything wrong by not introducing myself to whoever had arrived at the house immediately…  Even though I was doing something wrong.  I leaned over and took one last good look at her bosom, and prepared to squeeze her shoulder and tell her somebody had arrived, when through the house echoed a voice.

            “God dammit!”  It was a girl, absolutely sure of that; and she was stomping upstairs, back towards the first room.  It dawned on me that I really didn’t have a clear idea of the house’s layout, having only seen the living and entry room before going straight to Sava’s room.

            To which the door had just opened, great job James you stared at tits until it was too late.  I grabbed Sava’s shoulder and gave it a squeeze just as she had done for me earlier.  She closed her eyes even tighter and frowned, mumbling some retort.

            “Sava if you ate all the rest of the burritos I’m gonna kill you!”  Some hungry woman was stomping down the stairs screaming, Sava take the headphones off please; “I’m gonna break your stupid music box too, bitch!”  I looked to the end of the staircase as the stomping stopped, and a tiger had rounded the corner.

            She had almost started yelling again when she spotted me, stopping dead and staring at me.  I turned slowly and grabbed the arch of the headset on Sava and pulled the device straight up to remove it.

            “Aw dude, the hell?!”  She’d finally opened her eyes to look at me, and began turning the chair all the way around to better face me; when she finally realized we weren’t alone.  “Bami, when did you get home?!”  She stood up and faced who I was left assuming was her sister.

            “J-just now.”  She wasn’t the bold girl screaming shit-damn the whole way to her sister’s room.  She was also still staring straight at me; with the kind of anxiety a house cat displays when something falls in another room making a bang or shows it a pickle.

            “Bami, get out of my room!”  What a weird name.

            “Who’s that?  Mom wouldn’t like that you had a boy over…”

            “No, mom wouldn’t like if you had a boy over… again!  Get out of my room!”

            “You ate all the burritos!”

            “Moms going to the store after work, just text her!”

            “Who is that?”  You’re still looking at me, why not ask who I am if you’re gonna stare at me.

            “Bami this is my friend James; James, this is my baby sister, Bami.”

            “I’m not a baby!”  She’s indignant like one, however.  And rather short, coming up to just below my shoulder against Sava who shared my height.

            “Hi, uh, Bah-mee…”  Yeah, good job James, sound her name out all weird-like.

            “H-hi!”  I almost expected her voice to crack.  “I’m Bami!  How long have you known Sava?!”  It was almost gross how excited she was.  Did Sava not bring people by often?

            I looked towards Sava, who looked like a tired mother at the store listening to her child scream.  “We’ve been friends for, like, what?  A week now?”

            “Yeah, week exactly.”  Sava confirmed it for me.  It felt like less really.

            “And, uh, what are you guys?”

            “Oh my God Bami, shut up and get out of my room!”

            “Are you her boyfriend?”  That one caught me off guard.  I definitely wasn’t Sava’s boyfriend, but I could only really wait for Sava to answer a question like that.

            “We’re just hanging out; God stop embarrassing me...”

            “I’m still telling mom!”

            “Do it!  See if I care!”

            I need an escape while they fight.  “Sava, do you have a bathroom I could use?”

            Bami spoke up first, “Well since I’m leaving, I can show you!”  She got back on the stairs and turned to face me.  “Come on!”  Something made me not want to follow her.  I couldn’t tell if it was the death-glare Sava was shooting at her, or Bami’s own weird fascination with me.  I relented though, and followed her up the stairs.

            This was the point when I realized what was wrong.  Bami was throwing her hips from one side of the staircase to the other as she slowly went up them, one step at a time.  She looked like a stripper who forgot she was off-the-clock, and in this little hallway staircase it could only be because I was behind her.  Discomfort rose in me, yet I didn’t feel compelled to yell back down the stairs to Sava asking how old her sister was.  Instead, I decided my best interest was to watch my step on the staircase, wouldn’t want to slip and fall you know.

            The bathroom, as it turns out; was the first door at the top of the staircase.  Could have just told me kid.

            “Yeah, it’s right there!  I, uh, ha-have fun!  Wait…”  Nope.  Not waiting.  Hiding in the fucking bathroom now.  With the door closed, I could take a moment to breath and think.  My hard-on was gone at least, so there was enough blood in my brain.  I sat down on the opened toilet seat pants still on and started bouncing my leg.  That’s an old habit come back to haunt me, the old restless leg syndrome.  I hadn’t had anxiety like this since the last time I was at a girls house.

            What was wrong with me though?  I don’t remember being this much of a creep.  I just sat in a girls room and looked at her like meat at a butcher shop.  Sava was cool, in a one-of-the-guys kind of way.  Her body appealed to me, without a doubt there was that; even if the muscles were a bit off-putting.

            After standing up and forcing myself to take the world record shortest piss, I went to wash my hands.  It really was only girls living here, there were four pump bottle that might have been handsoap and all had flowers and fruit on the labels.  Fuck it, just pick one and get some.  Lather and rinse, but then there’s no more reason to hide in the bathroom anymore.

            I stood up strait and looked in the mirror.  At least I wasn’t sweating like a pig or something, in fact there was a nice cool to the entire house.  I spotted the shower behind me, and spun to see it.  It was littered with a rainbow of bottles, and had towels and bras hanging off it.

            Damn bitch, you live like this?  I guess there are three women here, sharing one bathroom.  God, sharing a bathroom with Jade was hell; there was a time when I had almost forgot what color the countertop was.  But it was time to face the music again, cause Sava would probably have another song to show me.  I was actually looking forward to it, maybe the definitely overpriced headphones were an acquired fetish.

            I swung the door wide, noticing for the first time how good everything smelled.  Bami was in the kitchen staring at the microwave until she spotted me.

            “Hey!   Hey James?”  Oh God please no.

            “Yeah, hey, what’s up?”

            “So, like; are you Sava’s boyfriend or…?”

            “I don’t think we’re like that right now, this is really the first time we really hung out.”

            “Where did you meet her?  She’s kinda like, never goes out.”  Stop interrupting your own sentences with the word ‘like’, it’s like, really annoying.

            “We met at a speed dating thing.”

            “So you guys are dating?”

            “I don’t think so, we just hit it off cause neither of us wanted to be there.”

            “That sounds like her!”  She rotated left and right as she laughed about the thought.  “But, you’re not like her boyfriend or anything.  That’s cool you guys are friends!”  You’re weirdly fixated on the boyfriend thing, like you think us not fucking means I’m gonna ask you out any second now.  I don’t like it!  Don’t like it!

            “Yeah, your sisters pretty cool; kinda surprising she doesn’t have a boyfriend.”  Let’s just subliminally put you in a social standing beneath her.

            “As if!  She sucks!  She just works out, does homework and listens to music all day, she’d ignore any guy who dated her over some tunes.  She’s such a loser!”  Holy shit fucking chill.

            “I dunno, I think she’s pretty cool; and those headphones are dope”

            “Yeah but, like, you gotta spend time with a boyfriend.”  Good God you are worse than Caitlyn with the constant girl-talk…  I’m experiencing an aneurism, I swear.  “You’ve had a girlfriend before, right?”

            Three, actually; but only one still haunts me. “Yeah, she was controlling and clingy; and once I finally got her to stop, she tried to get me arrested.”

            “Oh.  Shit, I’m sorry.”

            “It’s fine, not your fault.  It’s just, sometimes having some time alone is.  Like.  Better.”  There!  See that pause young child?  See how annoying that pause is?

            “Yeah, I guess.”

            “Hey, I’m gonna get back to Sava now; have a good-un.”

            “Yeah, hey, have fun!”

            “You too!”  Close the door, slide down the stairs; a clean getaway.

            When I got back downstairs, Sava was back on the sofa, drawing a circle around her ear with her finger.  It was strange to see, she was clearly stressed.  “Your sister seems…”

            “God don’t say nice, she’s such a little shit.”

            “Your ear itch?”

            “Nah, just stress.”

            “Your sister isn’t that bad.”

            “Dude, she jumped you when you got out of the bathroom.  She’s always like this, boyfriends boyfriends boyfriends!  Ugh!”

            "You go through boyfriends a lot?”

            “God no, you’re the third guy that’s ever seen my house and room.  She just can’t get boys out of her head, and she probably…  Nevermind.”

            I sat down across from her on the opposite end of the couch.  “Nah, what is it?  Get it off your head.”

            “She probably wants you…  Cause you’re human and…  In front of her, I guess.”

            “Wait, whaaaaat?  Your sister like me?  Nuh-uuuh!”

            “Shut up!”  She gave my shoulder a shove and finally gave a laugh.  “God, what did she say when you got out of the can?”

            “Asked if, like, we were like, dating, but like, in three different ways.”

            “Oh God, stop!”  More laughter.  This was great, there’s a joy in bringing people out of the ditch they find themselves in.

            “She’s alright.  Probably just that age, yeah?”

            “When I was ‘just that age’, I was trying to learn guitar.  When she was her age, my mom came home and maced a shirtless human guy, and called the cops.”

            “Damn, the cops even?”

            “It was last year, Bami was…  barely seventeen.”

            “Oh!  Oh yeah, that’s bad.”

            “Yeah, he said she lied about her age.”

            “Did she?  You think?”

            “Doesn’t matter, she knew better either way.  I’m not gonna play lesser-of-two-evils over that shit.”  She cracked open another can of soda.  “Takes two to tango.”

            “Fair enough, I guess.  Sorry.”

            “Your mom maced him though?  I’m imaging some big scary tigress now, especially since you said I might meet her.”

            “Oh no, dude, my mom’s shorter than me and is good-girly.”

            “What’s ‘good-girly’, dare I ask?”

            “You know my sister?  That’s bad-girly.  Hundreds of internet friends, gets all her opinions from tweeter, boys boys boys.  Hate it.”  She turned to face me, and sat indian-style.  “Good-girly is like my mom.  Takes care of herself.  Cleans.  Thinks for herself, and doesn’t let men fuck around with her.”

            “Sounds like a wonderful woman.”

            “Yeah dude?  You into that housewife theme?”  She laughed and took another drink.

            “I dunno.  My ex claimed to be ‘wifey’ but was just crazy and shit.”

            “Bleh.  Reminds me of my sister, she almost got some trash song stuck in my head.  ’Girls ain’t what they call theyself’ or something like that.  Hate that trash from the radio.”

            “Bad-girly then.”

            “You’re getting’ it.”  I thought back to Caitlyn.  I wondered if Caitlyn counted as bad-girly.

            “I kinda want you to meet that girl, Caitlyn; and see what you think of her.”

            “Pfft, dude why?”

            “Cause she took me for a ride in my head.  I had her pinned as one thing, and then she flipped around and was another.  She was actually really chill.”

            “Guys don’t normally tell me they want me to judge the chicks they date.  Kinda weird dude.”

            “I guess I just want to see the popular girl fight the tomgirl.”

            “Oh?  We’re fighting each other now?!  Does she know I’m gonna show up and start swinging?”  Sava bent an arm and flexed it.  There was a lot of definition to it, and I wondered if it was the fur adding fluff to her size.

            We shared a laugh for a moment, and Sava went for the last of the soda in the can again.  Like a compulsive child, my eyes drifted down once more, and caught another glimpse of downstairs.  Small tufts of white fur rolled over the ends of her panties, and I wondered if it was ever uncomfortable wearing underwear, pinched and pulled fur.

            “So yeah, me and her meeting huh?”

            “Nah, just, it’d be a weird combo.  I dunno, I’ll zip it.”

            “It’s all good bro.  Hey, speaking of fights, you wanna see where that guy that got maced hit his head?”

            "Wait what?  Yes.”  I would do fucking anything if it meant not sitting here festering in my crimes.  Sava got up and guided me back up the stairs, where I elected to go first.  We went past Bami, watching TV in the living room; and up the stairs, to which Bami took exception.

            “Sava, where are you going?”  But Sava marched on, and I simply followed.  The upstairs was mostly a small hall, one with only three doors on it, and ended in a small space with a few chairs and a coffee table.  Sava walked to the closest door, and with a small clack tapped on it with her claw.  Upon closer inspection, there was a crack in the trim and a small bent-in region before it.  Bami had made it up the stairs by now.  “Did James wanna see my room or something?”  My gut sank.  I had a feeling something bad was coming.  She reached the top and had turned to see Sava’s finger still on the door jam.  “Oh, fuck off Sava!”  She started stomping down the stairs.  “God you are such a bitch, like you never did something stupid!”

            Sava, however, chose to giggle maniacally.  “You weren’t trying to piss her off, were you?”

            “Nah dude!  S’still funny though!”

            “Remember when you crashed the car!  Remember that!  You were gonna go see a boy!”

            “I shoulda waited for her to be gone!  But yeah, he came running out blind and ran face first into the bathroom door!  My mom told me about it.”

            Bami screamed “God damnit!” one last time before finishing going down the staircase.

            “Gnarly.”  Was all I could think to say.

            “I gotta pee no, that was good!”  Sava retreated into the bathroom, and I didn’t feel like waiting outside like             a puppy.  I chose to head downstairs, and maybe try to make Bami aware I didn’t think terribly of her.

            She was on the couch on her phone when she looked up at me.  “You got a sister?”

            “No.  No, I’m an only child.”

            “Lucky.”

            “I dunno about that, I always wanted a brother.”

            “I’d kill for a brother.  Anything would be better.”

            “Eh.  You might be surprised.  Your guy’s sibling rivalry isn’t the worst I’ve seen.”

            “You’ve had a real girlfriend, even she was like, awful.”  She dropped her phone and turned on the couch.  “Isn’t it normal to just…  I dunno, like, want other people.”  Her large emphasis on the word ‘want’ left me with an uncomfortable vision.  “You still want a girlfriend, right?”  Don’t ask me that.  That’s a loaded question.

            “I think everyone wants somebody else, but I think we can ruin it all by trying to hard.”

            She sighed.  “You sound like my mom.”

            “Your mom seems pretty bad ass, not gonna lie.  Sava didn’t tell me much though.”

            “Our mom gets a lot of sideways looks.  She cares a lot, but like, she’s different.”

            “Different how?”

            “She’s ugly.”  Damn.  About your own mother too, what the fuck?  “It’s not like her fault or anything, she was born…  White.”

            “People can’t choose their race…”  Wait.  Race.  White.  Tiger.  What?

            “She’s white all over.  I might have left that out…”  I spun around, Sava had reached the bottom of the stairs, and looked concerned.  “Bami, I wasn’t making fun of you, I just told James the story and-”

            “Whatever.  Go wreck the other car.”

            Sava’s turn to sigh.  “Like she said, our mom is all-white.  It’s not exactly a desired trait…”

            “Maybe I don’t get it.  What’s undesirable about a fur color?”

            Bami looked up.  “Don’t humans not like certain skin color sometimes?”  Again, with the loaded questions that I’d get arrested for answering…  “It kinda like that, I guess.  Moms all white, so guys don’t really give her a look.”

            “I think you guys are proof that’s not-”

            Sava stopped me.  “They had an arranged marriage.  Our grandparents were afraid she’d be alone forever with no one to take care of her, so they found somebody who would marry her.”  She looked upset.  I’d dug too deep into a sensitive subject, but on the other hand; I would have found out eventually.

                Yet before I could thank them for telling me anything about the topic, the front door opened wide, and revealed a hooded figure.  A white tail came out from behind, confirming to me that this was Sava’s mother.  After closing the door, the woman turned toward the crowd we had gathered around the couch.  She reached up with two clawed hands and grabbed the thin hood, or rather veil; by its sides to pull it down, and place it onto the rack by the door.

            Oh my fucking God.  She really was white.  White like a snowy-tiger, except even whiter.  Her stripes had to be searched for, they were so pallid they blended in with the rest of her.  They weren’t lying, there mom wasn’t just all-white…  She was an albino.  No doubt about it.

            A pair of cold light blue eyes stared back at me, a far cry from Sava and Bami’s amber eyes; the same ones most anthros had.  She looked equally curious at my presence; a warm motherly smile aimed at me.  “Hello there James, I’m the girls’ mother; Aparajita!”  She was…  Stunning…

            “Hi, I’m James…  Apurr…”  Dude you already got introduced what the fuck?

            She shook her shoulders a bit with laughter, and set her purse down on the sofa.  “So I’ve heard!  It’s ‘Ah-Pra-Jee-Tah’, though ‘Ah-purrrrrrr’ seems fitting for a cat, huh?”  She had sounded it out with an actual deep and rumbling purr, that I could feel in my bones.  “You can call me Mrs. Flowers, that might be easier.”  Sava’s last name is ‘Flowers’?

            “Aparajita isn’t too hard, just never heard a name like that before.”  God she’s a whole lot of woman.  She was right in the middle of Sava and Bami, maybe up to my shoulder; but her fur was at least twice as long, huge and fluffy.  She was a little big, but it favored her, and…  The bras in the shower were definitely Sava’s.  They’d be too small on Aparajita…

            “Sava?”

            “Yeah mum?”

            “I was already on my way back when Bami texted me…”

            “Aw mom come on!”

            “No buts, Sava, they were actually hers this time.”  She pointed at Sava with a dark black claw.  “You two go to the store instead and what you need, and replace her snacks.  I’ve been out too long today.”

            “Ah!  No no no.”  We froze.  The same claw emerged and shifted pointing at Bami and Sava.  “You two.”  She turned her cool blue eyes to me.  “You stay and chat for a minute, unless you absolutely need to run?”

            “I’m not in a hurry.  I’d like to meet you, as well; so…”

            “Perfect.”  Sava reached into a drawer in the vanity against the staircase, producing a pair of keys.

            “Bami and I will be back fast, so don’t go anywhere.”  Bami hmphed loudly as she got up, and I waved to Sava as she and her sister went out.  She waved back, but was looking at her mom instead of me, moving her ears around.  Oh no.  Secret signals, her mom knows I’m a peeping tom, this is how I die: local man mauled to death by MILF tiger.

            I turned around to face my sexy doom…  But she was gone.  “Kitchen!”  Came the voice of an angel.

            I rounded the corner and found the stark white tigress there.  “You look thin, James.”  We all can’t be built like a goddess of fertility ma’am, I’m sorry to inform you.  “I bet, you’d like a piece of cake to eat!”  I want to use your cake as a pillow ma’am.  Jesus junked up Christ James, get ahold of yourself.

            “Oh, I’m fine; you don’t have to give me anything”

            “Oh no, sweety you’re going to earn it!”  You don’t have to reward me, I will do anything you ask- James Stop!  It’s your friends mom!  Your new friends big thick albino mom who looks really soft…  And is holding normal cake, which is less exciting.

            “I’m glad to help.”

            “I have to get out of the sun, I’ve been out too long.  Could you be my big strong man and bring in the groceries I bought?”  I know you’re saying big strong man like you’re patronizing a child, and that’s why I’m gonna bring them all in one trip so you know I’m actually big, actually strong, and actually a man.

            “Sure, Mrs. is your car unlocked?”  I’m more than glad to help, in all honestly.

            “Sure is, thank you kindly.”  I marched to the front door and headed out to the drive.

 

            In the end, I was forced to take two trips.  She bought water and soda, and thusly defeated me.

            “Thanks so much dear.”  She extended a hand with a plate with cake on it to me.  Upon first bite, she spoke again;             “So.  Sava she met a ‘cool dude’ and I think…  Here you are?”

            “Mmm.  Yeah, we met at a thing, sorta.”

            “A…  Speed dating thing?”

            “Yeah…  I didn’t wanna go, but ended up meeting some cool anthros.  People.  Girls.”  Just faceplant already James, you fuck up.

            “Right.  I didn’t think I’d meet you this soon…  So, you met lots of girls there?”

            “Not particularly.  Well, I spoke to a lot; but only ended up continuing talking with about five of them.”

            “Dating five girls at once must be hard…”

            I about choked on my cake.  “Oh no!  I’ve only gone on one date, and then today hanging out with Sava…”

            “You’re dating somebody who’s not my daughter?”

            “I…  Went on a date on accident.  And then, today me and Sava were gonna hang out, she showed me her music.  Stuff.”  I don’t think I could look worse even if I’d showed up with facial tattoo’s and baggy pants, blasting rap music from my phone.

            “On…  Accident?”  She laughed at me.  And God if I didn’t secretly like it.

            “Yeah, I got a bunch of age-old pictures liked, and then went to an arcade…  With a gazelle…”

            “James, I’ll be honest, you seem like an unfortunately interesting person.”  She was still chuckling.  I liked her motherly smile, and her motherly laugh.

            “I would rather not be.  I hope you don’t think I suck or anything…”

            “No, I don’t think you… ‘suck’.  You just…  Don’t seem to have come here intentionally.”

            “Yeah, I did just kinda end up where I am right now, that’s one way of putting it.”

            “Don’t take me wrong.  It makes me glad.”  She turned and went to the refrigerator.  “If you had come here under any other circumstances, I might question your morals...”

            “Ah…”  That was true.  Having to defend your daughters childhood against a human man might actually be a traumatizing event.  “Sava told me about another human guy who’d been here.”

            “Oh.  Did she?”  Aparajita didn’t seem too concerned about the story.  Rather, relieved I already knew it.  “She must trust you quite a bit.  She brought you home and let you in on our dysfunctional little family.”

            “I think you did the right thing, calling the cops and peppering him; if that means anything.”

            “It’s nice to hear it.”  She still had such a wholesome and warm aura.  She really was just a big mommy.

            “And, I don’t think you’re too dysfunctional.  Could be worse.”

            “That’s very true.  Well James, I like that I got to talk to you like this; I hope you weren’t scared of meeting me.”  The thought terrified me, actually.

            “No, your daughters assured me you were great.”

            “Did they tell you anything else about me?”  They lied to my ass and said you were anything other than the sexiest woman alive.

            “Uhhh…  Not…  really?”

            “You say that like a question?”  She had turned to put away a roll of tin foil from the bags, and I skipped my eyes down and stole a glance, but in a split second her head already whipped around and looked straight at me.  “I don’t think that’s very appropriate.”  Her eyes were blue, but spelled fire.

            Play it cool James, play it cool.  “What?  Oh!  No, I swear, ma’am I thought I saw a necklace, I was trying to get a better look at it, I swear!”

            Aparajita was still frowning, but reached up with her hand, and traced her claw through the thick fur upon her neck.  No fucking way, God do I owe you one?  She withdrew it with a thin silver chain hooked on the claw.  “That is a sharp eye…  I forgot I even had this on, I might have taken in the shower and gotten it caught.”  She ran her fingers to the back and removed the chain, pocketing it.

            The front door sounded it opening in the other room, and when Aparajita turned towards I took the chance to swallow the multiple frogs in my throat.

            “Girls, kitchen!”  Aparajita called out.  Bami and Sava strolled into the room, their claws making clacking noises on the tile.  Still strange being a house of women with no shoes, and reminded me of my desire to see Sava’s feet…  Oh God no, I’m turning into an internet weirdo.  I need to get out of the tigers’ den, I need to contemplate my decisions to make myself obvious checking out girls.

            Dread washed over me as Aparajita gave instructions to Sava and Bami on where to put groceries away, and I stared at what remained of my slice of cake.  I really was just some nasty pervert.  Haven’t had sex since Jade, and Jade made me swear I’d never go near a vagina again.  And the first thing I do when I meet a nice girl?  Stare down her shirt.  Then I went and tried to look down her mom’s shirt.  I was a real fucking prick today, no buts about it.

            I teared up for a second in my self-pity.  I really wished one of them would slap me: claws and all.

================================================================================
Chapter 5: Mysterious Senor James
Summary:

    Double the trauma double the disappointment.

Chapter Text

            I looked around my room. It felt small, and made my head hurt. Thoughts of yesterday came flooding back now and then until I shunned them again. The only word I had muttered since I woke up had been “God Dammit” and I just really couldn’t do shit.

            My phone had beeped and buzzed here and there. I didn’t want to look at it. I didn’t know what was worse; the fact that I was a creep or the fact that in the end I was one of those fetishists going after anthros. Roll me over, tuck me in; let me have the big sleep. Things didn’t used to be like this, my life was quiet and I got to live day by day; paycheck to paycheck. A few more raises and I’d be lubing myself up to get butt fucked at the bank with a mortgage.

            Now I had tigers running around in my head, and couldn’t stop thinking about touching grass… Or touching fur, even. I’d never felt Sava, save for her hand-pads pushing me and high-fiving me. But what did she feel like? It was her mom that I really wanted to touch. Her fur was so long, and looked like the softest thing in the whole wide world.

            I finally sat up on my bed and slid pants on. The heat was only getting worse day after day, I couldn’t even sleep with the sheets on top of me anymore. Trouble was, I wanted to clear my head, and by God I was going out to get some air. I’d been on the computer and in buildings for too long.

            I got out the front door, and was greeted by a wave of air that ought to have set me on fire. However, there was a park nearby, and I was going to walk to it and breath air from trees.

            I trudged through the muggy heat down the sidewalk. The bus stop was empty, even on a Sunday. Gas station was full though, God I could get a bottle of water but standing in the line would be hell… Screw it though; I marched into the gas station.

 

            I finally made it to the park. It had been further than I thought, about twice as far actually. There wasn’t many people there, just me and the geese on the river. It was nice and serene; almost like being in real nature, if not for the sounds of cars passing in the distance. It was still hot, and I’d already drank most of one of my water bottles. I went along the winding sidewalk through the park until I came upon a bench.

            For an old piece of plastic coated metal, it was comfortable. I sat with my water next to me, and leaned my head back with my eyes closed. I wanted to text Sava. I wanted to text Caitlyn. I wanted to see one of them again, and at the same time I had no reason to do so. What would I even say? Hey! Sorry I’m a weirdo around you, wanna hang out again? Yeah that’ll do it James.

            God just let me burn up here in the sun. It felt good though, even if the heat was high the warmth of the light showering me was great. I wallowed in it until I thought I might be falling asleep.

            “You!” Somebody in the distance, yelling; a voice from the other side? “Hey creep!” Oh no… The angels; they know what I’m like! I turned my head up from the back of the bench and in my blurred vision saw two figures. They looked more familiar as my eyes adjusted and they got close- oh fuck it’s two rabbits.

            I sat frozen on the bench as they grew closer and closer. One had a look of surprise and curiosity on her face, but the other looked like she might actually kill me. I was sun-stunned and couldn’t move.

            “What’s your damage, huh?” Nobody says that anymore, do not say that.

            “Whaddya mean?” The best part about playing dumb, is it’s even easier when you’re actually dumb.

            “You come here to creep on girls like you do in your car?”

            “You know what? I don’t need this shit.”

            “Bullshit, you’re a creep and I’ve got half a mind to scream it out right now!”

            “I know all right!” The both looked taken aback. It wasn’t that surprising was it? What was your intention for confronting me? That I would sit here and deny it for eternity? “Two weeks ago I went on my first ever date with an anthro, and ever since then I started actually noticing…” I gestured to the little bottle of anger in front of me; “That you’re… I dunno, girls I guess. It’s all really fucking weird for me, okay? I’m sorry I checked you out, but… My defense is gonna be I’m going through a weird phase.”

            “And we just got caught in the crossfire?” Her friend had spoken up this time.

            “Yeah. I’m sorry. I feel like somethings wrong with me lately, but nobody should have to suffer that.” I just wanted to rest for a minute. Leave me alone.

            “Probably not something wrong with you-”

            “No he’s a pervert don’t defend him!”

            I sighed. “I just want to sit for a minute, then I’ll head home; is that okay?”

            “You’re in our spot.” That perked me right up.

            “Excuse me?”

            “You’re in our spot. We rest here everyday. Gonna pretend you didn’t know that?”

            “I actually didn’t. I just wanted to walk to the park to clear my head, honestly.” I grabbed my plastic sack, and started standing up.

            “Hey, you don’t have to leave…”

            “Yes he does.” Your abrasive attitude is making me want to stay, bitch.

            “If you don’t learn to catch your breath standing, you’re never gonna get real improvement.” That might be true. She was still panting, even after all the time spent talking; and she definitely didn’t want to sit down next to me.

            “I just need some water or something...”

            “Water won’t fix it, you need the burn to get the stamina.”

            “I’m gonna die, alright slave driver?” She looked like she was genuinely about to fall over, now that I looked at her. But then a thought occurred to me. A dastardly, devious, selfish thought that I liked very much...

            “I’ll trade you a bottle for something weird.”

            “Ew, piss off!”

            “No seriously. It’s not even bad.” I pulled the bottle out of the bag, and saw water droplets condensing on the outside of the bottle.

            She looked at it for a moment, before turning. “Whatever, get awa-”

            “I just want to feel your fur!” They both went completely still. Staring at each other, ears standing straight up. “I’ve never actually… Felt… Any anthros. Ever. Not even on the times I went on dates.”

            “What a shit excuse to get handsy, asshole.”

            “I’ll let you pick where, too.” She alternated glaring at the bottle and myself, giving each the same look of disdain. Her friends eyes were half closed with a smug smile on her face. She pulled out her phone and started texting when the angry bunny looked at her.

            “Give me the bottle.” I relented and held it out to her. Worst case scenario she ran off with a bottle of water. Best case scenario- oh shit she is chugging that thing.

            “You owe him now Stacy.” Oh God people don’t actually name their kids that, do they?

            Stacy lowered the bottle and looked at the ground. “Yeah, yeah…” She turned to me, holding out the empty bottle. I took it and waited to get told I had just given away free water. Instead she stepped closer, still not looking at me.

            Her friend suddenly piped up. “He can touch the back of your neck right?”

            Stacy gave a sigh and laid down her ears, before turning around. “You can touch the back of my neck- No higher! And No lower!”

            “Sure thing.” Her friend was just smiling big and tapping on her phone. My gut told me something was up, but my curiosity got the better of me. I reached up with one hand, and brushed on the fur like I was petting her. Her friend moved over to stand to the side of the both of us, watching my hands.

            “No, get your fingers in there!” That was… Surprising? Stacy didn’t say anything, just sat there with her ears low. It was kind of satisfying, the way she felt. Soft and slightly puffy, just like… Well, a rabbit.

            A bit anti climactic.

            I took the more chipper friends advice, and began running my fingers into her neck in a rhythmic scratching motion. Stacy’s ears twitched, and her shoulders lowered deeply. It was like when a cat trusted you to pet it. It was fun, knowing she enjoyed it.

            Her friend had reached out with her hand, and pointed with her thumb at the base of Stacy’s skull… I kept going with my fingers and massaged the top of her neck with my thumbs. Her friend stepped back very suddenly, and started tapping on her phone again.

            I looked back and down at Stacy. Her tail was flitting about and she was holding her arms up, placing her hands by her shoulders. What the hell? Was I doing something… inappropriate? Some weird rabbit courtship ritual, right here in the middle of the park? Trouser serpent made his first move, but was quickly put to rest.

            “Stop… You need to stop…”

            “Alright I… Uh…” Her hands had come up and grabbed my wrists, but she wasn’t pulling them away. She was just holding onto them, as if she wanted to hold them in position. She rolled her head back, and exposed to me what her face looked like when she didn’t have her permabitch glare.

            “Sssstop…” She stared into my soul with her big green eyes. I had already stopped running my fingers through her thick neck fur. She was breathing heavy for a moment, but rebounded quick.

            “I can’t. You’re… Holding my wrists.” She maintained eye contact for what felt like a solid minute before she looked to the side at her hand as she finally released me. I tried to look away as well but couldn’t. I pulled my hands back and didn’t know what I was supposed to do with them, standing with them straight down my sides. She put her ears back up and shook her head violently, a soft flappy-clapping sound emanating as her ears collided.

            “No. No, delete that! Amy!” She had started marching towards her friend, pointing at her. I got a look as well, and realized the danger: Amy was holding her phone out with her hands on the side and bottom; clearly taking a picture or worse yet a recording.

            “Please, miss, actually delete that…” My words fell on the worlds largest deaf ears. She was playing keep-away with her phone and friend. I tried to use my height as an advantage and grabbed for it when she held it high. Ultimately, my greatest mistake was this. In a single blur of brown and white, Amy had launched herself into the air, and landed like a miniature fluffy spandex ninja onto my shoulder. She was certainly heavier than I anticipated, and I wobbled while the still enraged Stacy clawed at my front hopping up and trying to snatch at her.

            “Why does a rabbit even have claws!” I yelped at her advances, feeling the burn where she tried to climb me like a tree. She stepped back, staring down Amy on top of me; before she herself lunged at mach-4, and collided with my head. As much of a man as I might be, I cannot catch a sack of flower with my face; and went tumbling down underneath the bunnies.

            There, on the ground; the two small women untied themselves while I lay still. God I hope my neck is broken, that would be an amazing reason to get time off work.

            “Stacy you could have killed him!” Why didn’t you?

            “He’s, like, eight times my size!” I’m not even twice your height…

            “Hey, are you alright?” A soft pad pushed into my neck. Stacy had gotten up and off me as soon as she could, but Amy remained on top of me, it seemed. She was heavier than she looked, and sitting on my stomach.

            “I’m fine, I think.” No need to check my pulse. “I just… Want my life to go back to how it was. This whole situation could have been avoided if I’d have just not gone speed-dating with my idiot friend.”

            “Speed dating is fucking stupid.”

            “Why go speed dating?” Two kinds of bunny.

            “I complained I was single at a new years party, and made it my resolution to have a girlfriend. I think I was jealous of my friend, Styles. And, kinda hurt cause my last relationship… Look, nevermind.”

            “Hey, no; talk to us.”

            “He can talk to you, I don’t care.”

            “Fine, then talk to me big guy.” Her faking that she cared was charming.

            “It’s fine.” I started getting up. “I just want to go home. Sorry about the touching.”

            “Alright, well… Have a good one.”

            “Thanks, you too.” I started walking up the winding path that had brought me down to the park. I was back and up to the main road in almost no time. Cars zipped by, and my legs pumped onward. I thought for a moment about going back to the park, trying to talk to them; but I couldn’t find a reason it was worth it. Maybe all I really wanted was for them to dog pile on me again…

            I turned around to look back on the park, however; and found that I was being followed. Amy and Stacy weren’t far behind me, bearing their standard facial expressions; which at this point seemed almost iconic to their identity. I shook it off, and kept on walking.

            And as time went on, my paranoia set in very strongly. I can hear their footsteps now, soft pads with tiny claws hitting the cement in between my own lumbering steps. I stopped dead in the sidewalk, and heard them stop too. I turned to face them, and Amy was now a smug as a cat pushing cups off the counter, whereas Stacy had maxed out her resting bitch face.

            There was no good way to handle this situation. “I live at the blue apartment complex up by the highway.”

            Amy’s face lit up like a kid on Christmas morning. “No way!”

            “Oh my God…”

            “Hi neighbor!” Amy yelled loudly as I turned away and started marching faster towards my home. This was the worst day in the world. I do not want to live next to ditzy-doe and her angry girlfriend.

            I got to my block, and found that Stacy was still following me; but without Amy in sight.

            “You mind not following me home?”

            Stacy wouldn’t have it. “Let’s see you open your apartment. Key to it and all.”

            “Are you gonna show me where you live after? Kinda seems like you’re the stalker here.”

            “Quit with the excuses, let’s see it.”

            I rolled my eyes and walked up the stairs all the way to the third floor, her still coming up behind me. Pulled out my keys and unlocked the door, swinging it wide. I turned to face her and performed a sweeping motion with my hands. “Ta-daaaaaaaaa! What, you want to come inside and have my roommate let you know I’ve lived here for almost two years?”

            She looked at the doorway for a second before walking up and stepping into my apartment. She stood just past the door, and I stepped in behind her. She was looking at the TV

            Mike knocked his headset off for a moment. “Uh. Sup. James. And… Uh.”

            “God, what a loser.” Thank you, Stacy; I was going to introduce you as the huge bitch from the park, but now I can just say we met at the park.

            Mike spent a moment nodding with wide and almost scared eyes on top of tightly compressed lips. “She’s charming bro, third girlfriend now?”

            “Ew.”

            “This is Stacy. She didn’t believe I lived here, so I proved it.”

            “Sup. Stacy.” Mike pulled his headset back on and went back to whatever flavor of the month shooter he was binging.

            “Your roommates a loser.”

            “He can’t hear you.”

            “Whatever.” She walked past me and back out onto the landing. She’d taken the first step down the stairs when she stopped. “Look. I’m sorry for… Jumping to conclusions. It’s just…”

            “If I was a small and cute girl I’d have a lot of personal safety concerns too, I imagine.”

            “Don’t call me cute!” She gave her frown to me for the umpteenth time. I was never gonna get that face out of my mind.

            “I’m sorry for creeping on you. I’m gonna take all this, and work on not… Doing that stuff.”

            “I said to not call me cute!”

            “Well, you’re cute. Deal with It.”

            “I don’t like being called cute.” You are barely up to the bottom of my chest. What the fuck am I supposed to call you? “Why do guys always have to call me cute?”

            “Fine, you’re not cute, but I’m not calling you ugly and you’re gonna be more upset if I call you sexy, so what then?” I threw my hands up in a faux gesture of being held at gunpoint. “Did you need anything else then? I’ve apologized and given you my address, is there something else you want?”

            Her ears lopped down to the sides, and her eyes went wide. She looked like she was about to apologize again, but just played with her own fingers for a moment. In the end she only looked up and said “Building D, we… We’re three-o-seven. She whirled and started marching down the stairs, to which I closed the front door, locking it.

            Mike flopped down his headset once again. “Bro what. The. Fuck.”

            “I don’t fucking know dude, they saw me at the park, accused me of being a pig and checking them out, and when I tried to walk home; she thought I was stalking her cause she lives here too! So I showed her where I live and that I can unlock the door, so she knows I’m not lying!” I collapsed onto the opposite side of the couch, where Mike hadn’t developed an imprint from gaming. “Sorry for that. I...”

            “Dude, I’m really starting to miss the version of you that didn’t even talk to anthro girls. This is getting shitty fast.” He shoved some cheap taco into his mouth while trying to find cover in the game. He had a point though; things were never complicated with Kyle, and it was obvious that the reason was because Kyle was a guy.

            But with all the girls I had been running into lately, it was different. They wanted things out of me. They wanted me to give up my weekends and entertain them at the arcade. They wanted me to understand some made up music world.

            I needed a catharsis, I was stressing out and thinking about it all too much. But more importantly, I needed to do something with my day that meant I did something more interesting than go to the park and almost get the cops called on me.

            I stared at Mikes game as he wobbled around the battlefield with his gun swaying dramatically. He would swing his gun up in a split second and shoot at anything that moved until it got him headshot by somebody with an anime skin on his rifle in the kill cam. What a fucking drag.

            “Mike, Imma microwave a burrito you want one?”

            “Dude nah, but make those tamales in the freezer instead: gotta get rid of ‘em.”

            “Good call.” They might not be good, but at least they weren’t bad.

 

            I sat in front of the computer once more, the artificial light slowly burning away at my retinas. Fakebook cleaning time had cometh. I logged in and was greeted by the standard, or rather the new standard; series of bullshit things spamming me. I elected to actually scroll down the timeline for once. Big mistake: the far-right dog-girl was trying to update everyone's collection of cringy boomer gadsden pictures. An angry skeleton with a smoking revolver informed me that ‘these colors don’t run they reload’ and Jesus Christ are you people real? Isn’t it illegal to share that shit unless you’re over forty? I clicked to her profile and unfriended my first anthro.

            Should have been a healing moment, but instead I felt nothing. I’d lost nothing and gained nothing. Never even really spoke to her. That was fine too, I didn’t need to. I didn’t want to.

            Unfriend. Unfriend. Unfriend. That’s better, the world is healing back to its original state. Who else? Caitlyn. I could unfriend Caitlyn, that might be the best step to take. I’d no longer get the constant updates to her life though; a tragedy to be certain. Better click on her profile: let’s find out what she had for lunch today. A salad. How exciting.

            I hovered over the button to unfriend her. The others had been easy, but here; I hesitated. I couldn’t figure out why for the life of me I did though. Instead I eyed the message button. Would she even respond? Dumb question, James; she’d probably respond immediately.

            Fuck it. ‘How’ve you been?’ can’t hurt. What’s she going to do? Trick you into another date?

            ‘Bored.’ heh, classic. ‘HBU?’

            ‘Got arrested by the pervert police.’

            ‘LOL u would.’ Don’t sell me so short, come on. ‘WTF happen?’ God dammit why did I do this to myself?

            ‘Rabbit thought I was checking her out.’

            ‘Were U?’

            Yes I was. ‘Not really.’

            ‘Bnny have a bad attitude abt human guys cause the stereotype.’ yeah, the one where they are sex crazed maniacs; which is obviously untrue after spending ten minutes with any rabbit.

            ‘Yeah?’

            ‘She prly jumped to conclusions.’

            ‘Hah. “jumped.”’ Too easy.

            ‘OMG shut up!’ No, it was too easy. ‘What r u doin?’ Oh no. I’ve fallen for this once before.

            ‘Gonna go to the bookstore maybe.’ It’s perfect. It’s a pseudo library, so we’re expected to not talk and not spend a lot of time either.

            ‘Bored enough 4 company?’ I have a noise ordinance and I must scream.

            ‘It’ll be boring.’

            ‘Probably.’ Then why do you want to come? ‘I’ll come B bored with U.’

            I just stared at the screen. I went over the recent messages again. Did I do something to provoke this reaction? What was signaling her that I wanted to spend time with her? It was like she was in some opposite world where saying I’m going to be boring and quiet at the bookstore was an invitation to come hang out…

            I recalled the thought of myself fleeing from interacting with… People… With… Women. Anthros were still women. I’d accepted that much, at this point. Fine then, so be it.

            ‘K come hang out.’ This was retarded. But… It was better than staying home being ass-mad about having rabbits for neighbors.

            ‘Come pick me up.’ She dropped a pin. Fine fuck you then, shit! Date the deer two: electric boogaloo! I grabbed my keys and stood erect.

 

            The pin had dragged me to the next city over, to another apartment complex. I sat parked out front, not entering the parking area for tenents, and texted Caitlyn some time ago. I saw her with a different, yet equally tiny purse.

            I hit the unlock button on the door, and in she slid.

            “Hey Gameboy!”

            “Hey Caitlyn, you-” I started coughing, Jesus what is that?

            “Ah, sorry; I was at Crystals place, she burns incense a lot.”

            “She burn the whole box at once?” I rolled down my window. “Sorry, but damn.”

            “Quite a nose you’ve got.”

            “You might just be used to it?”

            “Probs babe.” There’s something weird about you calling me babe.

            “Bookstore we go.” I threw the thing in drive and moved back out onto the road.

            “Whaddyou read?”

            “Usually technical stuff, metallurgy books help me with my work.”

            “Lame, you mean like college books?”

            “I mean, I read to learn.”

            “Yeah but it doesn’t have to be college books, I hated those. My stepdad has old TV repair books, I opened one once and thought I got dumber.” Bitch I bet you did.

            “Like cathode sets?”

            “I dunno, the big fat ones.”

            “That’s a cathode ray tube, a CRT TV.”

            “Yeah, that’s it.”

            “Those are hard to fix. He does that for a living?”

            “No, he has a bunch of books from his dad dying.”

            “Ah… Yeah, I hope I can get my fathers books if anything.”

            “Must be a guy-thing. It’s chill though, my stepdad is super cool.”

            “Cooler than your real dad?”

            “Definitely. Hope he’s dead.”

            “Oh shit… Sorry Cait…”

            “It’s cool hon…” She gave a short laugh. “Call me Cait again…”

            “Uh… Cait?”

            “Hmm. Yeah I think I like it this time.”

            “This time?”

            “Never liked getting called Cait.”

            “I can not-”

            “No!” She looked legitimately concerned. “Call me Cait. Do it again.”

            “Cait?”

            “Yeah babe?”

            “Hi.”

            “Hi!”

 

            The bookstore loomed in the distance, dominating the corner of the shopping mall and taking up two stories. I stopped by now and then to grab some reading material. History books, preferably the ones with colorful pictures for my little kid brain to enjoy; were great. I had wanted to get the newest collegiate edition of advanced metallurgy, and I brought Caitlyn with me.

            Why? That is a fantastic question actually, I should have asked myself that over forty minutes ago…

            “I haven’t been here before.” It’s a store with books in it.

            “Yeah, I don’t really know where you… What is your hobby?”

            “Dunno…”

            “Well, I mean how do you spend your free time?”

            “I mean, that’s… That’s what I mean, I dunno what to call it.” We are going to sit in this car for a while…

            “Describe it to me.”

            “I… See what people do… And… Like, think about it, I don’t know. It’s weird, I get made fun of a lot for it, so…”

            “Oh… You… People watch.”

            “What?”

            “People watching, it’s like… Bird watching or something, you watch what people do, and it entertains you.”

            “Yeah, like; I go to the mall and… Yeah. It’s weird.”

            “It’s not that weird.”

            “Bookstore hon.” She got out of the car in a hurry, and I wrestled with my seatbelt trying to keep up.

            “Hey, it’s alright, I don’t think it’s weird!”

            “That’s not!” She gave a sigh of frustration. “… Let’s just, y’know; do stuff.” She wiggled a bit in spot, the vertical serpentine of an uncomfortable woman.

            I relented. “All right… But it’s a neat hobby. Definitely get more activity than me.”

            “I dunno.” She reached out and pinched my arm, the strong hard fingertips actually getting a good grip on me. “These are nice enough.”

            “Well I have to use a lot of heavy tools at work.”

            “Right, you make stuff out of metal.” She ran her hand up and down my arm as she spoke. “I bet that stuff gets heavy…” The discomfort boner has returned, but this is what I came here for…

            I raised my arm and flexed. This was not library etiquette. “The forklift does most the heavy lifting though.”

            “Oh! Is that so?” She giggled and was grabbing out of humor now. I don’t know what I was trying to find out though. I just sort of acted.

            Arms down, I wandered through the aisles heading towards the resource section, Caitlyn following behind looking amused tapping on her phone.

            “Who are you messaging all the time?”

            “Hmm?”

            “You’re always messaging somebody, is it your friend?”

            “I’m not messaging anyone?”

            “Playing a game?”

            “Nope.”

            “… What’s on your phone?”

            “It’s a secret! She held out the device and tapped on my head with it.”

            “Riiight…” I turned to the shelf and lifted up the prize of the day. An explosion of white sparks informed me I definitely had the right book. Actually performing such an act, however; was the opposite of metallurgy. I flopped it into my left and held it against my hip.

            “That it?”

            “Yeah. I might wander around and see if anything catches my eye. You looking for anything?”

            “I think there’s a magazine rack up front, That’s too big for me I think.” That’s what she said. I looked at her face for a moment to catch a glimpse of makeup.

            “Whatcha starin’ at hon?”

            “You don’t wear makeup do you?”

            “No, of course not, never!” Her sarcasm was pungent. “I was born this sexy beautiful!”

            “I mean… Like, the black lines are just your fur right?”

            “Highlighter powder.”

            “What?”

            “Highlighter powder. A lot of anthro girls will use highlighter powder to bring attention to their faces. I use it, like three kinds; it makes my features look better: stand out more. Can’t do wax and stuff like your girls do, it’d be a waste on me.” She pointed at her face with two fingers and wiggled them for a moment before smiling wide.

            We walked slowly through the store, side by side. Unease washed over me again, the thought of being perceived as a couple fueling it. Caitlyn didn’t seem to mind; she’d reached her magazine rack and was flipping through some rag with a bunch of food on the cover. ‘Better than greens! Fried fruit and more!’ That didn’t sound particularly appetizing. It was a strange thought though; Caitling couldn’t eat mean of any kind, at least I didn’t think she could. Gazelles didn’t look like omnivores, at least Caitlyns straight and flat teeth didn’t elude to that. She definitely wasn’t a carnivore.

            No way around it, really. “Can you eat meat?”

            “No. I get sick as hell.”

            “You’ve tried?”

            “’Course. Everyone has.”

            “Were you okay?”

            She giggled. “No babe, I got sick as hell! That cheeseburger wasn’t worth the money or the stomach ache. Bean patty is delish and doesn’t kill me, so there’s that.”

            “Bean patty?”

            “Oh my God, you don’t know?”

            “I haven’t had one of those…”

            She flopped the magazine shut and stepped forwards to me. “James, take your date to lunch already.” Oh yeah. Boys and girls do things together. I’d never been around an extrovert for so long.

            “Where do you wanna go?”

            “I’ll show you, hurry though!” She reached out and squeezed my wrist a few times before trotting towards the front of the store. I turned the corner, and just about jumped out of my skin thinking I had walked into a fox.

            A fox that made me yell; “You!” I got shushed from around the corner as I stepped back. It was a book. Not very thick, but wide and tall enough to make the face on the cover pass for life-sized. And it was her. There was no doubt about it. On a little display stand holding it at an angle, it might have even been the right height.

            “Sick fucking joke, right?” I mumbled as Caitlyn came back looking like she didn’t know whether to laugh or be concerned. I stared at the book, searching it for some kind of answer until it hit me like a ton of bricks. Bottom right… Yellow letters…

            “Do you… Read her stuff?”

            “No… I… Recognize her.”

            She laughed. “Well, yeah; she’s on TV sometimes getting blasted for shit she says.” She’s on TV? I guess I really didn’t watch enough to even keep up. The crazy girl who had spoken to me that day… Was some celebrity? I reached out and picked up the book.

            “That’s Dhalia…” My blood ran like a pump was pushing ice through my veins. It was her. I read the little yellow letters out loud: “Dhalia… Kon…”

            “Eeeeeeeyeah honey. You okay?”

            “I think so.” I turned it over and held it with the metallurgy book. “Dunno though.”

            “You’re gonna buy that?”

            “I met her. At the speed dating thing.”

            “Hold up hon. You didn’t; there’s like, no way on earth.”

            “I’d recognize that face anywhere, she was super creepy.”

            “She lives here, but she’s not somebody people run into.” She lives here. She’s from here, that’s confirmed then. I wanted to put it at the back of my head, but there was no going around it now. I wanted to know more.

            “If it’s a bust, I’ll just donate it. It’s no big deal.” I’m gonna read this book cover to cover.

            “You sure you’re all right babe?” Caitlyn had wrapped her arm around mine like before. Her breast pushed into my arm, a humble little reminder that a deer turns you on James, you sick fuck.

            I turned and made sure to look right in her eyes. “Let’s go get a… Bean-burger?”

            She smiled and loosened her grip. “Yeah babe… You’ll love it…”

 

            Caitlyn gave me direction to a burger joint made out of shipping containers. It wasn’t exactly some hippy joint trying to be eco-friendly, which was great. She ordered first and I rolled up behind her in line asking to get the same thing, only for some teenage wolf girl with braces to stop and stare at the screen before asking what Caitlyn had ordered.

            We sat together at a small two-person table under a canopy. The thing came wrapped in tin-foil like some wannabe five-guys-and-fries. Caitlyn had already torn hers open like a kid on christmas.

            Unfold it. It looks like a burger. Smells a little different, no grilled meat to be sure. A bite into it, and wow it’s actually not bad at all.

            “Whatdya think hon?”

            “It’s really good.”

            “Tha’s eht?” Swallow your food first.

            “It’s really good, I expected it to taste like a salad or something.” She was giggling, probably at the thought of a salad burger.

            “It’s funny dating outside your eating-habits.”

            “You date a lot of human guys?”

            “Nope.” Insert fries. “Your de secon’” Swallow. “Stuff with sharp-tooths never works out anyways.”

            “Yeah? Deer and a wolf would be a weird couple.”

            “Try cow and fox.” What?

            “What do you mean?”

            “I’m a gazelle. Makes me an antelope.” We took syncronized drinks of soda. “I’m more close to a cow than a deer. Bovidae!”

            “Bovidae? Bovine?”

            “Yep. Went out with a fox for a while.” Dhalia sprung to mind again…

            “How’d that work out?”

            “Already said babe, it didn’t. Mostly cause he had little man syndrome. I never cared that he was short, but he sure did.”

            I imagined Caitlyn running around dwarfing her little orange boyfriend and chuckled. “Guess I should drive you home?”

            “Nah, just back to Crystals place.”

            “That’s not your place?”

            “No. Mom won’t let me move out.” I kind of wanted to pry, but her demeanor told me not to. I popped the last of the burger into my mouth and stood up with her.

 

            Back at the apartments we sat in the air conditioning for a moment longer

            “Yeah. I guess it’s great having a fuzzy friend.” I was grateful I’d gone out with Caitlyn in the end. Even if she was… Looking at me. Really weird. Right now. “If that’s… I didn’t say something weird did I?”

            “Hey, it’s fine… I’m down…” She scooted in her seat and leaned over the center console.

            “Hold on. What did I say?” Very close, you are very close; I think I can smell your shampoo levels of close.

            Surprise washed over her face. Then she laughed. “Oh my God! You didn’t…  You didn't actually mean fuzzy friend?” She leaned back and pointed a finger at me, still shaking her shoulders. “Like a regular friend?!  James! We’re not friends!”

            “I… Think of you as a friend, Caitlyn.”

            “James…” Don’t laugh at me.

            “Why aren’t we friends?”

            “James.” She looked at me strangely again. Eyes half closed, her jet black lips pursed and smiling. “Open the door for a lady, yeah hon?”

            Seemed like a dumb way to change the subject, but I was too frustrated to care. How the fuck aren’t we friends? I made my way out and around the car, took hold of her door handle and opened it wide. “Your friends abode, madame.”

            Caitlyn kept her head low and swung her feet out of the car one at a time, before slowly turning up to look at me, raising a hand. I stepped closer and felt myself grin, she was so silly just like a little princess. I grabbed her and got ready to help her up, until she shot straight up at me. I froze solid, my Vietnam flashbacks of rabbits putting me in shock. Caitlyn was even closer than before now, still holding my hand with her other arm wrapped around my shoulders. Her eyes were closed, and my face felt hot. My mouth was wet, and started moving on it’s own. A soft ‘chu’ sounded as our faces separated and Caitlyns eyes opened.

            “You’re not ‘friend’ material honey. Sorry.” She released me and turned back to the car.

            “Why… Did you-”

            “It’s just to make a point.” she had grabbed her purse and thrown it over your shoulder. “Relax. And… Goodnight!”

            “Good…” She’s already walking away. “Night…” She’s gone dude. Snap out of it. I fell back into the drivers seat and stared out the windshield. Cars were passing, people were going about their day. I looked at the radio I’d turned off so we could talk. I couldn’t even remember the conversation, everything with Caitlyn was a blend in my head. Just filled with her. I checked the clock. “What the fuck is goodnight, it’s six in the PM?!”

================================================================================
Chapter 6: Into the Gray
Summary:

    MC desperately tries to ignore how messed up his life is becoming

Chapter Text

            “Dhalia Kon, MD: Donovans Syndrome.”  I read the book title aloud for the umpteenth time.  Probably one of my dumber purchases, but I had it now.  Opening it to the title page revealed another picture of the nightmare fuel fox.  She had yellow eyes!  So help me God, yellow eyes.

            “About this book…  Diagnostician, and practiced surgeon Dhalia Kon delves into psychology once more to explain her theories about genetic variance, hybridization and why we as a people have become obsessed with them…  What the fuck is an orthopedic surgeon?  What the fuck is endocrinology?” I closed the book again and reopened it at the rear.  “Dhalia Kon is an outgoing member of the medical community, noted for holding numerous PhD’s at an incredibly young age.  The prodigal young woman dabbles in psychology in her free time, and is currently pursuing a fifth doctorate in mammalian behavioral psychology.”  Okay, fuck all that noise, time to use the computer to learn nothing.

            I fell into my chair and dropped the book to the side.  ‘Donovans Syndrome’ search.  ‘Donovans Syndrome is a theoretical condition which compels individuals born as hybrids to seek out mating partners closer related to their primary genetic root.  The term was coined by Dhalia Kon in researching diseases and genetic conditions commonly found in hybrids.  Hybrids face much oppression in-’ yeah okay, shut the fuck up with that shit.

            Everything under Donovans Syndrome has Dhalia tacked all over it.

            ‘Dhalia Kon’ search that instead.  A picture of some bloody body with red arrows pointing at bloody things was there to make me even more confused.

            “Fuck are you looking at?” Mike had wandered into my room through the open door.

            “Some…  Crazy fox lady did research or something.”  I closed the internet.  “I dunno, just started clicking on shit.”

            “Fucking whack.  Hey, I’m going into work today.”

            “Right, catch you later man.”  He wandered out of my room and out of the house.  I turned back to my desk.  Brute force then, filled up the car’s gas on the way home last night, so I can drive anywhere…  ‘Where does Dhalia Kon work?’ Search.

            Dhalia K.  MD is currently employed at St.  Minryure university hospital, where she works as chief of surgery.  Minryure was about an hour drive, but it’s where I was born.  I wanted to visit my parents more than anything now.  I slid over my phone and tapped on it to find dad in the contacts.

            It rang for a moment, but he answered.  “Hello?”

            “Hey dad, it’s James.”

            “Son!  How are you?”

            “Yeah, I’m good dad, how are you?”

            “Oh, I’m swell son, what’s up?”

            “I was wondering if you’re busy right now.”

            “Ehh…  A bit, but I can talk if you want.”

            “Oh no, that’s fine, I was gonna try to visit.”

            “Pretty sudden.  Something come up?” Your son kissed a deer.  Or a cow, I guess.  Anyways, you raised him wrong.

            “Nah, just realized it’s been a bit since I saw you.”

            “It has, we’ll have to catch up soon for sure.  Maybe when we do, you’ll bring a girl home?”

            “God don’t say that…”

            “I know what happened son, but it has been a while and your mother still worries you’re dying of loneliness.”

            “I’m alive because of loneliness.”  My lips felt cold, but I knew my cheeks were warm and red.  I was glad nobody could see me, fantasizing about Caitlyn ‘proving a point.’  a second time, and for longer maybe.  “What happened, happened.  I’m gonna make it.”  We’re all gonna make it.

            “I know, I know.  I love you son.  We both do.”

            “I love you too, dad.  We’ll have to catch up soon.”  There goes my excuse.  Guess now it’s all about unreasonable reasoning.  I snatched the car keys off my desk.

 

            The campus was huge, and St Minryure’s was scattered over a large area.  I found public parking, for an outrageous sum; and left my car behind.  I wasn’t going to bother with driving when I had to take a roundabout to get to a traffic light.

            ‘Center for pediatrics’ on the left ‘Melvin Brooks Orthodontics Research’ on the right.  I know what none of these things are.  ‘Emergency room’ is familiar, but they might be mad if I go in there…  Fuck it.  The pediatrics place is closest.

            The sliding door let a mother and daughter as well as myself into the lobby.  It smelled like soap, as a hospital should; and I wandered to the line that led to a desk marked information.  I finally approach the desk and get greeted by the young girl.  She’s a bearded dragon, just like Kyle.  I don’t know why that’s weird to me.

            “Hi, I might not be in the right place…  I’m looking for Dhal- uh, Dr Kon?”

            “Uh huh…”  She’s begins tapping on the keyboard, and I get a front row seat to watching her face slowly shift from ‘customer service’ into ‘kinda concerned.’

            “Yeah, I just know she works here, I wanted to…”  Confront her about doing literally nothing to me, because I’m a creep; James just turn and run home right now.  “Set up an appointment.”

            “Yeah, it looks like Dr.  Kon is not in today, and her office would be at the administration building.”

            “That sounds right, how do I get there from here?”

            “Um…  Are you a reporter?” What a weird fucking question.

            “No, I have…  Bone pain.”  She was a skeleton doctor, right?

            “Bone pain…?”

            “Yeah, I heard she’s the best, so-”

            “You have bone pain?”

            “Yeah, and I’d really like to not to, I’m sorry that your bones don’t hurt ma’am.”

            Her fingers were rubbing the crease in her head between her eyes.  “Right.  So, the administration is at, umm: if you get on the main road out this building you’ll head west and follow it to the big red brick parking structure down the hill.  The gray concrete building with the hand-fountain is administration.  They can just help you set up your appointment at the front desk though.”

            “Awesome.  Terrific.  Hey!  Thank you so much for your time.”  I felt awkward, and mostly worried.

            “Noooo problem.”  She grabbed the phone and I started walking away.  I slowed when I heard her speak into the phone.  “Admin?  Hey, can you connect me to security?  It’s for protocol notes…”  You’re not even hiding it.  I began power-walking to the front door.  I’m I gonna get arrested?  For what?!

            I made it outside and broke into a jog for my car.  What was I running from?  Hospital security?  I sat in the driver’s seat and stared out at the sidewalk where I had come from.  Holy shit I was going paranoid or something.  It might not even be about you, James; did you think about that?  I checked my phone.  It was getting late after all, no wonder she wasn’t here.  Maybe that was good though.

            Out the car and down the road, I could see the parking structure, but no fountain.  I broke into a jog again, just to keep the tempo from before.

 

            The fountain, as it turns out; was rather attractive.  It was a wall of glass covered completely in hand-prints with water falling down it like a ramp.  I couldn’t spot a human one, but many looked familiar.  I wondered what person could identify them all as I went around to the front of the building.  Another information desk was there, and just as I started preparing my question, I noticed it had a security guard sitting with the assistant.

            Fuck that I guess.  Thank God the walls in here are practically made of signs.  The place looks like some kind of NCIS set piece, glass walls around offices and everything fancy like that.  A sign reading orthopedics led me to round a corner and start looking at random doors in the hallway.

            At the very end of the hall, I told myself I would give up, but fate had decided to place a red sign there.  ‘Chief Surgeons Office: Dhalia K.  MD.’  Right.  I raised a fist and knocked a few times.

            “…  James, you might be retarded.”  I grabbed the handle and gave it a wiggle.  It unlatched the door swung free.  Who just leaves their office unlocked?  I glanced over my shoulder and slid into the dark room.  For a guy who might have had security called on him, breaking into a hospital was relatively easy.

            I turned to face the dark room with a racing heart.  There was a cool air to it, and a smell like…  What did it smell like?  I couldn’t place it, but it was stabbing my brain more than my nose somehow…  I turned the lights on, then back off.  Might get caught over that.  I looked at the desk.  Weird tinker toy, binder, computer, a book that’s thicker than a telephone book…

            “What am I looking for?” I asked the question out loud.  It was reasonable though, what was I really looking for?  I opened a drawer in the desk.  Pens, pencils, stationary, a stress ball.  Press keys on the keyboard.  Can’t get into the computer man, shits locked.

            I fell into the chair.  There it was again, my head spun in a circle over that smell.  That smell…  I turned and smelled the chair.  That was what she smelled like; Dhalia.

            The lights suddenly turned on, blinding me for a moment.  I hadn’t even heard the door open, but standing there with a cart filled with cleaners and rags.  I sat frozen in the chair as the young goat man stared at me.

            “You…  Who are you?  You can’t be in here?”

            “I’m a, uh, friend of Dhalia’s, I’m grabbing some stuff she wanted from the uh, office…”

            “Right, yeah, right” He was halfway out the door.  He was out the door.  The door was closed.

            “Fuck.  Fuck fuck fuck!” I launched myself out of the chair and ran to the door.  No, maybe he was just giving me some privacy.  Back to the desk, it’s fine, it’s okay; no: he left the cart.  I’m fine to look around the room for a second, but I need to leave.  “Something something something gimme something…”  There’s nothing.

            No.  leaving, I need to leave.  Out the door; and get out.  I could see the janitor rounding the corner the way I’d come.  Opposite way then.  Running down the hall and taking the first turn instead; I land myself in front of a set of elevators.  Nothing else.  Fuck it, beam me up Scotty.  The thing opens right away, and I’m in it.  I can…  Go to the second floor, move around up there; and get to the first floor again, right?  Opening up to the second floor, I head out and start following the same route as the floor below.  Back into the hall, I try to walk normally; matching the pace of the others walking through the hallway.  A sign from the ceiling shows me the other elevator set is just ahead.

            This really is too easy.  Smack the button.  Ding.  Door starts sliding open.

            “Hey buddy, stop right there.”  Oh fuck.  The elevator reveals two men in blue shirts, a short furred black dog and a fat human man.  “We just wanna ask you some questions.”

            “I just gotta go, I’m gonna be late.”

            “Yeah, you are.”  Two more from the side, the way I’d come.  “What, did you think we don’t have cameras in a hospital?” The cat lady sounds like she might wanna fight me.

            “We’re just gonna have you come talk with us.  Breaking into a doctor’s office isn’t okay.”  No shit you don’t say?

            “You just need to come answer some questions.”  The angry orange cat spoke up again.  “Otherwise, we’re gonna have you arrested.”

            “It’s fine, it’s fine.  I’ll talk, let’s talk.”

            “Just come with us.”

            I followed behind the first group back down the hall deeper into the hospital until I was brought to a small meeting room.  It sat maybe ten people, and looked like its main purpose was to have everyone look at the TV at the back.

            “So.  You come into the hospital.  Wander through the halls.  Break into the Chief of Surgery’s office.”

            “I was just lost.”  Never tell the cops the truth.

            “That’s not true.  Maybe half true, but not true.”

            “I…  I just wanted to see Dr. Kon's office.”  Maybe tell them half the truth.

            “There’s an appropriate way to do that.  You went to the pediatric office, first.  Asked for Dr.  Kon.  And then came straight here and go digging in her office.”  He stared at me like something he said had been a question I was supposed to answer.  He looked concerned more than angry; leaving me a bit confused.  “Look, we get a lot of guys coming through, trying to get ahold of Dr. Kon about her books and whatnot…”

            “I’m not a reporter.”

            “And I’m just trying to understand why you’d do this stuff if you aren’t.  You looking for prescription pads, or some kind of fix?”

            “No, I’m not a junkie, I just…”

            “You were looking to harm Dr. Kon…?”

            “She’s not even here, so I couldn’t hurt her.”

            “You weren’t looking for Dr. Kon, then why were you here?”

            “I…  Wanted to learn.  About her.  I don’t know.”

            “Seems kind of backwards, son.  Said you’re not a reporter, but you wanna know more.  Said you’re not a stalker…”

            “I met her, once before; and then found out she’s a famous doctor, and I came here to…”

            “To what?”

            “I don’t know, something just brought me here!  I’m looking back on it all, and I have no reason for why I came here.  I just did.”  This was exhausting.  I felt like a child being interrogated over missing snacks from the pantry.  “I don’t want to meet her, she kinda creeps me out.”

            “Well, that’s good, cause you won’t be anywhere near Dr.  Kon anytime soon.”

            “Oh thank God.”

            “Yeah.  But it’s going to be up to her on whether or not she’s gonna press charges, and she’s got a hot-head when it comes to people prying into her work and personal life.”

            “That’s…  I’ll deal with that, it’s fine.”

            “We can’t”

            “Yep.  I’m a huge liar.  Kicking me out yet?”

            “Sure pal.  You’re banned from the campus until further notice though, and we are going to hand your information over to the local police.”

            “Got it.”  I stood up.  I don’t care.  I’m tired.  I want to go home.  This was retarded.  I’m retarded.

 

            It was dark out when I finally left the hospital.  They took the time to check my ID, take photos of my face and contact local police to make sure I left the campus when I drove out.  Nearly home, the silence in my car was only serving to leave me alone with my own thoughts.  I needed as much quiet as possible, I needed to think.  What had my plan been?

            Pulling into the parking lot, some asshole in a brand new Supra was in my spot.  At least they were starting their stupid brap-brap sounding engine.  I only hate it because I can’t afford one, Adam would tell me.  It slid back and turned out of the spot before jamming to a stop for a moment.  The windows were all blacked out, and I couldn’t see what limp dick prick would be driving the thing parking in marked spots.

            The thing made a noise like a ricer and vanished from sight.  Slow the fuck down asshole, it’s a parking lot; children play with broken glass in the gutters around here, and you might hurt one of them.

            Pulled into my spot and got out.  Maybe I could avoid telling Mike anything about where I’d gone.  I made my way up the stairs and slid in my key.  Door is unlocked.  I swing it wide and spot Mike in the kitchen.

            “You didn’t lock the door?” We both agreed on a policy of locking the place up when we left, and letting each other know when we were leaving.

            “Oh, yeah; since you didn’t lock it, I figured I wouldn’t.”  Don’t give me that shit, fuck you.

            “I locked it on my way out, I left twice today, once at six and once before around two or three.”

            “Well, shit wasn’t locked when I got home.”

            “Cool Mike, whatever; I’ll double check next time on that shit I haven’t fucked up in couple years.”

            “Fuck crawled up your ass?”

            “Some bitch named Dhalia.  I’m sorry, I’m going to bed.”

            Down the hall and into my room, I fell down onto my bed and sighed deep as I buried my face in the pillow.  Then it hit me.  I jumped up and looked at my hand.  There was a wet spot on my sheets.  Really Mike?  You wanna know what’s up my ass when you do this shit?  And in another instant, it might have been one hundred degrees below freezing in that room for just that moment.

            I felt my eyes widen.  They teared up from the pressure of doing so; it felt like they might pop out of their sockets, how fast they grew.  It was the same as before, but now I knew exactly what it was.  I had felt like there were bugs in my bed, but it was all in my head.  No.  It was in my nose.  I smelled the pillow again.  There wasn’t a shred of doubt now.

            “Dhalia…?”

 

            The dryer tumbled and tumbled with the sheets in it; while I sat by staring.  I’d tapped the police station's number into my four or five times.  What would I say though?  Hey, it’s me, that guy who was just trespassing!  I found out the doctor is stalking me!  She sneaks into my house…  Defiles my sheets…  That’d blow over well, yeah?

            The dryer dinged.  They weren’t clean, I wanted to wash them again.  Mike came out into the hall where I had the sliding door open to our washer and dryer.

            “Seriously, the fucks up with you?”

            “I’m just…  Going through some weird change in my life.”  I’m changing to have a stalker.

            “I for one hate it homie, but I’m gonna try and be cool about all this shit.”

            “Mike?”

            “Sup?”

            “I’m gonna request the landlord changes our lock and keys.”

            “Why?”

            “We both lock the door.  And the spare is missing from outside.”

            “Shit, really?”

            “Yeah, I checked a minute ago.”  Just make him think there’s a burglar.  He’ll call the cops and nothing will be missing but the key, end of story.  “Anything missing?” He left shook his head and went into his room.  I opened the dryer and stuck my head in.  The smell was gone, and yet I could swear I still smell it.  What kind of sick fuck does that shit?  Breaks into a house and jills-it in somebody else’s bed?  How do you not do that shit and think about how fucked up you are?

            I’m dealing with a psycho.  A genuine no-punches-pulled psycho bitch.

            And I’d just fucked myself out of being able to call the cops.

 

            My alarm went off, and I woke up off the rug in the center of my room.  I’m foregoing my workout routine.  I’m driving to work.  Traffic seemed omnipresent on the way though; leading me to be stuck at just about every red light.  I watched the line in front of me start shifting to the right, pulling past the white line; and sure enough, a fire truck was coming up from behind: sirens blaring.  I joined the rest of the cars in making way as it barreled past, followed by an ambulance.  Once past, one by one we rejoined the traffic flow and began moving.

            Looking ahead however, showed something less promising.  A huge plume of grey smoke, with white puffs escaping it.  That’s a metal fire: any second now- yep, I smell it.  Galvie smoke.  Somebody is gonna have some bad monday-fever…  Somebody…

            “Oh, fuck me sideways…”  I never thought I’d get my wish and hate it so much: the galvanizer was on fire, and so was the fabrication shop.  Barney was outside jabbing a finger at the buildings in the distance, screaming at the owner of the galvanizer, while the fire department opted to use powder runs into the building.

            Forced to park down the hill from the shop by police cruisers, I stepped out of the car and barney turned to look at me.  “You get the fucking day off James, and it’s not PTO until this motherfucker gets his God damn insurance in line.”

            “Barney, do you need any help?” Don’t make me leave you like this, even if you’re a fucking cunt.

            “The fuck are you gonna help with?  Go home James, I’ll call you.”  Nothing to it then.  Back in the car.  Better just go home and stare at the news until I watch my job burn down on it.  Barney has insurance if nothing else; I’ve still got a job in the end…  At least I better.

 

            I laid on my bed, staring at the ceiling.  Anxiety washed over me like somebody found buckets of it to pour on my head.  I wanted to be at work.  I wanted to be distracted from the very room I was sitting in.  I found myself peering out the window every time I heard a car passing by.  Some part of my gut was convinced the damn supra had been Dhalia.

            I lifted my phone up just as it buzzed.  Hopefully it’s Barney, telling me I can come to work.  Nope, it’s Caitlyn; asking what’s up.  Fuck it, hit the call button James.

            The phone rang so long I had begun waiting to discover what Caitlyn’s message box would be; until she answered, most likely on the very last ring: “Hey hon what’s up?”

            How the fuck are gone break the news to her?  “I have a psychotic stalker hiding in the walls of my house, and I wanna know why you kissed me the other day?”

            I heard a spraying noise and a loud clatter.  Caitlyn was laughing in the distance for a moment before I heard a faint but audible “What the fuck?!” Maybe there was a better way to say all that.  The phone found its way back to her face after a good minute.  “James, hey; I’m sorry I dropped the phone and choked a little.  Can you…  Say that all again?”

            I repeated myself to her, bringing about another laughing fit.  “I’m sorry, I am super fucking overwhelmed right now, and I just need to get this off my chest and talk about it.  I shouldn’t bother you with it-”

            “Babe, no; I’m glad to help, but you’re taking me so off guard right now!” I blushed a bit at how much she was giggling at me, grateful she couldn’t see it.

            “I just don’t know where I’m at in life right now.  I don’t get what’s going on.  I went speed dating and now everything is crazy around me.”

            “I know for a fact I’m a good kisser, so I’m thinking it’s the stalker that’s got you down?”

            “I…  Yeah.  I think somebody has been breaking into my house.”

            “Are they, like; stealing things?  Stuff is missing?”

            “No, everything is still here.”  I rose from the bed to better glare at it.  “But somebody has been in my bed.”

            “Yeah?  Like that bear-story humans tell?”

            “Hardy harr.  But kind of like that, I guess.  The things been messed up, and moved around…  And it smells funny and makes my skin crawl.”  She was silent over the line for a moment, until I beckoned her back.  “Caitlyn?  Did I lose ya?”

            “No.  I’m here.  Your bed smells different?”

            “Yeah, like…”

            “Like somebody rolled around in it?  Kinda like, somebody wanted to smell kinda like you?”

            What a weird way of putting it.  Her questions were leading, but it seemed like she was onto something.  “I dunno.  But…”

            “What is it?”

            “I think she…  Touched herself?” Another outburst of laughter sounded off in the distance.  “Come on, don’t laugh.  I’m fucking serious.”

            “I’m sorry babe, but whaaaaaaaaaat the fuck?!  I thought you had somebody doing scent-swapping with you, but how would you even tell that?”

            “There was a wet spot!  Like, bigger than my whole hand!  And the whole thing smelled like some girl; it was fucking sick!”

            “Yeah, that’s pretty fucked up.  You sure it was girly-juice though?”

            “Fuck do not call it that.”

            “Did you smell it though?”

            “No!  I didn’t fucking smell it, I scrubbed myself in the shower like I wanted my skin to peel off, and washed my sheets with the same mindset.”

            “I mean, if it’s S.R.  babe, that’s not going to stop it…”

            “Do I even want to know what S.R.  is?”

            “I already told you babe.  I mean, kinda.  S.R.  is when you wanna smell like your partner, so you rub yourself on their stuff, like; super hard.”

            “What the fuck kind of weird shit is that?” This was possibly more fucking nasty than the shlicking…

            “It’s just a thing…  I dunno what to say, it’s like; normal for some couples.  Humans don’t do that?”

            “I mean…  No.  But, sometimes we’ll keep something of anothers that smells like them.”

            “Same thing.  Kinda-not-really, but yeahsies.”  Don’t say yeahsies, that’s not a word.

            “But…  I don’t want to, fuckin’…  I dunno.”

            “You know.  That’s pretty messed up, and I’m sorry for cursing by the way; but you need to call the cops babe.”

            “What if…  For reasons.  I can’t call the cops on her?”

            “Why can’t you call the cops?”

            “I don’t, uh; I kinda did something back to her.  It would look bad, if-”

            “Hold on hon.  Stop.  You know who it is, and did something to them; and they broke in your house and…  she fingered herself on your bed?  Okay.  What did you do?”

            I shouldn’t have told her anything.  At this point all I can do is incriminate myself.  “Can I…  Trust you?”

            “I mean, you called me about your stalker and it sounds like you’re confessing a crime, so I dunno babe, I think you already trust me.”  I should just hang up right now.  “And don’t you dare hang up on me babe.”  Fucking horse shit.

            “Do you remember…  At the bookstore.  I bought that book, by the doctor.”

            “Yeah?  Dhalia?”

            “I think that-”

            “Don’t tell me you think she’s your stalker.”

            “I fucking do, alright!”

            “Chill hon, don’t yell at me.”

            “I’m sorry.”

            “But that’s ridiculous.”

            “I!  …  I know…”

            “Cause you think you saw her at the speed dating thing?”

            “I don’t know, I thought I had it all figured out, but now I’m saying it out loud and I feel like I’m talking out my ass…”

            “I know that feel, babe.  I don’t know how I can help though.”

            “I just wanted to talk about it.  I can’t talk to my roommate, and my work just burned down-”

            “Honey!  How did you leave that out!?”

            “I’m not okay right now!  I’m sorry, I just-”

            “Don’t apologize to me baby.  I mean, honey; you don’t have a job, and, like; people in your house…  You probably don’t even wanna sleep in your bed.”

            “I don’t.”

            “I wish I could help.”

            “Sounded like you lived with your parents, so I can’t crash with you.”

            “Yeah?” She giggled; “You wanna come crash with me, James?”

            “That’s not what I mean, I just, you know; can’t sleep somewhere else.”

            “You’re parents?”

            “They turned my room into a pottery studio for my mom.”

            “Oh that is cute.”

            “Yeah, so; I’ll be sleeping here.”

            “You don’t know anyone with a guest room?”

            Sava’s image jumped to mind.  She’d moved into the basement, and her old room was empty at her house.  I could ask Adam’s parents, but I already knew they would want rent.  I can’t ditch the rent on Mike, and I can’t justify paying both…  But it was wrong to drop the same ball on Sava and ask if her mom will start doing favors for me.  I don’t think I even have to fortitude to live in that house, between Sava and her Mom I’d almost certainly get myself in trouble with my wandering eyes…

            “James?  You there, hon?”

            “You call me hon a lot.”  I just kind of spat it out.  I was still trying to think, and my mouth just poured out the words.

            “Yeah.  I do.”  She giggled.

            I was starting to enjoy her little laughs though.  Probably for the best, since she so often had a giggle, even if it was at my expense sometimes.  “Cait?”

            “Yeah?”

            “What’re you up to baby?” Oh God, oh no; it was supposed to be a joke but it came out of my mouth so gross.

            “Ooooooooo!  What was that?!” She’d almost yelled the word ‘that’.

            “I thought uh; it’d be funny if I did it…  I’m sorry.”

            “Nooo!  Say it again!”

            “No.”

            “Do it!  Call me your baby, James…”

            “You’re my, uh…  Baby…”

            “You’re, uhhhhh, not killing it like before.”

            “I’m really sorry.”

            “Spread that word butter again baby.”

            “Word-butter is another phrase I don’t wanna hear again.”

            “Say it.”

            I groaned loudly and took a deep breath.  “You’re my baby, Caitlyn.”  Yeah, joke not worth it.

            “Hmmmm.  Bummer I can’t see you today.”

            “Nah?”

            “I have to work.  In like, ten minutes.”

            “Guess I’d better let you go.”

            “Hey?”

            “What’s up?”

            “Where are you gonna stay?”

            “Just at my place.  I can’ t pay double rent, and the two people I know with guest rooms either want rent or don’t know me well enough.”

            “Who doesn’t know you well enough?”

            “My friend, Sava.”

            “…  Sava.”  I do not like the concerned way you said that.  “I think I saw that name on your fakebook…?”

            “Yeah, I’m friends with her there.”

            “Her…”  It was barely a mumble, but I heard it.  “Well.  Maybe you can get in good and check out if she’ll, like; let you stay.”  This tone shift is weird, and I don’t like it…  “That’s you though.  But my feelings are hurt, by the way.”

            “What?  What’s up?”

            “You started this call complaining about that kiss.”

            “What?  I didn’t complain about it, I just, I dunno; didn’t understand it?”

            “Better not complain hon.  I don’t kiss on the second date, y’know.”

            “Why’d you do it for me then?”

            “I told you silly!  It’s…  Ugh, shit I gotta go right now James.  Talk to me later, ‘kay hon?”

            “Yeah.  Later Caitlyn.”  She made a loud lip-smacking noise, probably meant to sound like a kiss; moments before the line went dead.  I set the phone down on my desk, and stared at it.  I stared into space for a moment, trying to remember the sensation of Caitlyns lips.  They weren’t anything like a humans, they were…  Softer?  No.  Warmer for sure though.  Caitlyn didn’t wear lipstick, I don’t think.  They had a natural dark black lining to them and the fur near them.  Something stirred just above my abdomen, that old riled-up feeling you get thinking about girls and their bodies.

            I eyed the computer at the thought.  What did Caitlyn look like when…?  James, you sick bastard; you don’t get to watch your work burn down just to go home and watch fucking porn.

            Shoulder-devil James appeared before me in a puff of red smoke.  “Sure you can, pal!” Came his shrill demonic voice “Just type in ‘fat bouncy gazelle titties’ and get what you want!  Over one million results in just a click!”

            I coughed on the blast of white smoke as shoulder-angel James crashed onto the scene.  Shit tastes just like a fire extinguishers power, fuck!  “No James!  You can’t defile Caitlyn in your mind like that!  Think about how much of a sweet girl she turned out to be!”

            “Fuck that!  That woman called herself a cow and laid lips on ya!  Get a look at what’cher getting’ your dick in!”

            “So vile!  Think about how Caitlyn just listened to all of our problems and cared!” The two thumb-sized schizophrenic delusions dissipated, leaving me alone with the worst decision maker of all…   Myself.

            “Alright James…”  I sat down at the desk.  “You’re not looking at Gazelle porn.”  I opened the internet browser.  “You’re just…”  Annnnnd ‘Control+P’ for formalities.  “Doing research.  Research is fine.”  I stared at the search bar as the letters slowly filled it up: ‘Gazelle nude model.’

            Alright.  Yep.  Uh huh.  They’ve all got an ass that could knock a door down.  Close the internet browser now.  Blink hard a couple times.

            Alright James, open the internet browser.  And ‘Control+P’ for formalities.  ‘Gazelle girl fuck’ and lightly tap the enter praying I miss and it doesn’t open…  A full page of porno-- No!  It’s not porn if my pants are still on!  I scrolled down for a minute.  Everything was so on the nose with porn, it’s such a jarring experience.  To think that people create full systems on the internet to sort pornography down to the most niche shit imaginable, like ‘Amateur gazelle casting couch (didn’t know what she was here for???)’ or such instant classics as ‘Jacked-jackal cream-pied his gazelle teacher after class’ and of course who could forget the video journey that is ‘Gazelle girl asses close up| U Got That extended 1hr’ Jesus Christ I want the internet to not exist at this exact moment.

            Nothing stood out more than ‘Gazelle MILF meets new neighbor’ however.  It was the only video in the lineup that quite obviously had a human man in it.  Kyle had told me something in this vein once before.  Porn with human men and anthros was uncommon, apparently; as it usually got blasted with hate.  Kyle claimed it was blasted as bestiality, but I’d never really looked into it.  In the rare off-chance I actually wanted to watch porn I went to ‘furrlesss’.  It was all-human.  It wasn’t that I’d never seen the other stuff out there…  I just never gave it the time of day.

            One click was all it took to get instant regret.  Eighty-six percent dislike ration.  I whistled out loud just as the bad acting started, making me reflexively smash the mute key-combo.  Mike isn’t home, but I’m still shutting the door and using headphones: as is tradition.

            Some studly guy with no shirt was getting greeted to the neighborhood by a fairly big gazelle girl, not quite the same as Caitlyn.  ‘Thomson’s Gazelle’ according to the ungodly list of tags.  Her flimsy crop-top went flying off, leaving her in a bright blue bra, and her mouth got filled with dick out of nowhere.  High quality slurping and glucking noises flooded my ears while the camera followed her dark brown eyes up and down.  Moments before actually popping a hard one I felt my eyes roll up into my skull; as the guy decided to make grunting noises like he was trying to get the other half of a turd out.

            The gazelle having short horns bugged me the most, however.  Caitlyns horns were long, slender, and ringed.  This woman, on the other hand; had horns that were maybe only a few inches long.  I could see better matches to Caitlyn in the recommended, but didn’t feel inclined to click any of them for a closer look...  Mostly due to my lack of a desire to see some anthro dudes’ dick.  It felt a bit selfish really, pining for some human installment to the gazelle-girl-has-sex lineup.  I clicked a random matching video and read the tags.

            “Grants Gazelle.”  I spoke it aloud as I pulled the headphones off.  That’s what Caitlyn was.  Tiny black stripe down her side, and the facial markings were more similar.  God what a long, slender; brown body on top of two thick legs.  It was almost mesmerizing watching her contort her body and shove a small clear cylinder inside herself.  I pushed the headphones on to hear.  Some shitty pop song played in the background, and her moans were fake little oo's and ah's.  But when I leaned back farther; I could pretend she was… Somebody I recognized.  Yeah.

            To hell with it.  Works gone, so this is my distraction from my problems today.  It’s only fair, I’d already indulged the fantasy of black and orange stripes getting something white and sticky on them.  Caitlyn was a good looking woman and a soft kisser.  And it’d be rude to leave that big round ass with its bright white spanking-zone out of my fantasies…

            “James.”  I said aloud to make sure I heard the truth.  “You’re going to hell for this…”

================================================================================
Chapter 7: Soundtracks are for the unenlightened
Summary:

    MC goes out of his way to make everything awkward

Chapter Text

            Three weeks had slid by since the fire at the shop.  Barney had given us a stipend, and been giving us extended PTO out of his insurance, but the shop needed to be rebuilt and he was trying to sue the galvanizer to get the funds to do so.  I’d been staying out of my savings, but it was getting close to me not being able to keep my fingers out of them for much longer.

            Thoughts of money swirled in my head, distracting me from my current situation.  I thought up a joke, and I thought it up quick: “Do you think they add dust to the records to make them seem older?”  I’d turned to a giggling Sava who shushed me.

            She’d been insisting on hanging out ever since she found out about my work and my home invader.  It was both comforting and nerve racking.  The record store she had chosen had looked to be a good size, but once inside the place barely had room to walk.  It was also dusty as hell; the rickety old dog man running it probably didn’t get around fast enough to keep up with the dust.

            Record stores, to me, seemed like a strange fantasy; but Sava knew exactly where they were.  She claimed this was one of her favorites.

            “Check it.”  She held up a vinyl sheath with an airbrush mural of dragons with huge breasts shooting multi-colored lightning at one another.

            “Damn.  The, uh, nipple piercings chained together really bring the whole piece together…”

            She laughed out loud, and I sarcastically shushed her.  “C’mon, that’s definitely the best part!  You gotta like them for the covers, right?”

            “Oh yeah, it’s the allure of LP at this point, other than that analog kino.”

            “The what?”

            “Eh, you wouldn’t get it.”  Sava was like that sometimes: charming in her own weird way.

            I went back to rifling through the records.  “I recognize some stuff in here as recent…”

            “Oh yeah, lots of bands still release on LP just for the novelty.”  She had another strangely decorated record sheath in her hands: nude women riding on rats.

            “Does that say Rob Zombie?  I’ve never seen one that looked like that.”

            “Yeah, it’s a special print.  The album had some psychedelic art for the CD, but the vinyl…” She spun it in her hand, revealing the sides were different.  “Has some whack art.”

            “You seem to have a thing for breasts, Sava.”

            “Oh my God, dude shut up!  I do not!”

            “Show me your pile!  Show me what’s in your pile!”

            “Nooooooo!”

            “You’ve got like, six there; and at least two of ‘em got tits.”  She extended the pile to me, rolling her eyes, but I told her I was only kidding.

 

            It seemed like it had been a long time in the store, but not a second had passed at all in the outside world.  “All right.  Real talk.”  Sava spoke up as she admired her haul in the passenger seat.  “You’ve reached the end of your life.”

            “This shit is getting dark fast.”

            “Shush!  You’re there, right; so, tell me.  What song plays?”

            “Woah…” A lot of things came to mind.

            “It’s a hard one.”

            “What’s yours?”

            “Hey now, I asked you first!”

            “Yeah, but I gotta find excuses to buy time and think about it.”  It really was a difficult question.  Surely, plenty of people could answer it; but would it be the truth?  “It’s like, the end credits or something?”

            “I hate to put it that way.  The ‘soundtrack to my life’ thing seems cliché to me.”

            “Bad-girly?”

            “Pfft!  Yeah, sure.”

            “I guess if I have to choose one single song, it would be…  Shit, I don’t know.”

            “It’s fine dude.  You’ll find one eventually.”

            “What’s yours though?”

            Sava laughed.  “I don’t have one!”

            “What the fuck?!  Seriously?!”

            “I don’t know myself well enough to pick one song for life.”  Those words washed over me.  It was such a strange thing to say, but it also made perfect sense.  If you can only pick one, out of all of them ever; which one would it be?

            Hell…  Have you even heard the song yet?  With the car parked in the driveway, I turned to look at Sava.  She might have been looking at me, since her face quickly turned down to gather up her haul.  She had laid them all out on her lap admiring them, and now had to re-pile them to carry them out of the car.

            We crossed the lawn and got to the door, and I let Sava in.  Aparajita was on the couch and rolled her eyes at Sava as we came through the door.

            “More, Sava?!  Where are you even putting them!”

            “I traded some in mom, it’s fine I have space!”

            “You trade them in, you still waste money!  You leave with three and come back with six!”

            “Mom, c’mon; I already paid rent so it’s-”

            “It’s not about me getting money Sava, it’s about you still having it!”  I started inching towards the door.  Over the last three weeks I had also discovered Sava’s mom’s dislike of her audiophilia, as Sava put it.  Aparajita thought it was a huge money sink, but Sava wasn’t really advancing her collection all that much.

            “What are you going to do when you move out, huh Sava?”

            “Mom, I don’t-”

            “Is that why you have this man?”  She held her open palm out towards me.  “Is he going to take care of you?”

            “Mom!”  My wild discomfort is growing faster than a kudzu vine in a Tennessee baseball field.

            “Well?”

            “Mom, can we talk about this later…”

            Aparajita turned to me.  “Are you going to do that James?  A good, smart boy like you?  Will you marry my daughter and give her an allowance?”

            “Mom, oh my God!”  Sava had been grabbed by the shoulders and pointed towards me by her mother.  “You’re acting like you’re trying to sell me to my friend!”  That was a creepy thought.

            “If I wanted to sell you, I’d make you wear my old dress and necklace.”

            That was also a creepy thought.  It also conjured an ungodly curiosity in me.  “What do you mean your old dress?”  Sava’s face showed fear as she shook her head at me.  It was too late, however.

            “Would you like to see James?”  Aparajita could over ever look like a tender mother in all her expressions, even if her voice sounded like a lure.

            “I mean, I don’t know…  Do I want to see it?”

            “Oh, you absolutely do!”  She strode to the hallway where a door clicked open and closed in the distance.

            Sava turned to me, looking somewhere between scared and confused.  “I mean, do I not want to see it?”

            “Dude, I don’t wanna wear any dress; least of all my mom’s old one from Russia…”

            “Wearing a dress can’t be- wait, what?  Russia?”

            “She got the dress in Russia back when she was younger.”

            “Bullshit.  Why doesn’t she have an accent?”

            “Well, I mean; she went there to live with her aunt when she was already a teenager; and her aunt got her married when she was twenty-something.”

            “Twenty-two!”  Aparajita had returned, holding something white folded up, with a blue trim on the end hanging down.  She let it fall apart and stood next to Sava, holding the dress between them.  It was long and mostly flat, not some princess dress; just a tight-top with an accordion skirt.

            “Ew, mom; please no…”

            “You know, Sava; one day you’re gonna feel like a princess in front of your family and somebody else’s family too: and half of that feeling is going to be a dress.  A girl can’t live her life in…” She waved her hand in a circle at Sava.  “Shorts with extra pockets and boy-shirts…”

            “I guess I’m your son then, cause I happen to love cargo shorts.”

            “You got married in Russia?  In that dress?”  Curiosity was still getting the best of me.

            “Oh no, not this dress; this is the dress I wore to meet my husband.”  I stared at it for a moment, it wasn’t truly white, or at least it wasn’t as white as she was.  The blue trim on the neck; shoulders; hips and the end of the skirt made it look like something a princess would really wear.  Not like the movies, with the girdle and skirt cage, but a real princess.

            “You look stunning in that.”  The words just came pouring out of my mouth instead of staying in my head.  They were both staring at me, wide eyes on both with Sava looking confused and Aparajita looking…  Upset?  It wasn’t well hidden, but she was clearly trying to not frown at me.

            “I’m sure a good fifteen years ago I might have, but now I’m a bit old to look good in anything.”

            “No, you’d…” James fucking stop, holy shit.

            “Very flattering, but look here.”  Her tone was flat now, not as excited as before.  She held the dress over Sava directly, who this time didn’t protest.

            “I look ridiculous, right?”

            “No.”  I felt my mouth curl into a smile against my will.  “No, I think you should try a dress on sometime and give them another chance.”  Sava smiled too, and dodged eye contact.

            “Gosh…  Shut up dude…  I need to use the bathroom…” She covered her face with hand by placing her fingertips on her nose and leaving the palm over her mouth as she retreated from the room.  Her mom and I were left behind.  The air between us felt cold, and I didn’t like it for a second.

            “I really meant it-”

            “James.”  She was folding the dress back up but turned to face me.  “Drop it.”

            “I just, don’t want you to be upset with me-”

            “I’m not upset, but I might get upset.”

            She still had the softest expression, but there was some kind of hurt buried in her eyes.  But…  It’s just a compliment.  You’d look good in your own dress, that shouldn’t be a surprise.  She left the room with the article as Sava returned; rubbing her hands together.  “Let’s check these out!”  She’d picked the records back up.  “Hurry before mom gets back.”  Sava looked different too.

            “Right, yeah…”

 

            It didn’t last forever though.  She was back to her old self in no time, organizing her records.

            “Are yours alphabetized?”

            “Yeah, by artist.  Only way to do it dude.”  She slid a vinyl onto her shelf.  There weren’t nearly as many of them as she had CD’s.  The CD’s might be uncountable, in fact.  “James…  Do you…  Like my mom?”

            “What?  Yeah, your mom is great.”

            “No…  I mean…” Oh shit.  “Sometimes you…  Say things.  And…  Look at her…”

            “I…  I-I just…” Sava was looking at me with those big orange eyes growing more and more uncomfortable.  “Look, I just think that…  Your moms…  Kind of a, you know: she’s a good looking-”

            “Oh dude!  Duuuude!”

            “I’m sorry, I don’t…  Try to.”

            “That’s my mom, oh my god!”

            “Well, you and sister lied to me, first of all.”

            “No, we didn’t!  She’s all white!  It’s not…  Normal.”

            “Well, it doesn’t mean she’s ugly.”

            “Dude stop it, I don’t wanna talk about it!”  She shook her shoulders rapidly, like somebody who’d gotten the chills.  “Forget I…  Forget I asked.”

            “Sorry…  I didn’t wanna lie to you.”

            “Fucking stop!”

            “Alright.”  There was silence, save for her shuffling record sheaths.  She’d been mad at the last moment there.  I rolled the conversation out in my head, and felt scummy again.

            “You said you wouldn’t lie…  Right?”   Sava broke my concentration.

            “Yeah.  I don’t see the point in it, unless it’s super necessary.”

            “Do you think…  I dunno dude; do you think I’m pretty?”

            My heart missed a beat, and I felt surprise wash over my face.  I blink hard a few times before facing her.  “Yeah, I think you’re pretty.”

            “What’s…  What’s pretty about me?”

            “I…” I stared at Sava.  She wasn’t ugly really.  I couldn’t point to a feature and claim it was the thing that made her attractive.  Was Sava attractive?  “I dunno, really…”

            “What’s pretty about my mom?”

            “Thought you didn’t wanna talk about that.”

            “It’s important…”

            “I don’t know why I think she’s pretty either.  You guys just kind of…  Are.  Y’know?  I don’t know…”

            Sava hung her head and shifted left and right in her seat for a moment.  “A lot of beastfolk get a bad rep when they date humans.”  She sat up straight, and watched her finger trace circles on her desk.  “Humans, can’t tell when we’re ugly.  So…  Ugly girls go for human guys.  And ugly guys will go for human girls.”

            “I don’t agree with that.”

            “Why not?  You can’t pick up on what makes my mom…  Not…  So pretty.  So, you’re a perfect example.”

            “Your mom is beautiful to me for the same things that make her ugly to others.”  I scooted closer and pushed her shoulder a little.  “And I’m sorry if I made things weird by saying that.  I’m not exactly a good-looking human guy, I’m more average if not close to below average…  So, I guess anthros can’t tell when humans are ugly; cause I’ve been told I was hot before…” Thoughts of Caitlyn messaging me for the first time swirled in my head.

            “I guess it’s fine dude.  I just…  I dunno.”

            “Hey, it’s cool”

 

            Time marched on, until Sava started getting ready to go work her evening shift.   She led us up and out of her room; where she retreated into the bathroom to shower.   Aparajita came around the corner from the kitchen to see me.

            “James…  Listen.  You’re a good boy, I like you.  So, I don’t want you saying things to try to make me feel better and think you’re-”

            “That’s not it at all.”  She stopped and blinked.

            “You’re actually pretty, I think; and that dress would look good on you and Sava too.”

            “James, I’m not single because-”

            “Your ex was blind.  And stupid.”  She looked like she wanted to run away, her claws rested just above her nose with her padded hand covering her mouth, and I heard her swallow.  “Stop thinking you aren’t beautiful just cause you’re…” I waved my index finger at her up and down.  “Different.”

            “You don’t mean that.”

            “I just had this argument with your daughter, you know; and I didn’t tell her this, but I’m gonna tell you.”  She took a step back from me.  “You look…  Like somebody dug through the snow.  And found all the best snowflakes; put them together; and made them never melt.”

            Her face was frozen like a statue in shock.  Her eyes stared into my own, like she was waiting for me to double back and turn it into an insult.  She swallowed again and opened her mouth with her lip quivering.  “I guess…  Snowflakes don’t look as soft and warm and fluffy as you though…  So, I should, maybe find a better…” I started trying to think of a better way to phrase it, but she brought her hands back to cover her mouth as she spun around in a blur, going down the hall.  I watched her bedroom door open just to close behind her.  Every muscle in my body wanted to chase her, but I thought better of it.  I can’t just stroll in here and start hitting on my friend’s mom…

            I’d said my goodbyes.  I turned and headed out the door.

 

            The free time I had accumulated was maddening.  And there was only one thing to do with such copious amounts of free time…

            “Kyle, can you still cast Intervention on Dark Wizards?”

            “Yeah, but the duration is halved now.”

            “Right right…” I clicked on the Wizard in the corner and jammed the five key.  I missed my old mouse with the number pad on the side.

            With the room cleared we were able to cast recall to return to the prep hall for five minutes.  It was a nice added feature, one which Kyle claimed was just an easy-mode.  He was probably right.  I went over to my bed and picked up my phone.  Caitlyn, I swear to God I’m going to explain the entire videogame to you, no matter how many times you call it lame…

            ‘Pervy boy.’ Was all she wrote.  Wait, what the fuck?

            ‘What?  Why?’

            ‘ur a pervy boy that’s why.’ Bitch, I don’t have time for this.  I went back to the game.  Kyle has dropping prep in the chat, and I moved to get my many-colored potions from the transfer safe.  The phone buzzed again, and I lifted it.  Caitlyn had sent a link; I pushed it and set the phone down to let it load.  Potion of fire resistance, scroll of greater magic shield…  What else?

            Just when I went to take a swig of soda; the sounds of women moaning issued out of my phone’s speakers.  There was no time to find the mute button: I grabbed the headset cord and yanked it like I was trying to catch a fish on a line; ripping it out of the computer.  My phone kept moaning as I snatched it up; jabbing the small video player that had opened in the internet.

            What the actual fuck?  Did Caitlyn just dead-ass send me porn?  Who’s the fucking pervert here?!  I read the title ‘Best B-spot compilation#3.’ “The fuck’s a b-spot?”  The video had paused at a bunny girl with a half white and half black face.  That’s all it was though: her face.  I held the volume button down until it was almost silent before tapping play again.  She was making an awful over-exaggerated orgasm face, like those stupid anime-hentai faces.

            I watched for a moment as the camera panned out to reveal a man was holding her ear, rubbing the inside of it with a finger.  His other hand was…  Behind her neck?  She moaned and wiggled a bit just before the scene changed.

            A pair of bunnies, both nude and sitting cross-legged with their foreheads touching.  One had both hands moving over her own groin while the other…  Had her hand on the others neck.  What was going on?  What weird fetish is this?  It’s just people rubbing bunnies!

            My blood went cold.  People rubbing bunnies.  Just as it occurred to me what was happening, the scene changed again.  A little bunny in sports clothes was standing in a park with a man behind her.  There was no doubt about it either: that was Stacy.  I watched as her face shifted from frustration and into having wide eyes with her tongue sticking out.  A bit of drool fell out of her mouth, and she looked genuinely…  She looked like she didn’t know her own name.  Her hands in the video went up and grabbed the wrists on her neck just as the scene switched again.  I rewound it, and paused it.  Sure as shit, my dumb-looking face was looking down with a curious expression.  Surely the comment sections of a porn site can redeem my faith humanity…

            ‘Right in the middle of a park, can u believe that shit?’

            ‘I wish I was the bunny in the park!’

            ‘Cute!’

            ‘Hey boys, I am from and am now in from the US looking to meet hot guys; watch my cam show here!’

            ‘That guy in the park is doing it on accident’

            ‘Human guys rub the b-spot better cause they ain’t got no claws.’

            Jesus fucking christ, end my existence.  Can a I get porn video taken down just because my face is in it?  I scanned for a report button of some kind, or anything I could do to destroy this.  God fucking dammit why didn’t Bob Chandler cut down the internet when he had the chance?

            A flood of anxiety and curiosity overcame me.  I got in the group chat and told Kyle my headset was broken from me stepping on it and damaging the socket.  They forgave me, and I logged out.  Okay google, what the fuck is b-spotting?

            Sifting through porn sites and ads finally led to me a random fetish website with an installment on the matter.  Apparently, the ‘B-spot’ is a nerve cluster most rabbits have that, when stimulated; causes the brain to create a phantom numbing sensation on the skin, sending signals to the face and eyes that make an expression considered highly erotic.  Most rabbits can’t control this from happening, and it is considered a form of erotic foreplay.

            Great, so I gave a stranger in a park a sex massage as per the instructions of her friend.  Fucking stellar.  Caitlyn had been messaging me this whole time and I finally went to read them.  Christ that’s a lot of sad faces.

            ‘U never gave me a neck rub…  :(’

            ‘Do you want one?’

            ‘I do now u think I’ll make that same face?’

            ‘U got a random sex nerve in your neck?’

            ‘God I wish.’

            ‘Is there a way I can delete this though?’

            ‘Not unless you uploaded it.’

            Amy, you vile cretin.  ‘I know who must have.’ What was their apartment number again?

            ‘Yeah whos ur bunny friend?’

            ‘Not really friends, just my neighbors’

            ‘You b-spot your neighbors?’

            ‘I didn’t know what I was doing.’ The texting dragged on: a slew of Caitlyn claiming she needed a neck rub- all just to tease me.  I ignored most of it, and got my shoes on.  It was three hundred and six, I remembered her telling me…

 

            Building D, three-o-six.  I knocked on the door and rang the bell.  I went through my curse words in my head to make sure I was getting it across how rude I wanted to be.  The door swung open, revealing the exact opposite of a bunny.  A huge skinny dog looked down to see me.  She would have had to duck to get under the door.

            “Can I help you?”

            “Hi, I’m James; I got, uh; lied to by a couple of rabbits that they lived here…”

            “Oh!  If you mean Amy and Stacy…” She pointed at the room across the landing.  “That’d be them.”

            “Ah, six and seven both, uh; start with ‘s’, that’s right…  I’m sorry!”

            “Oh, it’s fine, they usually get back right around now, so…” She was strange looking.  Huge, and with short black hair on all of her body.

            “Sorry if it’s weird to ask, but…  What are you?”

            “I’m sorry?”

            “Sorry, what kind of anthro are you?”

            “Ah, I’m a Doberman-dane mix.”

            “I see.  Sorry.”

            “Oh, you’re fine!”  She chuckled.  “Most people just say ‘dog’ and leave it there!”  We bid farewell and I moved to the other side.  I knocked again and hit the doorbell.  In mere seconds the door swung open, revealing a small and confused bunny.  I didn’t quite recognize her…  Nope, there’s the scowl.

            “What do you want?”  Stacy grumbled.

            “Your roommate put a video of me and you on the internet.”  Her eyes went wide.

            “Fucking bitch!”

            She turned and made the softest stomps I had ever heard on her way back into the apartment.  I put one foot on the threshold before calling in.  “Is it alright if-”

            “Get your ass in here!”  And now I’m the living room, shut the door behind me.  “Amy get out right now!”  Stacy was hammering on a door, most likely in the other room.  “I told you to fucking delete it!”

            “And I told you I did!”

            “Fucking Jake is here right now!”

            “My name’s James!”  Things went quiet, but I heard them still talking.  I was tempted to get closer to eavesdrop, but decided to just sit down on the couch.  No need to make Stacy want to kill me again.  The two came around the corner, Stacy with her head almost on fire and Amy…  In a robe.

            “Hi James!”  Please get dressed.

            “Hi…  Amy.  Listen.  I had a friend send me a link today, to a porn site; and it’s got your video of me in it.  I kinda need you to delete it.  It’s really embarrassing…”

            “It shouldn’t be out there, I never uploaded it anywhere…” I fetched the phone from my pocket as soon as she began denying it.  I opened the web page and turned it towards her as the moaning started.  She lifted the plastic and glass rectangle out of my hand and stared at it.

            “Oh, your friend likes good stuff…” She stared at for a moment, grinning; until finally her face grew into shock.  Stacy too transformed her face: from one of annoyance into embarrassment.  “That’s not…  Oh no it is possible.”

            “Is that really what my face looked like…”

            “Yeah, nobody can resist the rubs.”

            “Shut up!”

            “I’ll prove it, if you like?”

            “Excuse me, first of all; how do we get rid of the video?”   My time was more valuable than this, as was my reputation…

            “Oh, yeah; we can’t.”

            I blinked hard.  “What?  What do you mean we can’t?”

            “I didn’t make that video.  I shared it in a private message with a friend.  She must have showed somebody who showed somebody who put it into a compilation…”

            “Are you fucking serious right now?”

            “Whats the big deal?  Not like anybody is going to-”

            “One person already did!”

            “And?  I’m serious dude, what’s wrong with it?  It’s like, the single softest core porn you do.”

            “I’m in a porn video, and I don’t want to be.”

            “Report it for consent abuse.  Here, give me his phone Stacy.”  Stacy had claimed the device and was staring at it.  She dragged her finger over it, and by the audio I knew she was replaying a certain part…

            “Did I really make that face.”

            “Everyone does Stace, it’s fine.”

            “Show me!”  She pointed the phone at Amy.  “Do the…  Whatever.  Show me.”  Amy took my phone and Stacy stormed back down the hall.

            “You can report it for ‘consent abuse?’”

            “Yeah, so since you didn’t consent to being in the video you were victimized; so, they’ll probably have to blur your face out to leave the part in.”

            I pinched my brow.  “Why do you know all this…?”

            “There’s been times I needed to, y’know; get my own face out…  You might have to prove to a site admin it’s you, as well.”

            A yell issued forth from out of the hall; “Get in here and show me!”

            “Oh, she’s serious…” Amy got up.  “Guess we better go show her.”

            “Whaddya mean ‘we’, why is this a ‘we’ thing?”

            “Oh, get your big human hands in here…” I followed Amy around the corner and into the hall.  Their apartment was similar to mine and mikes, but smaller; a one-room.  We found Stacy in the bathroom, tapping her foot with her arms crossed.

            “Why’s he here?”

            “He’s gonna do it again.”

            “What?  No, not his ass; you do it!  You’re my girlfriend.”  I don’t know how I didn’t pick up on their relationship before, but it wasn’t shocking in the least.

            “He’ll do it better.”

            “I don’t know if I want to do this.”  In fact, I’m quite certain I don’t want to do this.

            “Whatever, I don’t care, just show me!”  Amy pushed me further into the bathroom behind Stacy.  This is fine, it’s not like before…

            Amy stood between us and guided my hands back to Stacy’s neck.  “So, I just do it ‘til she sees, then we’re done.”  I wanted to make sure the rules were clear.

            “Yeah, uh-huh sure James.”  Bitch are you serious?

            Stacy’s jaw clenched as my fingers were guided to the spot at the top of her neck.  She was glaring at the face in the mirror like the one she felt like fighting was herself.  I rubbed my thumbs in how I remembered doing it before, watching her face.  She would squint really hard now and then but her glare held strong.  I sent my fingers rummaging through her fur again.  At the very least I could enjoy her fluff again…  I dug my thumbs a bit harder, and her mouth opened a bit.

            She snapped it shut and tried to glare again, shooting her glance up at me in the mirror.  Something moved in my throat…  It slithered down into my guts and finally…  Moved something in my pants.  I stared into Stacy’s eyes through the mirror, and felt a smile creep across my face.

            She had only started to shift her face into one of surprise when I dug my thumbs back in.  Her mouth opened wide, and her breast started heaving.  “You…  Shed you won…” She was slurring her words something fierce.

            Amy hugged Stacy from the side.  “Shush baby.  You said you wanted to know why I like it.”  She started biting Stacy’s ear.  “You’re gonna find out baby.”  It felt my own breaths start to take longer; my throat felt hot…  My cock was starting to hurt; pushing itself into my damn zipper.

            “Fuck…” I tried not to talk, but it was hard to sit still.

            “You doing okay, Jamesy-wamesy?”  Don’t fucking call me that, shit…  Why are you getting between Stacy and the counter- Oh holy fucking God.

            “Amy…  Amy no, what the fuck?”  Stacy grabbed the shoulders of her shirt loosely trying to stop her.  “James shop!”  I let go and took a step back.

            “Right.  Right.  Right.”  I couldn’t make a different word come out of my mouth as I looked down at them.  Amy was holding Stacy’s sweats down by her ankles; who retaliated by pulling on her ears.

            “What the fuck!  What the fuck are you doing!”

            “Stace, C’mon!  Ow!  It’ll be fun!  It feels so good, C’mon!”

            “No what the fuck is wrong with you!  You know how I-!”  She glanced at me for a moment.  Her eyes were filled with confusion.  She almost looked scared.

            “I know Stace, I know; it’s okay though…  We’ll get through this.”

            “Look I should probably just go, I don’t wanna-”

            “James it’s okay…”

            “No, fucking leave!  Both of you get out!  Just get out!”  She was screaming now, a soft thumping in the floor told me the downstairs neighbors didn’t appreciate it either.  I held my hands up and apologized as I left the bathroom.  Amy had to be yelled at one more time before following me into the hallway.

            “Look, I’m sorry about bothering you two; I just hoped you could get rid of that video.  I didn’t-”

            “Don’t apologize, I’m sorry that didn’t play out.  Or anything else for that matter.”  Are you seriously apologizing that your girlfriend didn’t want to get tag-teamed in the bathroom?  What the fuck is wrong with you?

            “Well, if she doesn’t want it, then neither do I; so, it’s simple.”

            “Stace just, kind of, hates men.  And I want her to get over it.  I try to flirt with guys with her, but she’s never down with it.”

            “I…  I got nothing to say to that; I think she should get over that at her own pace maybe?”  Wait.  There was something else in that sentence.

            “I think she is, it’s like swimming though; you gotta get chucked in the water or your never gonna learn.”

            “Is there…  A reason she doesn’t like men?  Also, why are you flirting with men with…  Your…?”  I didn’t need to finish the question; the answer had already arrived in my mind, and boy was it something…

            “It’s just to keep things fun, nothing serious you know.”  No, I do not know.

            “I don’t think I’m the guy for that, really…”

            “No, I mean we b-spotted her; and I know if she just tried-”

            “Maybe…  Discuss it with her first?  I’m sorry if I’m butting into your relationship, but seriously this isn’t anything I’ve done before.”

            “I just figured, y’know; you were looking into whether or not you liked anthros…  We could be your fuzzy friends.  It’s kinda hot too; since you’re so new to us, like I still gotta learn your whole name and everything!”

            “Yeah, not knowing me is a great reason to not fuck me.  And what does that even mean?  Fuzzy friend?”

            “I think humans call them friends with benefits?  But it’s different, cause usually it’s, like; all there is to it?  You never heard that?”

            “No…  I can’t say I have.”

            “It would be like…  Now.  Kinda.  Me and Stace would want a third, so we’d text you.  Y’know.  ‘Wanna be fuzzy friends tonight?’ A lot of people do it, my ex and I were fuzzy friends with a guy for a long time…”

            “Oh my fucking God…”

            “It’s not that weird.  People like sex, even girls like sex.”

            “No, that’s not it.”  It’s definitely a part of my disgust, but I’m not gonna say that to your face.

            “What’s up then?”

            “I went on a date…  And I’d heard that phrase somewhere…  And I said to my date I was happy to have a fuzzy friend…”

            “No shit?  What’d they say?!”  I just shook my head.  I had sat in my car and told Caitlyn I was happy she was going to be my fuck toy…  And she had scooted closer and said she was okay with the idea…  “C’mon!  Tell me!  Did you get slapped…?”

            “No…  She…  Realized there was misunderstanding and laughed at me.”

 

            “Amy, I’m gonna be real with you.  Your girlfriend is crying in the bathroom and it’s kinda fucked up that you still want to get it on right now.  Like, I’d go comfort her, but I’m pretty sure I’m half the problem she has right now.  I’m gonna go.  Maybe you should go talk to Stacy?”

            Amy had stared at the ground through it all, talking her hands off my stomach and my groin.  “Yeah.  Sorry baby, I hope I’ll see you later…?”  I ignored the question and got out the door.  Their neighbor had been looking out their own door, and was visibly stuck trying to decide whether or not they should go back in or try to talk to me.

            “Hi!”  I said, feigning a smile.

            “Hi…  Everything all right?”

            “Uhhhhh…  I just didn’t really know what I was going in for, y’know?”  I tried to give a short laugh.

            She smiled knowingly.  “They argue sometimes…  About, her being bi and the other being gay…”

            “I can see that stressing them out, yeah.”

            “A lot of guys come in and out; so, you hopping out might be best.”  Her telling me all this was strange.  Almost like she wanted to get it off her chest.

            “Yeah, it’s…  Not my scene.”  We just stood still for a moment, staring at one another.  I realized we both looked like we might have something to say, leaving me with no choice but to take my leave.  “Well, I’m gonna go text a gazelle; I think…”

            “Right!  Well, I, uh; am gonna get back to studying…”

            “Hey, good luck on that…” I patted at my pockets as she thanked me before closing her door.  My phone, however; was still inside the bunny burrow.  I turned back to shamefully knock once more, but the door pulled open and away from my knuckled before they hit it.

            To my surprise it was Stacy who stood there.  She lifted my phone up wordlessly, and I plucked it from her palm.  “Thanks, Stacy…  Have a good day.”

            “I’m…  Sorry.”

            “It’s not your fault, it got uploaded and I’m just gonna have to see if I can report it if I see it again, or-”

            “I’m sorry, if you got led-on by Amy.  I don’t…  I don’t date guys.”

            “Don’t apologize, you’ve probably got a reason at least; and I don’t know you well enough to…” I waved my hand at the apartment door, making her nod.

            “I really want to apologize for…  I judge you a lot.  And you, kinda; blow up my expectations every time.  I must come off as a bitch.”

            “I mean…  Now that I know there’s a whole man-hating thing going on, I guess I get it.”

            “Look…  Amy…  Likes guys.  Even if I don’t.  So, if you’re still looking to-”

            “Honestly, ruining your day like we just did; I don’t think I could go for it at all.  It’s fine.”  You are in an abusive relationship.  Your girlfriend is a pervert who isn’t putting you first, and you need to escape.  “Have a good one, Stacy.”

            I marched myself down the stairs.  I hope there’s never another moment I need to talk to them; because I might snap and call them both idiots.  Anyone who makes me remember Jade…  Needs to rethink their life.  I walked slower as the memories came back.  Meeting at the diner, complaining about the food; agreeing to come back.  Everyone comes into my life pretending.  Pretending to be normal.  Pretending they aren’t broken.  Jades small brown face and eyes came into my mind.  They even pretend that they aren’t evil.

            I digressed in my thoughts.  Somebody had been breaking through the wall of me thinking to myself…  Somebody was…  Singing?

            “Belongs now to the baby down the hall” A voice shook me out of my thoughts.  Some girl was singing behind me.  It had to be.  If the clicking of heels didn’t give it away the voice surely did…  “All my feeling’s coming back a-gain!  Like a rolling thun-der chasing the wind!”  Jesus lady, you’re real into it; aren’t you?  I was tempted to turn around…  In fact, I probably should turn around.  Something was stopping me though.  I felt goosebumps on my arm, the hairs shifting from the change in their terrain…

            “Forces pullin’ from the center of the earth a-gain…  I can fee-eel it…”

            I know that song…

            “Lightning crashes…  A new mother cries…”

            I’ve heard it before.

            “This moment she’s been waiting for…”

            I’ve heard that voice before…

            “The angel opens her eyes!”

            I’d stopped walking.  ‘Pale blue colored eyes’ is the line.  I know that song, I love that song; it’s one of my favorites…  But I can’t think of the name.  My hands were shaking.

            “Her deep gold colored iris…  Presents the circle, and puts the glory out to hi-ide!”

            I turned around and felt my blood run cold.  She was right there, singing to me.  She smiled and sighed happily, and I felt the urge to run for my life.  But could only stare.  She took in a deep breath.  And began the chorus out again…

            “Dhalia…?”

 
================================================================================
Chapter 8: When James met Dhalia
Summary:

    MC yadda yadda yadda some things happen, it's late and I'm drunk

Chapter Text

            She had stopped singing. Her tail was like a big bushy gray club, swinging back and forth at a surprising speed. “How are you, James?”

            Don’t talk to me. Don’t say my name, don’t exist. “What do you want?”

            “I came here to see you, of course.” Her voice was uncanny. It sounded cool and smooth, but she broke up her sentences in a strange mannerism. After a moment I realized she spoke almost exactly like Agent Smith did in the Matrix; only her pauses were a bit shorter.

            “Yeah, I wanna know what the fuck you want from me!” I’d gone from ice cold to burning hot.

            “James, you really shouldn’t yell.” She had begun walking towards me once more, and I felt myself backpedaling down the walk: stomach lurching telling me I was about to trip and fall.

            “Get the fuck away from me!”

            “Having me leave is a fascinating choice on your part.”

            “Yeah, how’s that?”

            “You get to run away while standing still, James.” She leaned forwards off her car, and made a clacking noise as she came to the side walk and started walking towards me. High heels. Anthros don’t often wear shoes.

            “I’m not running anywhere, now get the fuck away from me!”

            She was holding out her hand, looking at it. I could feel it too, small droplets starting to fall from above. “Stop yelling, James.”

            “Or what! What the fuck are you gonna do about it?”

            “I’m going to scream, James.” I froze in place. Back to being ice cold.

            “What do you want…?” The clicking sound persisted. Why did she wear heels? Most anthros complain that shoes rub the fur out of their feet, and even give them rashes.

            She was only a few feet away. Not enough for me to worry about her reaching out to touch me, but too fucking close. “I told you, James; I came here to see you.”

            “I don’t want to see you. I don’t want you anywhere near me, you fucking psycho.”

            “James.”

            “You broke and entered and fingered yourself in my bed; I’m not forgiving you I should have called the cops.”

            “But you couldn’t, cause you too were drawn to me. Unless there was some higher meaning in coming to my office? Was getting caught part of your master plan?”

            “Was it part of yours?”

            “Touche. But no.” She gave me that evil smile with one hundred razors once more. “I suppose we have that in common, James?”

            “I’m nothing like you.”

            Her hand came up again to catch more rain. “The only evil plan here seems to be the one where you get me wet and make this shirt see-through. Can’t we talk inside?” She held a hand out to catch the rain droplets.

            “I’d rather you were never in my house again.”

            “Yes, that’s part of the reason I came here today; I owe you an apology.”

            “I’m not letting you inside.”

            “Why not? Afraid I’ll see your dirty couch; warm beer; and freezer full of lonely-man-dinners?”

            “Why the fuck would you look in the freezer even? Seriously how fucked up are you?” She was just staring at me, looking down a bit. I looked down too, but couldn’t find what she saw. “What are you looking at.”

            “I’m seeing if your shirt will be translucent too.” I looked down again and saw my white shirt, realizing it was sticking to me.

            At any point she could scream bloody murder. Bring up a police report or some kind of hospital file about my escapade to her office. I didn’t have any room to negotiate. “Fine, we’ll talk inside! God fucking dammit!”

 

            I slammed the door behind her as she walked past me and into the apartment. “Apology not accepted. So fuck off whenever.”

            “I do realize that… Entering your home uninvited was inappropriate. And I have replaced your spare key.” Are you a real fucking person? Do you exist?

            “I don’t care if you’re sorry, I want you to stay away from me.” She just stared at me, like snakes might lunge from her eyes and bite me. “You’re fucking sick, you know that?”

            “I can imagine you’ve been able to assemble reasons to dislike me, James; but that’s why I’m here.” She wandered into the kitchen and took a coffee mug out of the cupboard.

            “You can leave now.” And she’s stealing one of Mikes water bottles to fill it instead of just using the sink. Great. Fantastic. Don’t even ask, bitch.

            “I’ll be polite for as long as I can, but I am going to get my way.” You aren’t polite.

            “You can’t manipulate me you fucking bitch, you have nothing I want.”

            “How much money is in your savings account?” Fuck… No, it’s fine; she doesn’t know anything. She doesn’t know shit about dick.

            “Enough.” She downed the water in the mug in an instant. Some old mug with a cartoon character on it my mom had given me when I moved out.

            “I bring it up because, simply put; I’m a bit concerned, James. Your work went up in flames.”

            “I still have a job. They’re rebuilding the shop and I’ll be back in no time.”

            “Being alive costs money. Especially when you don’t plan meals or cook too often.”

            “I don’t need any life advice from somebody like you. Are we not done here?”

            “I think we should still talk, James.” Another full mug of water, Jesus Christ just drink it form the bottle!

            “Talk about what?! Creeping into my house, and… And; touching my shit. Violating my fucking sheets!”

            “I didn’t want to do that, honestly; but I couldn’t help myself once I gave in and laid down.” Repulsive beyond comprehension.

            “Look. You apologized. Good for you. I don’t want your apology; I don’t accept it; I don’t need your handouts-”

            “Oh, you’ll work for it.” What the hell does that mean?

            “What, you need something welded? I’m thirty an hour.”

            “I can find something made of metal, I imagine. I had other tasks in mind for you.”

            “Like what?” Don’t make her think you’re actually curious James, you’re not doing anything for her. If anything you should… My heart started racing. I needed to move through the house, I needed to get to my room…

            “Who knows. I’m crazy, after all.” She opened the pantry and dropped the water bottle into the recycling box. I felt violated again. You can see the trash can. You have to know the recycle is in the pantry. “I need to use the bathroom James, just a moment.”

            Dhalia walked straight past me and down the hall to the bathroom. “Yeah, that’s fine; don’t even fucking fake it!” The door closed and I turned and placed my hands down on the counter top. I want to be angry at her, but her being so nonchalant is more infuriating than anything she’s done so far. How can somebody just pretend they did nothing wrong? Letting her in was a mistake…

            Something took over me like I was the little girl from the fucking Exorcist, and I grabbed the tainted mug off the counter top, instantly throwing it at the fridge. I shot my arms up in reflex just as it collided, feeling a few bits hit my shirt and arms. God fucking damn it James.

            The clacking sound returned from down the wall, Dhalia rubbing her hands together. Anthros with fur could never quite get their hands completely dry without doing so. She still looked entirely unfazed, even through this outburst.

            I shoved past her and started heading down the hall. I wasn’t getting a chance otherwise, and it made it even more perfect that she chased me to my room. “James. Show me your arm.”

            “You can see it from there. What was the other thing you wanted to talk about?”

            “Right now I’d like to talk about your arm. You’re bleeding James.”

            “It’s your fault.” Past the bathroom and into my room. I glanced towards the bed: the little black box’s handle could be seen.

            “All the more reason for me to fix it.”

            “I’d rather you-” I yelped as she gripped the arm tighter and turned it to examine where the wound must be. “God fuck off!”

            “We can pull this out and patch you up.”

            “I’ll do it my damn self!”

            “Swearing at me doesn’t close the wound.” You probably say that to three hundred snot-nosed patients a day. Who would let you touch them any way?

            “I’d really prefer to just-” Another stinging pain. I actually turn my head to look at her; only to find she’s holding an inch long piece of white and red glass in her fingers. She placed it on the counter, and I felt a hot line making its way down my forearm, a steady output of blood.

            Dhalia wrapped her fingers around my wrist now, and pulled me lightly. I grumbled and followed her back to the bathroom. I don’t have to explain that the first aid kit is under the sink, do I? Nope, she’s already reaching to grab it. She dabbed the wound with some scraggly cloth in the first aid kit before applying a big wide bandage.

            One bandaid later, we were back in my room. Dhalia had taken my chair by the computer. “I could have put a bandaid on alone.”

            “Probably true.”

            “What do you want?” I didn’t take my eyes off her for a second as I made my way to sit down on the bed.

            “James, do you have any board games?”

            “We are not going to sit here and play fucking battleship! You’re gonna tell me what you want; then I’m gonna tell you to fuck off; and then you’re gonna fuck off!”

            “I would beat you at battleship anyways.” Oh, we are not playing battleship you psychotic bitch.

            “Make this easy. Why are you… Doing this all to me?”

            “Are you asking why I approached you at the convention center?” She wouldn’t look away from me. It felt like a poker match the way were staring at each other. Come on, you’re on a fun little swivel chair: spin in a circle.

            “No, but sure; answer that.”

            “I saw you.”

            “Okay, fucking useless.” Turn around and use my computer, I bet you know the password too. On second thought, don’t do that.

            “It’s the truth. It’s where I saw you. I got dragged along by my coworkers to the some panel about gardening, and then I saw you. You didn’t see me, but I saw you.”

            “You weren’t there for speed dating?”

            “God no. I just lifted the queue rope and walked in.” When since I was a child I thought it was illegal to break those without permission. My mom had told me so while at the movie theater, and I believed her. Right now, I wished it was a felony.

            I felt my heart racing in my chest, and in an instant it stopped. She smiled once again; and began doing a slow turn in the chair. It was taking an eternity, but she finally turned her head forwards to follow her body; facing the desk in full.

            I reached down and lifted on the black handle, feeling the case still unlocked and slid my hand inside. My fingers stabbed at the hard foam until finally they slid over the cold metal. I knew it’s shape in the box and reached deeper to grab the handle. I thanks Styles as I slid his old Glock out from under the bed and clicked the safety down.

            Dhalia finished her twirl and met the barrel pointed at her with the same smug and disinterested face she always had. I wasn’t going to hesitate over it: Poker game is over now, bitch. “Get out.”

            “Or?” She stood up from the chair and I rose from sitting at the bed. Stepping to my right gave her a clear shot at the door.

            “How many guesses do you need?” I gestured with the gun, pointing it from her to the door before snapping it back.

            My heart sank into my gullet and stopped beating all together. She took a step forward.

            “I said get the fuck out, I’ll shoot God dammit!”

            “James, it doesn’t seem like you’ve thought through killing me very well.”

            “Don’t fuck with me.”

            “If you pull that trigger, you’ll make a noise heard by everyone in a mile. The cops are going to descend on you in no time.”

            “Don’t think I won’t do it.”

            “You can’t do it. You value your life too much. Your family would be distraught at you being in jail. Your roommate wouldn’t be able to make rent. All to kill an unarmed woman who is more than one whole foot shorter than you: who didn’t hurt you; and that you invited in.” Dhalia reached her hands up to her chest and began fingering at the buttons of her shirt. She popped the first. The second. And the third. I could see the purple string of cloth that held her bra together through her opened shirt. “And, you’re not some martyr; holy enough to preach ‘I did it to save the world from her!’ As though you’d do it for anything other than the fact that you and me are the same.” She took a step towards me, and I raised the glock again.

            “I’m nothing like you.”

            “Not yet…” She rushed me, leaving me to step back into the wall. Soft fur brushed my wrists as her fingers wrapped around them, holding the gun level with the center of her partially exposed chest. “You didn’t do it James. Even now: you’re not doing it!” She only whispered, yet it sounded in my ears like a scream.

            “Let go of me!”

            “Let me show you something funny!” Her thumbs felt their way up to my index finger and began pushing.

            I jammed my eyes shut. “No!”

            The gun… Clicked. My eyes opened as wide as they could and looked down. There wasn’t a hole in her chest, and not a drop of blood on either of us. I looked up and met her gaze. A warm smile greeted me, from the person I wanted it from the least. Her ears were set to the sides and her eyes looked happy. One of them looked like it had… Cracks?

            “James…” She cooed at me. “You see? You didn’t want to hurt me.”

            “Shut up…”

            “You cried ‘no’ at the thought of it all coming to fruition.”

            “I said shut up…” I could barely breath. Christ, what if it had gone off? I kept the gun loaded, doing anything else is asking to lose. “You fucked up that gun…”

            “James, I saw you there that day; your eyes were just like mine… I know it doesn’t make sense now…” Her fingers were still wrapped around the gun, and she slowly pulled on it. My hands were weak and numb, and so she eventually took it away; electing to set it aside on the bed. “But in time you’ll know I’m right.”

            “Just tell me all ready…” I turned to stare her square in the eyes. “What the fuck do you want from me?”

            She stared back for a moment, before she hummed quietly. She slowly laid herself against me with my back still to the wall, snaking her arms around my waist. “For now, I am quite satisfied; Thank you James.” I tried to hold my breath but she stayed wrapped around me for too long. She smelled strange, like a candle you bought once but couldn’t remember the smell of. I felt her face shifting against my chest: a gross nuzzling motion.

            After being silent for what felt like years, she finally released me. “You done?”

            “Yes, I am.” She ran her hands up and down my chest. Her claws were tiny and sharp, but she had enough control over them to not tear up my shirt. My phone vibrated in my pocket, causing us both to look down. “You need to take that?”

            “Anything on earth is more important than this.”

            “Hmmm.”

            I slid out from between her and the wall before wrestling the little brick out of my pocket. Oh thank God it’s Caitlyn. I turned to Dhalia before answering it; and contemplated shitting myself. She’d taken the gun back up, and racked a round. She admired the slide before looking up to face me with her evil grin. “Just getting it back how you had it.” She walked over towards the bed while I slid to answer the phone.

            With her back facing me I spoke into the phone; letting myself sound as nervous as possible. “Hey Caitlyn, what’s up?” Both of Dhalia’s dark gray ears flipped back to point to me as well as they could.

            “Hey babe, how’d the porn wars go?”

            “Porn wars?” I desperately wanted to get away from Dhalia, but couldn’t leave her alone in my room. Especially when she was the one with a gun. Fuck, why did I let her get ahold of it all? James, you’re a fucking retard.

            “Yeah, you were gonna go hunt down the bunny who posted the video of you b-spotting in public where everyone can watch?”

            “Yeah… It wasn’t her, but she showed me how to report it. I’m gonna stay away from her, I think she’s got some issues…”

            “Well then, Mr. James Gray; the only other order of business is the neck rubs for me!” Why was I excited when you called? God fucking dammit this is not the time.

            Wait. No, this is perfect; now actually is the time. “How about now?”

            “Wait, right now?”

            “Yeah, right now; you busy babe?” Dhalia’s ears went for another spin back forwards. She was… Making my bed. That’s fucking creepy God dammit. I should call the cops and face the music just to get her out of my hair.

            “Ooooooo, now I’m ‘babe’?”

            “You call me that?”

            “I mean, I hope it’s not mixed signals; but I call lots of people babe.” Say yes to me, just say yes and give me an out.

            “How about it?”

            “I mean, I don’t hate the idea of you calling me babe.”

            “No, coming to see you.”

            “Oh! I, uh; gosh… Maybe…” I couldn’t make out her mumbles, she’d set the phone down. Hurry hurry hurry…! “Maybe in like, an hour?”

            “Perfect. I needed an excuse to get out of the house.” I glared at Dhalia. She’d finished with the sheets and comforter, only to turn around holding up my pillow.

            “Yeah? All cooped up? Thought you were going on a hot date with what’s-her-name?” Her name is Sava, why do you pretend you can’t remember that? It’s two syllables.

            “That was yesterday. Today I played videogames and went to meet my neighbors.”

            “Lame.” Bitch please, only the later is lame. Dhalia was staring at me, huffing on my pillow like it was full of cocaine. My skin crawled, and I didn’t hesitate to let me shoulders shake to let her know. I am burning that pillow; the washing machine can longer save it.

            “Yeah, super lame; so lets hang out.”

            “Super sudden, but alright hon; in an hour, yeah?”

            “You got it. Crystals place?”

            “Yeah, in fact my evil plan today is to make you finally meet her.” Do not use the words ‘evil’ and ‘plan’, do not say anything Dhalia has ever said.

            “Sure, cool; let’s do that.”

            Dhalia stood like a bad mockery of a smitten schoolgirl; holding her hands behind her back and wagging her tail. Caitlyn had paused, and broke the silence. “James, are you alright?”

            I glared at Dhalia, the smug little demon still hadn’t even buttoned up her shirt. “I feel fantastic.”

            “Alright… Well, I’ll see you in an hour?”

            “Absolutely.”

            I jumped as Dhalia yelled out “Bye Caitlyn!”

            “Who’s that?” The scream in my head might have shattered my eyes like glass.

            “Remember that Dhalia girl? Well, she’s here right now.”

            “Your… Stalker?”

            “Yeah.”

            “Came to visit you?”

            “Yeah.”

            “James, hon; are you trying to mess with me right now?”

            “No, she showed up at my house to talk and I’m trying to kick her out.” She was, in fact; wandering around my room

            “Okay, James, honey; I’m gonna call the cops.”

            “Caitlyn, hold on!”

            “No, I’m calling the fucking cops unless you’re messing with me and it’s not funny!”

            “Caitlyn, listen I’m not lying but I-”

            “’Kay hon.” The line went dead. Oh shit. I whipped back around to find Dhalia missing. I threw my phone to the bed and checked the hall; spotting her tail poking out from the kitchen. She was cleaning up the fucking glass, God dammit get out of my house! If the literal law dogs are on their way here now, then I’m the one in a worse light. I’ve got no evidence other than my word, and it’s a miracle anyone has been believing it…

            “Okay. She’s calling the cops, you need to go right now unless you want me in jail.” Lying isn’t going to do me any good at this point.

            “Hmmm. Well, then I guess you get your wish James.” She put the glass shards into the dust pan and dumped them into the trash. “I’ll see you later then?”

            “That would be the opposite of my wish.”

            “Hmmm. Then no, your wish isn’t coming true.” She walked past me, clicking loudly; and pulled the door wide, the air outside finally showing that the hot days of summer were gone, and the chilly evenings of autumn were upon us. I held my breath, for fear it carried her smell into my home once more. “I love you, James. And call me!” One last glance of golden eyes before the door closed quietly enough to let the mice stay asleep.

            I wanted to scream. I wanted to destroy everything. But first: I’m stuffing that God damn pillow into the trash.

 

            The police showed up about forty five minutes later. They claimed they’d been called over a suspicious individual breaking into apartments. A female gray fox, they said. I told them I’d seen a female fox who was gray all over in the area frequently; and received a hollow promise that they would drive by the area more frequently. I knew at best however; that they would catch that pot smoking asshole who stinks up the parking lot three times a week, so at least he’d be gone. Hopefully. Doubtfully.

            Back inside my apartment my cell phone had rang three more times. All Caitlyn. I was almost mad at her, but she had covered my ass in the end. Call her back, James; quit staring at the button and press it.

            Caitlyn believed me. My insane circumstances was something that gazelle decided to take in stride. The phone rang for a minute before I heard her voice sound over it, the popular girl with her mall talk voice sounding back to me.

            “James? Hey, did the cops get there?”

            “Yeah, they came.”

            “I didn’t tell them everything. I felt like you didn’t want me to.”

            “Yeah, they were just looking for a gray fox, so yeah.”

            “I know you didn’t want me to.”

            “Yeah…”

            “Are you mad at me?”

            “I can’t be.”

            “Why not? I did the opposite of what you wanted.”

            “You did what you thought was right. Hell, maybe it’s what I should have done to begin with.”

            “Did they arrest her?”

            “No, she left.”

            “You let her go?”

            “Caitlyn… I broke into her work. That’s the truth. I did it thinking I could figure out what was going on and got caught by hospital staff. If the cops arrest anyone, it’s gonna be me; all she has to do is say I lured her here and I’m in fucking jail for stalking.” She was silent. Silent enough I checked that I was still connected before trying to continue. “I… I’m sorry I never really told you. But it means the world that you believed me. I don’t think anyone else would. I know more people who wouldn’t believe me, in fact.”

            “Okay.”

            “Sorry, I just kinda came pouring out for a second there.” I rubbed at my nose, burning up to make tears like a bitch. What’s the matter James; getting stalked by a girl making you emotional? Some men are out there praying for that shit!

            “It’s fine baby, I just don’t really know what to say is all…”

            “It’s fine. I’m sorry for dodging the question last time. It was just…”

            “Super embarrassing?” Yes, thank you; it was.

            “I’ll just let you go. It’s been a really long day for me.” The sky outside was going from blue and white to orange and yellow. It’d be dark soon.

            “Send me your address babe.”

            “What?”

            “You promised me a neck rub, and I’m getting it.”

            “You just want me to come over and meet-”

            “No. Now send me your address.” I relented. I guess it doesn’t matter where we try to hang out. I stayed on the line while typing it in and hitting send.

            “Sent it.”

            “Yeah, I think I got it. I’m gonna come over then, I’ll see you in a bit?”

            “Yeah, see ya.” The line went dead again. This was nice, at least I didn’t have to leave the house at all and could communicate with one of the more sane people from the cast of new installments to my life. Some part of me wanted to call Sava too, she was a good friend and I didn’t see her enough… Even if I had just seen her yesterday. I’d better not, it just barely stopped raining and it’s getting late.

 

            My phone buzzed in my hand. Caitlyn was texting me that she was here, instead of coming up and using the door bell like a functioning adult would. It’s fine, it’s cool: I’ll just text you back to come up. I’m not mad. I don’t think you’re childish. It’s cool.

            I walked down the hall and to the front door, where I stood in the threshold. The air was even colder than before. Out on the landing I heard the hard clack of hoofs coming up the stairs. First I saw her horns; then I saw her head; and then I saw the big poofy tan-colored coat she’d chosen to brave Antarctica.

            “Hey Cait… You cold?”

            “God no, burning up actually.” No shit. “How are you?” I let her past me and into the apartment.

            “Eh. Good as I was earlier.” Except it was just the threat of going to jail earlier, and now I have to be verbally battered about thinking an older woman isn’t albino Jabba the Hutt.

            “Yeah.” She was turning her head slowly. “Home alone?”

            “Uh, yeah. Don’t know where Mike is, come to think of it.”

            “Didn’t think about that before I came over.” She laughed a bit while I pulled my phone back out. Texted Mike asking where he was.

            “It’s no big deal I don’t think. He knows about you.”

            “Yeah? What’d you tell him?”

            “Just your name and that I’m going to go see you. We have kind of a rule between the two of us in case something happens: we say that we’re leaving and where we’re going.”

            “Dunno honey, sounds kinda paranoid.”

            “Yeah, but if Mike is hurt or something right now and they need to find him; I know the last place he was.” My phone buzzed back. I sighed and rolled my eyes.

            “Your boy bleeding out?”

            “Nope. Went to the bar after work with coworkers.” I shoved the phone back in my pocket. “Bad example.”

            “Nah I get it hon. That’s good though, like I said should have checked first.”

            “Why, you don’t wanna meet Mike?”

            She’d unzipped her coat and started peeling it off. “I’d wanna make, y’know; a better first impression.” She was wearing just about as little as possible. Lime green tank top and a pair of daisy dukes. Scratch that: she strolled in here in a denim thong.

            “Yeah. Woah.”

            “Yeah, I know! I’m sorry hon, I probs look kinda like a prostitute, right?” She turned around and flopped the coat onto the kitchen counter. I hadn’t needed to look up the pictures and videos on the internet after all. Nothing got left to the imagination, even those sweet white stripes. She turned back around to face me and swung her arms loosely. “Sorry about… This.”

            “You, uh… Wow.”

            “Sorry. These are what I had at Crystals’ place. I got a bunch of ketchup on my actual clothes, so I went to wash them in her washer…” She tried to take her phone from the coat and put it in her shorts pocket, but gave up fast and simply held it. “I had these left over at her place from when we went to a rave a couple years ago. You called, and I forgot that this is what I had on.”

            Don’t say something stupid James, don’t say something retarded. “You want a tour?” Mission failed.

            “Yeah, what’dya got hon?” She smiled and let me start pointing my finger at obvious landmarks about the small apartment.

            “Down the hall is Styles room on the left; bathroom on the right; then laundry closet and then my room on the end there.”

            “Small place. I thought you made big bucks making metal stuff?”

            “Kinda, but this is better for saving money. Buying a house one day, or at least the down payment on one.”

            “Right. White picket fence, dog named Spot?”

            “Something like that. Maybe. Sometimes I just feel like I’m going through the motions. Get job. Get house. Get wife. That kinda thing.”

            “I know that feeling, babe.” The word choice made me curious.

            “How many people do you call babe?”

            “Oh? You jealous of all my other boyfriends I’ve got kicking around?”

            “If anything I’ll get out of your way and let you date them.”

            “Boo!” She pouted. “Giving up on me that easy?”

            “There’s better guys than me out there.”

            “How many boys have taken you out on the best date ever?”

            “I’ve dated exactly zero guys, Caitlyn.”

            “Yeah honey? Zero? Guess you don’t get to say there’s better than you, huh?” She poked my side. Being like this was strange: she looked like I could find her on a corner and give her twenty bucks to commit a crime all over the front of my pants, but at the same time it was natural because it was Caitlyn. Full of surprises.

            “How many boyfriends have you had?”

            “S’a rude question honey…”

            “Sorry.”

            “Does it matter?”

            Yeah it kinda does. “Not really, I guess.”

            “I don’t really care how many girlfriends you’ve had. Lots probs.”

            “Not really. Just the two.” She was fidgety. Rubbing the hard tips of her fingers together like somebody who might try to clean their fingernails would.

            “Yeah, and one was psycho. So… Forget about ‘em!” She flung her arms out wide for a moment before laughing.

            “You want something to drink? Wanna sit down?”

            “Hon, you didn’t show me your room though.”

            “It’s… Pretty boring.”

            She laughed. “It’s not full of crazy metal stuff you made?”

            “I think you’ve misinterpreted my job.” She started walking down the hall and I followed. Something felt weird about the situation. It wasn’t the feeling I found myself expecting: the horny kind of feeling. Every fiber of my being somehow knew that sex wasn’t on the table.

            I didn’t find myself let down, on the contrary I didn’t really want to do it with Caitlyn right now. Knee length skirt with halter-top Caitlyn sure, but not… Smeared makeup taking the subway home Caitlyn.

            She wandered right into my room and stood at the threshold. She was mumbling to herself just a bit, and something lurched inside me. Was she high or something? She entered and went straight towards the bed. By the time I was in the threshold at her spot she was already sat down on the side, bouncing lightly.

            “Small bed hon.”

            “Yeah… Listen, are you all right?”

            She rolled her eyes, smiling at me from there. “I’m fine baby.” She grinned; her black lips contrasting with wide white teeth. “Come here for a minute, yeah?” Her head shifted left and right slightly. “Hey, where’s your pillow?”

            “I, uh; threw it out. Dhalia, she-”

            “She’s not here. It’s just us. Grab that pillow from the living room then, right babe?”

            “Yeah…” It was pointless to try to find out what was wrong directly. But something was wrong; Caitlyn was extremely nervous.

            Out through the hall and into the living room. I grabbed the square pillow off my chair on the side of the living room; not that I ever used it. Spinning it in the air and catching it as I turned around: I spotted Caitlyns jacket still on the counter. God it was a shiny desert color; super shiny in fact. I stepped closer and saw the tags on the inside of the armpit. Did she just buy this? She didn’t have to run into a store looking like a whore and get a coat just to cover herself before seeing me right?

            I looked down the hall as I peeled it open a bit. It was definitely a brand new coat. There’s a mystery afoot, so let’s get together to search for clues James; can’t keep a girl waiting…

            Back in my room Caitlyn had sprawled out and laid on her side on the bed. “Come put it under my head, like a princess.”

            “Is that what people do with princesses?”

            “Don’t’cha know?”

            “I thought that princesses got saved from dragons so they could get back to wandering around in dresses designed to be tripped over.”

            “Nobody is gonna save me from a dragon.” The line came out in a somber way, one that made my skin crawl as I squatted down and gestured with the pillow.

            “Have you ever tried?” I tried to match the tone, but could hear myself failing. “Go find a dragon: no way a guy is gonna pass up the chance to save you.”

            “Would you save me?”

            I don’t know. I doubt I could kill a dragon. “Sure, why not.”

            We stared at each other for a moment, looking into each others eyes. Caitlyns eyes displayed an emotion that was both familiar to me; yet alien. I slid the pillow in as she silently raised her head. “Thanks James.”

            “So, you just gonna take a nap then?” I got goosebumps again. Caitlyn hadn’t looked at her phone even once the whole time she’d been here. She had left it on the floor by my bed, in fact; going so far as to not even use it while I was gone to get a pillow.

            “No, dummy; rub my neck.”

            She rolled onto her stomach and left her head turned on the pillow to keep her horns out of the way. I rolled the desk chair over to sit on while I reached out and placed my hands firmly in the same region: my thumbs nestled at the base of her skull. “Y’know if B-spotting is for bunnies, then would a gazelle mean I’m actually hitting the g-spot?”

            “James no, eww!” I rubbed my thumbs deep in as I had my giggle. “You’re not actually looking for that, are you?”

            “No, I thought this is what you wanted though?”

            “No babe, I wanna neck rub; I already know where my buttons are.”

            “Where are they?”

            “Ooooooo! Wouldn’t you like to know?” I switched to pushing my thumbs from the base of her skull downwards. She’d closed the one eye I could see, making her look like a peaceful sleeping beast. A beast with her fat ass trying to escape her shorts. Her fur stuck up and poked out where the frayed ends met them, an odd display.

            What really got me however was the colors. Her sides were all tan just like a long desert, and the inner thigh was a dull eggshell white; the two separated by a thin black line. I bet if I walked to the edge of my bed and looked from there, the white striped out on her flanks would like racing stripes down that big, round, soft, fluffy-

            “Y’know…” That condescending tone. I’ve been had. “I thought you might like it a little, but you’re kinda staring babe…” I turned my head up from my caboose examination.

            “Sorry, Cait, I really don’t mean to. It’s just been a while.” I kept my eyes towards her head while I moved down again to dig into her shoulders.

            “Hmmm pervy boy. How long?” She shifted left and right, letting me tell myself she was at least enjoying it.

            “Eh… You know… Six years.”

            “Oh.”

            “What’s wrong.”

            “Nothing, it’s… I’m not mad at you, I hope you know hon. A little embarrassed maybe. I should have thrown these out to be honest.” She picked at the shirts edges a bit, moving the subject back to her clothes. “I just wanted dumb boys to buy me drinks.”

            “Why not just buy your own?”

            “I… Wasn’t twenty-one the last time I wore this.”

            “Ah.” I guess girls really do dress like sluts to get free shit. I mean, I knew that… But I didn’t know it.

            “You probably think I’m such a whore. I never, y’know, did anything for them. Just… Show up looking like I might.” She had stopped wiggling from the rubbing.

            “I don’t think you’re a whore, Caitlyn.”

            “I really didn’t do anything…”

            I tentatively believe you. “I believe you.”

            “What if I was?” That look was back in her eyes. “Would you still like me? If I was…”

            “On one condition.” I know where I wanna take this now. You brought this upon yourself; you should have slapped me and called me a pervert when you had the chance.

            “Yeah? What condition hon?”

            I reached up and slid my hand over the back of her leg. She jumped a bit at the touch and her short-rope of a tail wagged a bit. “You gotta be my whore.” Wow James, that didn’t sound fucking stupid at all.

            Caitlyn giggled in an almost masochistic manner. “You mean I gotta dump all those other boys?”

            “You haven’t already?” I let my sarcasm flow out and stopped stroking her leg. God it felt good going one direction: her body was soft and following the grain was satisfying; yet when I pushed back against it the short strands it was a whole different sensation: like

            “Hey!”

            “What?”

            “That spots cold now…” She wiggled in place, rotating her hips deep into the bed. “You gotta put your hand back.”

            Boner, please; stop ramming into the zipper: it hurts. “Yeah?”

            “Now!” She wiggled faster, and I replaced my hand. God she was crazy to feel up. The fur would be cool to the touch for only a moment before her body heat- and good God did her body have heat; finally spread to my hand. I slid it up, unashamed; and let my grip grow firmer and firmer against the brief fold of skin where her rump became her leg.

            “Warm again?” I jeered.

            “Burning up…” She curled her fingers burying them into the pillow. “You like that ass?”

            I can play bold. I can play bold until you get scared and give up, and that will be even more cute. “Fuckin’ love it.” I slid off the chair; thudding my knees on the ground. I leaned my head down next to her. I opened my mouth wide and put the fur covered bit of jiggly cheek into my mouth, trying to bite down but feeling her recoil at the pinching of my teeth.

            “James!” She squealed, turning over onto her side and depriving me of biting further. There were lengths and lengths of rope tied up inside me coming unfurled. Come back here. It’s been six fucking years you little slut. Let me touch you. Bite you. Feel you. Outside for a moment, then the inside for a while.

            “Give it back. I’ve got a need.” I was still panting. It wasn’t that I couldn’t catch my breath: I could in fact breathe fine. But every breath through my nose brought Caitlyns scent in stronger and stronger, and my breathing became slower and more labored every second. It was flooding every sense, just as good sex should: I could hear; feel; see; touch; taste; and smell Caitlyn.

            “James you don’t get to eat my butt!” I’m not gonna eat ass, that’s nasty; I just wanna bite the cheek really hard. She rolled back onto her side to sit up on my bed again. She reached out and placed her hands on the tops of my thighs, leaving us both without any hesitation.

            Our foreheads bumped together and we gave short laughs before pushing our lips together.

            God it was warm. Hot even. The short smooth fur on her face didn’t poke me or discomfort me at all. I awkwardly placed my hands on her cheeks and stroked them softly on my way to the back of her head. I might not be an amazing kisser, but God it felt good the feel the soft brushing of Caitlyns lips against mine turn more and more wet. My chest was thudding almost in sync to soft smacking noise of our mouth-melding. I wanted to feel Caitlyns tongue. Just a little longer and I can justify…

            She broke our lips apart. “James?”

            “Yeah?” Come back, kiss more God dammit…

            “I didn’t ruin my other clothes. I changed into these before coming here…”

            “… Yeah?” Some vague memory about her coat approached me. I didn’t care; I was still panting for some reason. Everything was hot, burning even. “Why?”

            Caitlyn moved her head at a speed of about one millimeter per hour, or so it felt. She put her lips right into my ear after what felt like an eternity of hot breath flowing across my neck she finally whispered to me. “Cause I wanted my boyfriend to fuck me like I really was a whore…”

            Instinct overtook me. I wasn’t human anymore, just an angry and horny animal. I couldn’t stop myself if I wanted, and funny enough I didn’t want to stop. I heard her cry out ‘oh shit’ and ‘James wait’ as my fingers wrapped around the first bend in her leg and grip her tightly. I lifted her up like she weighed nothing, her strange hard fingers digging into me to hold on for dear life.

            I threw her onto the bed, a short and terrified eek of some kind emanating from her. Everything she said was a blur, and I felt like I might die if I stopped. Still though: her voice broke through to me.

            “James!” I had gotten on top of her, my knees placed outside her own. I was so close to having everything with her. Every hot sweaty thing between us; moans and all.

            “What?”

            “Calm…” Her hand was on my chest, pushing slightly. You look silly like that, you couldn’t stop me. “Calm down…! Jesus…”

            “I can’t, Cait.”

            “You’re like a wild animal…”

            “Why did you stop me?”

            “You were scaring me, hon…” This isn’t what you just said you fucking wanted?

            “It’s okay…” I reached down, replacing my hands into her hair. Long blonde and just slightly curly. I pushed our mouths back together. Gotta calm her down James, don’t fuck up. My heart was trying to break a rib, and only worsened as her hands wrapped around my neck.

            I reached down and slid my hand up and down her side, feeling her fur moving underneath the shirt. I bet Caitlyns tiny tit will fit just inside my hand. I squeezed her lips between mine for longer and longer, sliding my hand lower to find the bottom of her shirt.

            Foreplay is such a pain. I can despise it only in my head. I slide down to the belt line and move to the fur on her butt. God my fingers could really sink into it, I needed to remember to feed her just a few more bean-burgers…

            Caitlyn pushed on my chest until I rose a bit, and jumped as one of her legs slid out from between mine. She wrapped it around the back of my own leg.

            So close, God so close… But in another instance it was snatched from me. Caitlyn broke our mouths apart once again. Concern laced her eyes, and with an awkward and shaky voice she elaborated: “Hey James?”

            “Yeah?”

            “You got a condom babe?”

            The front fucking door opened. Michael Little I am going to fucking strangle you to death. You will not rue the day, you are going to die and I am going to kill you. We had already let go of each other; my eyes darting to Caitlyn. “James, shut the door!” She whispered.

            I rolled off the bed and ran to the entrance just as I heard Mikes keys crash onto the counter; and spotted him from the threshold. He saw me too, the wobbling little cock-blocker. “Dude, Jaaaaaames!” Shut the fuck up I will fucking laser you with alien fucking eyes; and explode your fucking head, shut the fu- Try fucking a Gazelle? Okay then.

            “Mike, how were your friends?” I slid into the hall and closed my bedroom door behind just as Mike came hobbling down the hall, arms outstretched for a hug. He awkwardly grabbed my shoulders and held them tight.

            “I kept telling them you shoulda come man, they had girls like four feet tall man, they were bunnies and they were actually kind hot man!”

            “That’s crazy, I didn’t know that any bars stocked bunny’s.” Go to bed you drooling retard I hate you so much right now.

            “Bro, you keep seeing that tiger; when are you gonna do the deed?!”

            “Ah, yeah; one of these days maybe.” If only you knew.

            “You gotta fuck your tiger James! That’ll be rad…”

            “Yeah, well maybe I’ll just set you up with her friend and you can do it.”

            “Bro she’s got a friend?! Nah dude go get two kitties! Get your girlfriend and her friend.”

            “Mike, c’mon lets get you to bed.” I couldn’t hide the annoyance in my voice.

            “I need you to wingman for me James! How do I get in with the bunnies?” I was just pushing him into his room. He was saying things. Things I didn’t care about.

            “Let’s just get you in bed Mike, you’re hammered and you need to wake up bright and early tomorrow to deal with your hangover.”

            “You spend a lot of time with that Gazelle too. You see those anthro girls more than you see Styles now…” That might be true, but you have cheated me out of losing my second virginity: the one anthro girls take from me.

            “Bed. Now Mike.” I had pushed him into his room. I finally shut himself in his room after he flopped onto his bed- shoes still on.

            I dashed on my tip toes back to my room to find Caitlyn still laying there, looking annoyed. “Help me up.” Her voice was just as angry.

            “I’m sorry about Mike, he’s gonna black out soon, we can still talk and-”

            “I just want to go home right now, James. Please help me up, my horn is stuck in your mattress.” I leaned to get a better look. Fuck, it really was.

            “When did that happen?”

            “You threw me at the bed! Actually threw me!” I placed a hand on the mattress and helped her withdraw the horn.

            “I’m sorry about Mike, I really… He usually crashes at his coworker Justins house on nights like these.”

            “Look, it’s fine. I’ve been the girl in the middle before; I just prefer to not know, all right. All that shit’s on you then, but now I’m helping.”

            What? “What are you-”

            “Oh God, just stop James; really? You’re gonna pretend I didn’t just hear about your girlfriend?”

            “Sava? No, it’s not like that with me and her!”

            “Right, your roommate just calls her your girlfriend nonchalantly and bring me up as a side-note. Sounds like a side-bitch.”

            “Caitlyn please, really; we hang out at her moms house and listen to music!” She was finally quiet: listening and staring. “Fuck, she calls me bro all day, and gets mad at me cause I think her mom is good looking.”

            “You go to a girls house. Listen to music. And tell her that her mom is hot?”

            “I… Know how absurd it sounds now that I said it out loud.”

            “She’s not your girlfriend?”

            “No.”

            “Prove it.”

            “I… How?”

            Caitlyn still wasn’t smiling. She just started to storm down the hall, her hoofs clacking firmly on the fake wood flooring, until finally she had her coat back in her hands. “Come to a party with me.”

            “How does that-”

            “Bring her.” Oh. These are different stakes indeed. “Is that a problem?” I realized I was simply gawking at the idea.

            “I mean… I always thought it would be funny if you two met.”

            “Funny?”

            “Yeah. I mean, Sava’s kind of a tomboy; and you’re… Not?”

            “Cause I’m not a tomboy it’s funny. Right.” She punched her arms into her sleeves, putting the coat back on. Jesus fuck I’m not dating a tiger just because my drunk roommate wants me to.

            “Caitlyn…”

            “Some friends…” She pulled her hair out of the coat, fluffing it a bit. She’s really storming out over this, holy shit. “And I, have a solar party once a year. It’s our little excuse to get drunk and hang out for a week.” She turned to face me. “And… I’m inviting you and your real girlfriend to come.”

            “How many times do I have to say she’s not my girlfriend, my drunk fucking roommate-”

            “You don’t even have work, so you can make it. It’s in one month, so… I’m not seeing you until then.”

            Fucking bullshit. You are a fucking child and I shouldn’t have to waste my time with your game you invented over not believing me. “I’ll… Invite her. To your party.”


================================================================================
Chapter 9: Come see the stars
Summary:

    MC gets informed he's a moron mere moments before becoming a gigolo.

Chapter Text

            Caitlyn would still answer messages.  It was necessary I guess, seeing as how I needed to prove that Mike was just drunk and stupid.  I looked at him on the couch, looking depressed and mashing on his controller.  I’d spent his morning by first asking when his hangover was done so I knew he was sober, and then by explaining to him what he’d gone and done.

            I had a new problem, however; much more pressing than all of that.  I looked back at my phone on the counter as I ate breakfast standing.  Bills for last month were paid in full, but we were running low on food, and bills for next month were coming up.

            I needed money, and I’d been offered one way to get it for sure.  This was assuming Dhalia would actually pay me anything and wasn’t trying to trap me in a metal box somewhere to poke me with a stick through a porthole.  She’d left her business card on my desk, as it turned out; and had written another phone number on it.

            Back in my room, I looked at it again.  I opened the book on Donovans Syndrome again, and found it signed.  Jesus Christ, get over yourself.  I started flipping through it.  Passages and passages about people…  Scratch that, just hybrids…  Talking about their medical history.

            Apparently, many of them have bone problems.  Guess that’s where Dhalia comes in.  Maybe she’s actually caring, saw that hybrids with a consistent problem; and addressed it.

            “Nah.  Too much of a psycho…”  I still went through the book.  ‘Hybrids often become the victims of their parents relationship, and misunderstandings about inter-species compatibility.’  She’s harping on about how messed up a digestive tract can be from a hybrid of a carnivore and a herbivore; creating a creature that has the teeth for meat and the stomach for grass, and leading into an offspring that desires a high protein diet, but consistently gives itself sickness.

            All of this, however; is apparently the result of hybridization between varying types of anthro; and functions as a prologue to the book.  ‘Donovans Syndrome’ is apparently a mental disorder, according to Dhalia.  It is the behavior of wanting to ‘purify’ ones genes, and is notably the result of a hybrid between a human and an anthro.

            ‘Compulsions to find sexual partners that are those of the same species of the parent are highly unique to Donovans Syndrome, as it was with Donovan Carter.  Donovan was aged 14 and deemed sexually mature in human terms: his mother being human; when his compulsion began.  Donovan was exploring partners sexually at this time, and was expelled from three schools for such when caught, and eventually had been removed from his parents custody under assumptions of abuse.’

            Kid was horny, and that’s a big deal?  ‘After years of therapy, it was discovered that Donovan had been expressing sexual attraction specific to his fathers species: A Golden Retriever.  This manifested in a fascination with this half of him.  Donovan bore all the traits of a hybrid: including elongated head and facial fur that resembles that of a human.’

            The book wasn’t long, but I was only about one third through.  I can probably piece the rest of it together; it’s not difficult to see where it’s going.  Donovan hated his parents for making him exist and wanted to have kids that weren’t like that.  That’s not a mental disorder Dhalia, that’s what normal fucking people do.

            I flopped the book back down onto the desk and started the computer.  I know exactly what to do with this…

            Strangely enough for a narcissist, signed copies of the book aren’t for sale.  I don’t know how much I can put it up for; so I’m just gonna put it to an online auction.  Maybe it’s worth a fortune.  Dhalia got me some money after all…

            “Fucking bitch…”  I swiped the metallurgy book up and returned to my bookmark.  I have too much time on my hands.  I’m going to read just a little.  Then I have to look for…  A job…  “Fuck.”

 

            Barney still couldn’t get back to us with a time any of us could return to work, so I was at the mercy of summoning the store manager of every place in driving distance.

            The gas station: no open positions.  The book store: not hiring.  The same line is coming out of mouths from every buttoned-up shirt pretending they run a business because they deserve to.  Learn a trade they said; you’ll have a marketable skill they said; there will always be jobs they said.  Instead I just drove around town asking if people even have openings only to end up back at my desk.

            Even Mikes work isn’t hiring anybody right now, not that his work has ever been entry-level.  Their fucking janitor positions are filled, but hell; even being a janitor pays.  ‘Janitor positions’ is a good search, everyone needs cleaning done.

            Probably should have been more specific.  First result is an article for the amount of theft committed by janitors versus other types of employee theft that occurs in the workplace.  Don’t care, didn’t ask; plus you gave google money.

            It didn’t seem to matter though, how many applications or resumes I dropped off.  It was always the same internal eye-roll emanating from the employees.  I’m not going to find a job.  “Our holiday positions are all filled already, I’m so sorry, but we’ll keep you on file.”  I repeated aloud to myself before taking the last swig from my beer.  Fuck me.

            The bottle hit the can with a clatter of glass and I looked into my trash bin.  Time to stop.  Cheap beer is the gateway drug to bad decisions James, whatever that means.  Just so long as I don’t do what I had to spend so much time learning to stop doing: and I don’t start- bzzt!

            Well there goes that, time to drunk-text people.  Who is our victim?

            ‘What are you up to dude?’  Oh Sava you poor sweet fool…

            ‘Home drunk & jobless, hbu?’  You have one chance, run.

            ‘LOL still not back to work?’

            ‘Not yet.’  Oh shit, I still haven’t asked her.

            ‘you doing okay moneywise?’

            ‘I’ll syrvive job hunting niw.’  God dammit James read it before you hit send.

            ‘LMAO That drunk huh?’

            Drunker than you fam, ‘But are you not?’

            ‘Nope getting high on Die Antwoord’

            Hold up.  ‘what kind f drug is die ant word?’

            ‘Die Antwoord is a rap/hop group from south africa.’

            Wow.  That sounds fucking horrible.  ‘send me some’ James you fool.  One buzz later and I now have a youtube link titled Ugly Boy.  I don’t wanna listen to this shit, fucking dammit.

            The song was some melody being played in the background of some girl saying she loves her ugly boy cause he’s crazy about her.  It was like somebody tried to make a hip-hop themed horror movie.

            ‘what do you think?’

            ‘Honestly I don’t like it.’

            ‘really?! It’s so niche though’ people often say that without realizing what it means.

            ‘sorry.’

            ‘its fine dude some ppl have bad taste is all :P’  Don’t get cheeky with me, you bright orange douche.  ‘what are you doing after be drunk?’

            Job hunting.  Oh, and one other thing I need to do…  ‘Actually I needed to bother you?’  Why did I use a question mark for that?  Get in the game James, now you have to do this.  I stood up and started pacing, an act that made me realize I needed to use the bathroom.

            ‘You wanted to come over?’

            ‘No, I wanted to invite you to a party.’  Nice subtle way to put it.

            ‘Youre at a party RN?’

            ‘Not exactly.’ My be-horned mattress ruining girlfriend is having one, though.  ‘going to one later.’  What the hell is a solar party anyways?  Do I explain I need her to tell somebody her and I aren’t dating?

            ‘Whats the occasion?’

            ‘Dunno, she called it a solar party.’

            ‘What the hell is a solar party?’ That’s what I wanna know.

            ‘Wanna find out with me?’ shit.  Gotta mention it.  ‘She said they just get drunk for a week.’

            Sava didn’t respond for a while.  I read over the brief conversation and began to cringe as I grew more sober by the second.  I just asked a girl to come get drunk with me and some random other girl, and now I was stuck here wondering what she must think.

            More importantly; what she must feel.  Probably a gross thing to have happen to you… My phone began ringing in the desk where I had set it down.  Looks like the unknown number screen, probably spam.

            I leaned back in my chair.  Phone rang again.  What the fuck?  I took a look at it.  Not an unknown number, but a blocked number.

            Wait… no way in hell am I answering that.  I rifled through the trash until I found Dhalias business card.  Opened white pages on the computer and jot in the personal number she’d scrawled down.

            Called it.  ‘we couldn’t find any information for the number you provided’ but it’s still in service.  Don’t call me you bitch…

            She had left a voicemail instead.  As long as I don’t have to speak to that thing again.  I pressed play.  “James, it’s Dhalia; if you want that position I can get it for you, but you’ll have to do it as an unpaid internship until they hire you on.  Call me.” I’d rather due, thanks.  That begged the question what I had applied for, however.  I scrolled through my tabs until I found it: a general maintenance position at the hospital.  I hadn’t even read it, and I still applied.  Incredible James; actually an impressive feat.

            The doorbell rang.  I swear to God, I’m about to go on a mass killing spree if any more dumb shit happens today.  If this isn’t Mike’s Amazon package or some shit… I looked through the peephole for a moment and saw nobody was there.  Thank God.

            I pulled the door wide and had my heart sink.

            “I need to borrow your phone.”

            “Hello Stacy, what’s wrong with yours?”

            “I just need to borrow it for a second.  Right now.”

            I sighed, exasperated; and started walking into the house back to my desk.  “Who do you need to call?”

            Stacy had followed me inside and shut the door; but wasn’t answering my questions.  I came back into the living room to see her still standing there; her resting bitch face was looking exceptionally perturbed Today.  She saw the phone and stepped towards me, reaching for it.  I pulled it away and glared at her.

            “I need to see it, unlock it.”

            “Why?”

            “Just…!  I need to, that’s why!”

            “I’m not giving it to you for that.  Tell me why.” This is fucking retarded.

            “Just give it!” she had tears welling up in her eyes.

            “Holy shit, calm down and tell me what’s wrong!” I dropped the phone on the coffee table and grabbed her shoulder.  “Just talk to me.”

            “I don’t-!  I just need to-to delete…!” Yep.  Tiny bunny tears are rolling down her tiny bunny cheeks, and now I have to feel bad and shit.

            I grabbed her shoulders and guided her to the couch to sit down.  “C’mon Stacy, just spit it out.”

            “I just need to delete shit from your phone, then it’s fucking fine…!” she had to hiccup her way through words, but at least she was talking.

            “What do you need to delete?  I don’t have shit on my phone I just use it for calls and texts.”

            “It’s not… Amy, she…” she slapped her arms against her thighs and stood back up, swiping my phone off the table.  “Just unlock this shit!  Now!”

            “Tell me what you want me to delete.”

            “I can’t, okay!”

            “Tell me what you want me to delete.”

            “I fucking can’t!”

            “Tell me.” I can be as cold as you need me to be.  “Or, finish your tears, wash your face, and then get out.”

            “Amy put-!  She had your phone, and she said she put some stuff on there, and I want it fucking off your phone!”

            I watched her try a password on the phones lock screen.  “I doubt me and you have the same sequence.” I reached over and gripped the phone, pulling it lightly against her.  She held on, mumbling ‘no’ and continuing to cry.  “Cone on.  It’s mine.” I slid the device free after some struggle and placed it back on the table.  “There now.  Talk to me.”

            “I already told you…”

            “Talk to me about Amy.”

            “You already met her.”

            “That’s true.  And after meeting her I’m worried about you.”

            “Fuck off, I don’t need some white knight.”

            “Bummer.”  I shrugged as high as I could.  “Cause I’m gonna try to help you.  And I don’t want anything in return from some little man-hater.” I stood up from crouching in front of her and went to the fridge.  “Water?  Soda?  Beer?” I wanna see the tiny sports bunny drink from a normal sized water bottle.

            “Beer me.”  No way!  That’s not as cute.  But I offered, so fine.  The bottle was still large in her hands.

            “So…” James why are you trying to have therapy hour all of a sudden?  “What did Amy put on my phone?  Just tell me straight up.”

            She sighed and sipped while giving my phone the death glare.  “Amy wanted you to be a third with us.”

            “Yeah, and I’m gonna pass.”

            “Don’t interrupt! God.  So, she found your phone still unlocked and was fucking with it before I took it back out to you…  And she put some old pictures on there…  To try to get you to get into me...”

            It took every fiber of my being to sit still, every ounce of self-control and yet still more.  I could have been shaking violently and radiating light like an anime character if it wasn’t illegal to do so in all fifty states.  There are nudes of a bunny on my phone, and I was not allowed to dive onto the table to open it and look at them.  Sure, I could anyways, the only other person who would see is Stacy; but this was a matter of pride.

            “Yeah.  You probably want those off.”  I got the phone off the table and slide my finger around on the face of it.

            “Hey!  Don’t-!”

            “Relax!”  I stuck my finger down on the pictures app.  “I’m just getting it opened for you.” C’mon…  there it is.  App is loaded.  I slid down the notifications menu and jabbed the little cloud icon.

            “It doesn’t take that long!” She got up off the couch and started moving toward me around the coffee table.

            “It’s an old phone!”  Sync complete, God finally!  Jab the icon back off and hand it to her.  “You wanna stare at it load, cool.”  No way this will work, but a man’s gotta try.  For the bunny tail!

            Stacy slid her fingers around the phones screen looking upset.  That was probably normal, all things considered.  “Why is this shit all folders and not just all your pics.?”

            “The only time I use my phone for pictures is for work, and I just immediately send to the shop foreman, it whoever.  It’s sorted by dates in folders so I can find an old picture faster.”

            “The fuck are all these?”  She pointed the screen at me looking confused and annoyed, dear God Stacy calm down, I don’t know what will happen if you go too far outside your emotional range!  You might actually smile!

            “That’s a weld.  Five eighths on LN25.”  Stacy stared at me with a blank expression on her face for a moment, until she turned the phone back to her.

            Tapping away at it for a few more moments while I took a drink from my own beer.  The phone buzzed in her hands while she scrolled.  “You got a message.”

            “It’s probably not important, do your thing.”

            “’Savor’ wants to know if the party is at your girlfriend’s?”

            “It’s important, I need the phone back.”  Did you read ‘Sava’ and get ‘savor’ out of it?  She passed the phone back to me, letting me read it.

            Sure enough Sava had responded asking if we were going to a party with my girlfriend.  What gave it away?  All I really said was ‘she’…

            ‘Yeah she wants to meet my friends I guess.’  I’m innocent of any wrongdoing, so why does it feel weird?  I pointed the phone back at Stacy.  “Still need it?”

            “I couldn’t find anything on there.  I think she was just fucking with me.”

            “That’s kinda fucked up to joke about.”

            “It’s just…  How she is.  It’s just, like; at least she didn’t actually do it.”

            “Lemme rephrase.  Nobody should let their girlfriend sexually abuse them by sharing nudes; but you don’t need the emotional abuse either.”

            “It’s none of your fucking business, now is it?”

            “I mean…  You came here.”

            “Shut up.  Creep.”

            “Yes Stacy, but I’m your creep.”

            “Ew, no; you aren’t my anything!”

            I laughed, and she reluctantly joined in as we both took another drink.  Stacy wobbled a bit.

            “You okay?”

            “I’m fuckin fine, how’s your ass?!  Huh?!”

            That was fast, holy shit.  She probably held liquor in proportion to her size.  And Stacy was only a little taller than my countertop.  “You drunk?”

            “You not?  Fucker selfish like that, gonna laugh?!  Do it!  Get drunk!”  Oh no.  She’s speaking Scottish.

            Today is a sad day.  I turned up the bottle and emptied it.  Still haven’t eaten since my last bout at the computer, and it’s resting heavier than I’d like.  “I can’t get drunk.  I gotta talk to Sava still about her going to the party with me.”

            “Saba is a girl?”

            “Yeah.”

            “The fuck?  You can’t bring around chick friends if you’re gon’go drinking with girlfriend!”

            “My girlfriend believed my drunk rommate when he told”

 

            Stacy stared at me, bewildered and probably finally sober.  When she finally spoke she stayed true to herself, however.  “You’re fucking stupid as fuck.”

            “I really don’t understand why you think that, I haven’t done anything wrong.”

            “You did everything wrong and still have a girlfriend dude, I don’t even know how.”

            “Okay, debiliate to me how non-lesbo relationships work then, oh wise rabbit sage.”

            “Fuck you, first of all.”  God I wish you would you muscular midget.  “Second: You went speed dating.  That was dumb.  You went out with desperate chicks you met speed dating.  That was dumb.  You starting dating an introvert and didn’t realize she didn’t want to friendzone you.  That was dumb.  You started dating an extrovert.  That was dumb in and of itself.”

            “Name a smart thing I did, or your just made because penis.”

            “Shut up.  Then!  You went and told your extrovert girlfriend that your introvert girlfriend isn’t your girlfriend-”

            “She’s not!”

            “You don’t know that!  You fucking tarded asswipe!  God dammit, I hope she doesn’t like you cause if she does she just had a rude awakening and probably feels like shit.”

            “I know who my girlfriend is.”

            “You don’t, okay.  You don’t.  Guys don’t get to decide that shit: cause they suck at it; they think their wife can be somebody they haven’t met yet.  The girl gets to decide; cause you fucking suck at it.”  Jesus Christ alive you are so grossly lesbian it hurts.  Why did I let gays in my house?

            “Me and Sava just hang out.”

            “For all you know, that’s a date to her! Fucking dipshit.”

            “You know what, fuck you; I am not going to take relationship advice from somebody who’s in an abusive relationship.”

            “Amy’s the best I’ve got asshole, don’t talk shit!”

            “The best you’ve got just sent you running over thinking I was jacking off to pics of you on my phone for no fucking reason!  I know an abusive relationship when I see one!”

            “Yeah, probably; since you’re causing one right now!”

            A thudding happened at our feet.  It had been a while since my downstairs neighbor had wielded their broomstick in retaliation.  “I’m not the problem.”

            “Why?  Cause you didn’t know?  Then you’re still the problem cause you should have.”

            There was no debating her.  She was in too deep with her seated hatred of me.  I had to find a way to show her with her own eyes that she was wrong.  Maybe I was still drunk, because I got a perfect plan to solve the problem instantly, and there was no time to lose.

            “I want you to come to the party with me.”  Wait a minute James; this plan has flaws…

            “Why?”  Oh Stacy, your permascowl is growing on me.

            “She wants to meet my friends, and your kinda like…”  I pointed up and down at her.  “Well, you’re something.”

            “Something.  Right.  Next week you’ll think that I’m the fucking girlfriend.”

            “God no.”

            “Why should I go to the party with you?”

            I need her there.  I need her bitchy advice.  And above all else I need to prove I’m right and she’s short.  “I mean…  You can get a break from Amy.  And…  My suffering might be funny?”

 

            Somehow, I had convinced Stacy before Sava, but Sava had still agreed after asking when, and upon getting the date Caitlyn gave; she wrote a long-winded article about how she could barely make it and was interested in meeting my girlfriend followed by a short joke about promising not to fight her.

            There was supposed to be plus one, and I now had plus two.  But what plagued me now was Stacy’s suggestion: what did Sava feel about me?  A text didn’t reveal much, even if the whole thing felt artificial.  I could call her and ask, but that might be weird.

            I leaned back in my chair.  “Damn bunny…”  But now came the fun part.  I lifted the phone back up and swiped to the contacts.  Annnnd...  Caitlyn.

            Ring.

            Ring.

            Ring.

            Ring- oh God, she’s not going to pick up is she?

            “Hey James.”  I about jumped out of my chair.

            “Hey Cait!  Uh, good news and bad news…”

            “Oh no, don’t tell me bad news hon- James…”  Aw yeah, she still wants to call me hon.

            “Sava can come, but only for the last three days.”

            She took a minute to respond, and came back different.  “Thash not bad newsh at all.”

            “You…  okay?”

            “Burned thongs on muh cough.”  I just gonna assume she burned her tongue on her coffee, and not the other thing...  “Ish why I nether get hot cough!”

            “My bad news is that I also accidentally invited a second person.”

            “Oh thash fine too.  Mmmm…”

            “Sorry you’re hurting.”

            “Yeah, you could inbite like four people if we shtuff the cabinsh roomsh: is beeg.”

            “Alright, go ice your tongue.”

            “Am bing fibe peeble, so bing fends, it’ll be dobe.”

            Five people.  Five friends of Caitlyn’s.  Holy shit, I no longer wish to go.  “I’ll see you there Cait.”

            “Kay hon, bye.”  The line went quiet and stayed that way.  I hadn’t been to an actual party in ages.  Last time was probably boys-night with everyone.  Did she say cabin?  She said it was her mom’s place, but this was the first mention of the actual location.  Maybe a solar party is supposed to be a stargazing meeting?  For a whole week?

            Wait a minute, I’m stuck in a cabin in the woods for a week?  Who could I even invite?  Sava and for some reason Stacy had agreed, but Stacy might bail, and that’d be nice in it’s own way.

            Mike can’t, he’s got work.  Styles and his girlfriend could come, but they might have work.

            Wait another minute…  Can I even go?  I got back on the computer and opened the bookmarks.  Banks website…  Log in…  Checking account still has- oh fuck, checking account is empty.  Super empty, it’s been pulling from the savings…  I’m back under seven-thousand- this is what I was afraid of!

            “Where the fuck where the fuck…”  all I could do was mumble to myself as I looked through the history.  Insurance payments.  They’re automatic and don’t send an email or anything unless I log in.  Fucking bastards!  I slouched in my chair.  I had no job, was eating on my savings money and now I need to b.y.o.b. to a party at a cabin for a whole week.

            I had a thought that made me sick.  I looked down and the crumpled card was still there.  Fuck no, absolutely not.  Not in a million years.

 

            The phone only rang as I stared at the emails.  Seventeen emails about not getting an interview, and two letting me know the interview didn’t pan out.  The phone picked up.  “Hello James, how are you?”

            “Hi…”  I sighed deeply.  “Dhalia.”  My skin crawled.  “How much would you pay me, and what would I have to do?”  I’m just finding out, it’s fine; I’m not doing anything…

            “Do you know what a transmission is?”

            What.  “In a car?  Yeah, I do.”

            “Hmmm.  And then…”  I could hear a paper getting slid.  “Do you have a swimsuit?”

            What.  “Yes, why?”

            “Alright, I’ll come pick you up in about an hour, and I’ll pay you seven hundred for everything.”
            “Wait…  What the fuck?”

            “I’m going to pick you up in about an hour, and I’ll pay you seven hundred for everything.”

            “No, I heard…  I don’t know what I’m doing, still?”

            “You’re getting a swimsuit and some tools for a car, and I’m picking you up.  I do have to go now James, love you!”  The line clicked loudly.  I looked down and realized I’d called her work phone.

            Seven hundred dollars though?  That’s some bullshit…  I walked to the closet.  It was mostly filled with old boxes of mine.  A plastic drawer set from wal-mart resided in the corner, buried behind some things.  Swimsuit: check.

            Tools.  I grabbed my keys and started heading for the door, stopping in the living room.  A transmission?  Transmissions are fucking huge, and there’s nowhere to work on it.  How the fuck am I gonna get it out?  Maybe she’s got a garage.  And a crane.  How the fuck am I gonna change a transmission in a day?  Is that even worth seven hundred dollars?  And why do I have to do it in a swimsuit?  Is this a kink thing?  I need to call her back and tell her never-mind.

            Seven hundred is a lot though…

 

            I had decided to wait outside, but felt like a fool in the end.  I was just some asshole standing there with some swim trunks and a ratchet set.  This is just a weird fucking day, and I already want it to be over…  But there it was.  God what a fucking eye sore; a bright white Supra with black windows.

            The window rolled down to reveal a familiar gray face with sunglasses.  “Hello James, how are you now?”

            Please die horribly.  “Fine now, how are you Dhalia.”

            “Get in.”

            “Is this the car?”  I opened the door and sat down.  Leather seats and dash, Jesus it smells like fox and leather in here.

            “No, the BMW is at the garage.  It stopped working as well, so I’ve got this now.” 

            “A BMW?  I can’t fix that Dhalia, you have to go see a special German mechanic and everything?”

            “Oh, really?”

            “Yeah, those German luxury cars need to go to special mechanics.  It’s the same with Mercedes.”  How do you buy this machine and not know this shit?  It’s more than fifty grand for an old one…

            “Well bummer.”  She sounded so monotone.  None of this was disappointing news.  Instead, she put the car in gear and started driving.  “Maybe you can tell me what’s wrong with it.  Do some man stuff, it will put your mind at ease.”

            “Where are we going then?  I can’t help you!  Pull over!”

            “You just helped me.  And there’s still other work to do.  Don’t worry lover; You’ll still get money from me, and that’s what’s important, right?”

            “Fine.  Only because I could use the cash.”

            “Hmmm.  Yes James, you get things from me and I get things from you.  Fantastic.”

            “Also, don’t call me lover, or say you love me over the phone.  Don’t call me.”

            She just sat there giggling while I listed off reasons she was a fucking creep.  She reached out with a fluffy hand and pinched the volume wheel between to jet black needle like claws.  That was strange, I didn’t know foxes had hooked claws like that.

            “Are you a hybrid?”

            “Hmmm?  What made you think that, James?”

            “Your hands.  Those are cat claws, and you’re a gray fox.”

            She laughed for a bit.  “That’s an interesting take.  But I am not a hybrid, nor am I a gray fox.”  She outstretched her hand and splayed her fingers.  Her gray fur was almost even darker against the white patches around her palm and fingers. Her claws came out like curved needles.  “Go on, look at it.”

            “I’ve seen enough.  Just thought it would explain that book.”

            “Hmmm.  Me being a hybrid myself could be an explanation.  Another explanation is that I’m sick of their problems.”

            That was a cold edge.  “Thought doctors wanted to help people.”

            “Hmmm.”  She gave no other explanation.  The song kept playing.  Some strange lyrics and the sound of a guitar strumming…  A synth drum?  Was it in German?  I looked down at the radio.  ‘CD – Track 02/10’ Not much help.  The beat stayed in my head, and the lyrics were beyond my understanding.

            “Brotin.  Eivor.”  I jumped at the sound of the devils voice.

            “Eye-vore?”

            “No, Eivor.  Eye-verr.”

            “Huh.  I guess Eye-Vore wouldn’t have been the weirdest thing I heard today.”

            “What would that be?”

            Why the fuck am I talking to you?  “Let’s just get this over with.  I’m only here because I need money.”

            “Hmmm.”  Stop doing that.  Forever.  Stop doing that.

            The car made strong vibrations as she sped up to merge on the freeway.  The sound inside was miniscule compared to how much of an asshole she must look like; flinging onto the freeway at mach speed in her super-car just to get in front of somebody in their fucking Ford Focus.  “How far away do you even live?”

            “Another five minutes.  Probably.”

            “Right.”  It already felt like an eternity in this car…

 

            Dhalia had driven us into the heart of the city.  I couldn’t even see where the sun was where we parked in front of a skyscraper.  I had imagined Buffalo Bills house in the avenues long before a luxury apartment.  Oh my God there’s a valet taking her car keys and everything.

            “This is a bit too fancy for my liking.”

            “Me too.”  Bitch what.

            “Why live here then?  Couldn’t you live anywhere?”

            “I could live in a lot of places, James; but I’m here because I’m supposed to be.  A wealthy doctor lives in wealthy doctor house, right?”

            “No, they live where they want because they have the money to.  That’s what normal people do.”

            “Hmmm.  Balance your budget with your happiness?”  I’d followed her into the lobby, and only just realized how stupid I was being.  I didn’t have a ride out of here.  Nobody knows where I am.  Shit fuck shit fuck shit…

            I slid my phone out of my pocket.  Good signal, great even.  Maps application…  I made a pin in the lobby and generated a link as we got into the elevator.  Signal dropped like an anvil falling out of a plane.

            “Calling your girlfriend?”  Dhalia made me jump a second time just by speaking.  Careful James, she might catch on that you don’t like her!  Oh wait…

            “Just, uh; still letting my friends know I’m out today.”

            “Hmmm.”  She just stared at the elevator doors, not even glancing at the floor counter.  She’d hit the number 60 at the top of the panel: this woman lives on the top floor of a skyscraper and isn’t happy.  “Am I so pretty you have to stare like that?”

            “I’m just amazed nobody here has realized you’re insane is all.”  She laughed at it like I’d told a joke.  Don’t accuse me of staring at you when I’m watching you stare at things, Jesus…  The elevator made me almost sick.  I was trapped in here with her.  Actually trapped.  What was even my escape plan at this point?  I could probably take her, even if she’s got claws…  How is she not a hybrid with those claws?

            A million thoughts were rushing through my head.  Some helpful; others were stupid.  The elevator slowed to it’s stop at the tallest peak, and I watched Dhalia pinch her nose and slightly inflate her cheeks.  She gets all the way home and has to pop her ears, what a lofty height for such a short fox.  I turned back to the phone.  Signals back, I just share the pin link.  Jabbing the share button gave me all my recent messages, and I stared at the list.  Who the fuck do I even send this to?  Panic stole my thumb and just started jabbing send.  The only one who needed it really was Mike…  It’s fine.  Worst case scenario I have to explain that I butt-texted people a maps link.  It’s fine: everything is fine.

            I slid my phone away and discovered we weren’t alone in the hall: an old looking bear was wandering towards us, and went about unlocking one of the doors.  They were very far apart, not the normal two doors next to each other you’d find in any other apartment complex.  As I thought once more that it was all taking an eternity, Dhalia stopped stiff and held up her keychain to a door.  It shined a flashing green light and made several whirring noises.  She gripped the handle and pulled it wide, swinging it to me to hold.  It was heavy, damn heavy; and had three bolts in it: top; bottom and center.

            “You live in a little fortress?”

            “People like their privacy.”  She went inside, tail wagging a bit.  “You can attest to that I imagine.”

            “You don’t listen to anything I tell you, so…”

            “I listen to everything you say James; I just don’t always respond the way you want.”  She leaned her head back freakishly far and looked at me from behind.  “But we’ll fix that.”  She cooed, the gross little demon.

            I followed her inside and past the shoe room, God this woman has a shoe room.

            The apartment was huge.  A long counter to the right separated the kitchen and dining area from the wide open living room on the left.  It was almost an alien landscape: everything was clean and square.  The couch was square; it’s pillows were square; the end table was square…  It was something out of a modern interior design fetish dream.

            “A lot of space.”  Her keys landing on the counter echoed in the living room where I’d wandered into, the carpet warm against my bare feet.

            “Not comfy cluster like you’re used to?”

            “Not at all.”  The TV was fucking enormous.  Bigger than a sixty incher I think.  I wouldn’t know, mine and mikes is a fifty or something…

            “Me neither.”

            “Right.  You didn’t give me a good answer as to why you live here if you hate it.”

            “Would you like to talk James?”

            “Sure talk to me about how I still make some money out of all this.”

            “Hmmm.  I just need you to clean the pool.”  The pool.  Of course, the fucking pool you have at your apartment that is bigger than my parents house.  I looked away from the TV and out past the window-wall at the back.  Sure enough, there was a medium sized pool there.

            “Right.  Swimsuit.”

            “What did you think the swimsuit was for?”

            “Honestly, somehow I thought it had something to do with your transmission.”  Can’t you clean your own pool this place is huge.

            “That’s silly James.”  She’d made her way behind me, and I needed to not jump at her presence.  She wasn’t scary, she was a fluffy midget who acted like a creep.  Jumping at her only gives her power.

            “You don’t say.”  She flopped her dress coat down onto the couch and walked around me.  It was the first time I’d seen her without shoes on, funny enough.  She made her way to the back and slid open the glass doors that blended in with the strange collection of windows.  “I just need to drain it.  Then you scrub it down.”

            “Couldn’t have done that yourself?  Hired a pool cleaner?”

            “I didn’t want to do it myself.”  She looked at me and wore her long and evil smile.  “And I did hire a pool cleaner.”  Fucking bitch…  “You going to change?”  She stood there in the threshold, an expecting look on her face.

            “Fine.  Where’s your bathroom?”

            “What if I promise to close my eyes really hard?”

            “Fuck no, there’s probably a hidden camera in the bathroom anyways!”

            She giggled at me and pointed with a claw towards the entry hall where a small door blended in out of sight.  I marched over and went inside, closing the door behind me.  This is the most stupid shit you have ever demeaned yourself into, James.  I sat down on the toilet and dropped the swimsuit on the counter.  What the fuck had even compelled me to humor this shit?  I’m definitely not getting seven hundred dollars.

            I could hear a quiet clatter outside of what I could only imagine were kitchen utensils.  I stood back up and looked around the room.  There wasn’t anything that resembled a hidden camera.  Then again, James; you’re going off of your limited knowledge of spy movies and looking for perfect black circles the size of a thumbnail…

            “Just change James…  Let’s get this over with…”

 

            Dhalias pool wasn’t huge by any means.  A streatch of about twenty feet and only ten feet at the deepest part.  The emptied bowl still smelled of stagnant water.  Anthros couldn’t swim in chlorine pools, leading to situations like this.  I read the filter one last time as I wiped it down.  ‘Grade 4 industrial water filter/purifier.’  An overpriced machine that used the same equiptment as a vape pen to distill water at a rapid pace, but only after collecting massive amounts of hair in a set of filters.  I looked down at the trash bag by my feet, filled with two to three inch long gray and white hairs.  Christ, there was almost enough to make a second Dhalia.  What a horrible thought.

            “You look done.”

            “Been more than ‘done’ ever since I met you.”  I slapped the rag down into the scummy bucket with the ruined scour sponges and remaining soap.  “…  Pools clean too.”

            “You look hungry too.”

            “You don’t pay me enough to sit down and have lunch with you.”

            “Good thing I made filet mignon, and that it’s dinner.  Go shower.”  She retreated back into the apartment.  Fucking bitch I fucking hate you so fucking much it’s physically painful to exist in this dimension alongside you…

            I went strait to the bathroom without looking at Dhalia in the kitchen, and wasted no time.  P.T.A. shower it was, and in no time I’d changed back into my former clothes and chosen to drop my swimsuit into the trash bin in the bathroom.  I didn’t want to wear it ever again…

            Back out into the apartment I finally took a moment to breath as I looked on.  The smell was something else; the kind of fairy-tale-pie smell that wiggles it’s finger and makes you fly through the air.  Dhalia had set a pair of plates down on the counter instead of the table.

            “So!”  I clapped my hands together.  I was determined to be rude, get money, and get out.  “You poisoning me now?”

            Dhalia giggled.  “Of course I am.  We’ll make it fun though, you can pick yours.”  Sarcasm and then a game.  Fucking horrible bitch.  It smelled too good though.

            I stepped closer and took the one she stood closets too.  Without any hisitation she sat down at the other plate- the one clearly intended for me.  “You want me to taste it first too?”  She leered.  Her even offering was annoying.

            “Sure.  Why not.”  Again with no hesitation she lifted her knife and reached over.  She slid through it in a single motion, slicing off a corner of the small piece of steak and letting it fall onto the side of the turned blade.  Staring at me, she inserted the knife into her mouth and withdrew it before chewing.

            “See?  Now I’m poisoned too!”  I rolled my eyes and looked down at the tiny steak.  God it smelled amazing…  Except for short tinges where it stung my nose.  An earthy kind of smell.  I lifted my own utensils as Dhalia began digging in.  The mushrooms on mine weren’t sauted right at all, and were just barely moist.

            Fuck it though.  I’m actually hungry.

 

            There wasn’t much steak; but I’d made short work of it.  I leaned back a bit in a futile attempt to display my interest in leaving.

            “Good?”

            It was fucking delicious except you fucked up the mushrooms.  A couple had been just plain dry.  “It was all right.”

            “Even though you took the poisonous one.  Impressive, actually.”

            “Yeah yeah, it’s poisonous, and second now I’ll die without the antidote, goodbye Mr. Bond.  Can you pay me so I can go home?”

            “James.  You stole my dinner.  You can’t leave.”

            “The fuck are you talking about I stole your dinner and can’t leave?!  You said to pick one, I picked-” I gestured at the now empty plate and looked at it…  It changed.  The plate was longer, wider and had a yellow tint to it.  “What is…  What the fuck is?!”

            “Relax.  It’ll go bad if you stress yourself out.  I’ll babysit you.”  Dhalias voice was so far away, like; a million miles away…  But I heard every word.  I looked up and the whole world did a back-flip while I held still: staring at Dhalia.  She changed too…  Changed color, I think…

            “Did you…  Fuck…  drug me?”

            She moved towards me across the dark zen garden that now separated us, like a long slab of stone…  Is that the fucking counter?  “No, I poisoned you.  Stomach poisoning.  Technically, I tried to poison myself and let you take a cab home.”  What the fuck!?  “Ah!  Don’t do that!”  I stood up and away from the counter.  I was cold- no, I was fucking freezing!  I turned back and watched as Dhalia melted into the floor, a gray flood washing towards me, filling the room.

            “God fuck!”  I tried to march away from it, the encroaching puddle on the ground; but the sand under my feet was too soft, and I sank into it further with each step.  “God it’s fucking freezing!”

            “James…”  I whipped my head to the left where it had come from.  Who’s voice is that?  Dhalia melted, she’s gone…  Who else was in the room with me?  That other person…  Caitlyn!  I couldn’t find her…  Was it really Caitlyn?

            “Caitlyn!”  I called out.  My voice was so loud, so powerful; it hurt my ears.  “Caitlyn, I’m so cold…”  There was laughing there…  I crawled towards it.  When did I start crawling?  God everything is sticky, it’s like I’m in a glue trap…

            “Caitlyn’s not here James.”  There was a pause.  “Who are you looking for?”  The world was so small; the walls were so close, but I couldn’t touch them.  The couch was melting too, just like Dhalia had, a white sludge oozing down the sides.

            “S-Sava!  Apar…  Apa…!”  God fucking shit I’m gonna die…

            Maybe if I could just move, really move…  I spread myself out on my stomach and tried to do a breast stroke to swim through the glue.  I felt like I was gliding across a dark tan ocean, but I couldn’t get in the water.  “I gotta…  I need to get there!”

            “Where are you going?”  Still there, off in the distance…  Maybe it was a mermaid.  Don’t mermaids fucking kill people though?

            “Don’t suck my cock!”  Fucking death whore!  God damnit my voice is so fucking loud!  I grabbed at my head but couldn’t find it…  It just made it hurt to try to find it.  I laid still and floated above the freezing cold water.  No: the water wasn’t cold; I was.  I was icy from my skin down to my bones.

            “Do you feel scared?”  That same voice…  It said Caitlyn wasn’t here…  And Sava or her mom hadn’t called out.  Maybe Dhalia didn’t really die…  Maybe Dhalia was the ocean.

            “I’m cold…  I feel so cold…  I want to be warm again…”  Something pressed against my cheek, something warm.  I flailed my arm up to grab it, find more of it.

            “Warm?”

            “So warm…”  I could feel it there, like a coil of something soft and frail, but still sharp…  A pine tree.  It was a…  Fuzzy pine tree.  A warm young branch of pine needles.  I looked up and saw the moon.  It was like I was drunk, staring at the moon and seeing double.  “A forest…”

            “A warm forest.  You’re almost there.  You can follow me if you stand up.”  I placed my hands on the force field that separated me from the strange ocean from below and shakily got up.  I could move on it, but every step felt like I would fall deep down into the bright brown waves below.  My breath was shaky from the chills.

            As I stared into the opaque ocean a flutter of black and gray flakes waved into my line of sight.  A black clawed hand consumed in smoke reached out to me.  It was wrong, it should’t look like that.  I reached out and grabbed it.  It was the same as before: the warm needles.  I looked up and saw the being robed in smoke, staring at me with a bright golden orb in the distance…  Some kind of…  Metal-album wizard…  Fucking something man.

            “That’s not right…”  She hadn’t deceived me.  “You’re not a monster…”

            “Sweet of you, James.”

            The hand wrapped around my own, and pulled me softly.  We walked over the ocean until we came to long, flat white cliffs…  The ground undulated and moved my left and right while the smoke woman guided me into the canyon…

            “How much…  Further…?”  I was out of breath when we had reached the end of the canyon, my legs feeling like rubber.

            “It’s not far.”  She led me even further, the cold on my skin starting to spread down to my bones…  God, fuck I can feel my bones, why does it feel like they’re made of skin and jell-o?  I could see it though: not the forest, but something amazing.  A huge bowl, trimmed in gold and filled with clouds.

            “Holy fucking shit…  It’s like cloud cereal!”  The shadow witch shook her smokey shoulders with laughter, her tunnel-face quivering and concealing the golden orb in the distance again and again.

            She let my hand go, and I felt the cold creeping back into it, compelling me to follow.  She fell into the big bowl, splashing clouds out into the room making it like a sauna…  But cold.  The mist was hard to move through, but I made it to the edge.  She was floating there, and I fell forwards expecting to splash in just as she had…

            But it didn’t come.  The clouds caught me.  They hovered my body up and down again and again, and I could bury my face in them deeply and inhale…

            It was such a warm smell, from such warm clouds…  And then I saw it.  She hadn’t lied…  I could see it.  A long, gray forest of trees…  As if there was just a bit of snow on their caps.  I pushed my face against them, my head must be the size of the moon against the planet, with it’s little warm trees…

            It’s the softest forest ever.  “Not enough…  Gray pine trees…”

            “Well, there’s more James, but you’ll be angry if I show you.”

            “No…  Show me…  Forests…”  The world spun and shifted, the clouds turned to monsters of gray and white, and for a moment I spun again, grabbing at whatever my fingers could sink into; in a moment of chaos; but then I saw it again; the long forest.  I pushed myself closer and closer until I was there again.  It was different though.  The world grew brighter and brighter.  Like everything was bright white…  Even the trees.  “A forest of light…”  I mumbled.

            I shut my eyes, and slowly the world swiveled on a hinge in my forehead less and less.  It was so warm, the only sound was a distant breathing, the only sensation was my head shifting up and down; and the only sound was a far distant thumping, like a drum.  It was all so alive.


================================================================================
Chapter 10: A visit home
Summary:

    MC's world starts spinning rapidly.

Chapter Text

            I felt my body slowly coming awake.  It was a weird sensation, and made me close my eyes as tightly as I could before slowly creaking them open.  What the fuck happened?  I thought I went to Dhalia’s house and she turned into a smoke wizard and…  What the fuck happened?

            I felt my hair moving and turned upwards.

            “What…  the fuck.”  Dhalia’s fingers twirled my hair around, and I scampered down in the huge bed, pulling away.  “Why the fuck are you naked?!”  She was shirtless there in a nest made of pillows.

            “You wanted to lay on my fur.”  She stated plainly, brushing the messy patch of fur just under her breasts where I had found my head.  I turned and threw my legs off the bed.  “You said it was ‘like a forest of light’ and burried your face in my arm, demanding more.”

            I stood up tall, and felt the cold air hit me.  “Why the fuck am I naked too?!”

            “You tried to swim in my carpet.”

            “That!  That wasn’t…!”

            “Calm down.”

            “You drugged me!  I’m not calming the fuck down!”

            “Will you be quiet for just a moment and listen to me?”  She had begun pulling her shirt over her shoulders, her bra still off to the side.

            “Do you…  Not have nipples?”  She paused and cocked an eyebrow.  Her face can move?

            “They’re under my fur James, would you like to see?”

            “No.  I wouldn’t.”

            “It’s interesting you search for things physically wrong with me.”  She’d finished buttoning up.  “You had your tirade: now let’s talk about your walkabout.”

            “My what?  Fuck off!  Where’s my pants?!”

            “They’re in the living room still.”  I stormed out into the living room carrying a sheet around me.  I was still in my underwear, and she had still had her skirt on.  “You tried to go swimming.  I need to know what you saw on your walkabout

            “It’s a drug trip, I saw crazy shit.”

            “Everything you saw was important.”

            “I don’t see how it could be.”  I’d swiped up the pants and had sat down on the couch to start putting them on.

            “Everything you saw was important, please tell me about it.”

            “First of all, fuck you I’ve been clean my whole damn life and now this shit-!”  Both legs in.  What the fuck is going on.  I see my shirt, it’s across the room.  Grab it and go James.

            “James tell me!”  She’d snatched my wrist and squeezed it with a surprising strength.  Her eyes wide and scared with her smile gone…  It scared me too; seeing emotion come out of her.

            “Why do you want to know so bad?”

            Her eyes changed once again.  I hadn’t paid attention before: Dhalia wasn’t like other anthros; folding their face for different emotions similar to how a human might.  She had that smile trapped on her face, and the only hope of gaining insight was through her eyes; the ones now riddled with a distant look in them.  “They really were for me.  But when you mentioned poisoning you, I realized I could make it happen to you like it did to me.”

            “Answer my question, why do you want to know so bad?”  I pulled firm on my hand trying to take it away, but she held fast.

            “I might have been twelve years old.  I read a story about a fairy who ate a magical mushroom to help a knight.”  Her grip slacked and slowly released me.  “I stumbled across a fly agaric while playing in the woods behind my parents home.”

            “And you just went ate that shit like a retard; didn’t you?”  What the fuck does this have to do with me?

            “Everything I saw when that happened keeps seeming like it wants to come true but never does.  And when I tried to follow the clues; I looked in all the wrong places.  Until you.”

            “If what I remember is what I saw, there is no way it can come true.”  I started back across the room, and swiped up my shirt before sitting back down on the opposite end of the couch.

            “Not like you saw it, no.  Tell me.”

            “Pay me for my fucking trouble and I’ll think about it.”

            “I’ll pay you no matter what.  I’ll pay you more if you promise to tell me everything you saw after you’ve had time to think about it.”

            “How about I just lie and take your fucking money?”

            “You gain nothing from not telling me.”

            “I get satisfaction out of it!”  Lying to you would feel fucking great, especially if you’re dumb enough to pay me to do it.  Shirts on, stop arguing.  Run James.  Why won’t you just fucking run away…?

            “We’ll talk about it together.  I’ll tell you mine.”

            “I don’t want to talk about it, Dhalia.  I want to leave.”

            “I’m sorry, James.”  That was strange.  “I know It’s all so new, but I know that this is right.”  She reached out and placed her hand on my shoulder.  I made myself fast to brush it off.

            “Don’t…  Don’t touch me.”  Genuine confusion had washed over her face, exposing her again even if only for a moment.

            She looked at the hand for a moment in a daze, as though it was at fault and not her.  She curled her fingers into a loose fist and looked back to me.  “I know you.”

            “You don’t know shit about me!”  I stood up, bumping a fist against the wall.  “Quit saying you do!”

            “I know everything I need to know about you.”  Her smile was gone, her face was neutral; but her voice was cold…  Angry.  “I know you’re selfish.  I know you think poorly of everyone around you.  I know whoever Caitlyn is, she likes you because if she has to pick between something hard and something easy, she’ll run to you cause you’re both.”  Oh fuck you, you snide bitch!

            “You don’t know anything about her either!  What, cause you opened a psychology text book you think you know fucking everything?”

            “I know you would rather live in a hole and speak to almost nobody than be with your own roommate for more than twenty minutes.  I know you think all your friends are necessary burdens you keep around for false validation.  I know you think you’re smarter than you really are.”

            “Shut the fuck up.  Just shut up.  You clearly don’t know anything about me.”

            Dhalia turned and walked back towards her bedroom.  “Have you considered the possibility you don’t know yourself yet?”

            “If I don’t know my fucking self, then nobody else can know me either.”

            She emerged again with a manila.  “I think you should have Thanksgiving dinner with my family.”

            “Don’t try to change the subject…  And why the fuck would I ever do that?”

            “I could pay you to do it if you want.  I’m willing to buy time with you.”

            “Do you not see, even for a moment; how having to pay me to see you is fucked up?  Severely fucked up?”

            “It got you over here once.  That’s another thing I know about you, James.”

            “Shut up.”

            “I know you’re going to spend some time beating your own forehead when you get home.”  She held up the little envelope, thick from what was presumable my money.  “You’re going to sit there demanding to know why you didn’t grab your pants and run like a beaten dog: tail between your legs.”

            “I said shut up…”

            “I know you’re going to run home and seek out any distraction you can from this and every tiny thing you don’t like.  You’re going to jump on the next situation that arises to try and escape-”

            I stood up tall.  “Let’s get me out of here.  Forever.”

            “How about three hundred to tell me about your walkabout…?”

            “I’d rather die than speak to you again after today.”

            “And two thousand for dinner.”  What?  Fucking stop, it you stupid fucking fox, holy shit…

            “Are you fucking insane?  You still can’t give me a reason why you’d even want that?  What do you think you’re going to get out of it?  You think I’m gonna just change my mind about you being a psycho cause your mom fed me turkey?  Let me be clear: I will never love you.”  She had stopped at that.  She stood stiff; her ears and neck standing as straight as they could.  Her eyes were wide and fearful again; but in another moment she regained her composure.

            “I just thought it would be fair of me offer.”  She reached out and held the envelope at arms length.  I walked up and snatched it form her hand.  I ripped the top and spotted a twenty on top.  “It’s all there, James.”

            “Honestly, I just don’t even fucking care anymore; I’m just leaving.”

            “Could you leave your shirt behind?”

            “What?  Fuck no…  Why?”

            “Well, if you’re going to leave: I’d like to masturbate, and it would help to have a good strong smell.”  Your shoes are by the door James.  Get the fuck out of here.  Call an uber or some shit.

 

            I hadn’t realized it was dark outside when I woke up at Dhalia’s place, and it was late, or rather very early when I got home.  I’d slept the end of yesterday away, and the microwave claimed it was two in the morning.  I had snuck back into the apartment and creeped to my room.  I never should have left.  I never should have called back.  All she is to me is trouble.  I laid on my bed and held my eyes shut.  I shut everything out, cleared my mind.  There was wind outside, and faint lights from the street.

            What was the point of all of that?  Can I gauge Dhalia as a value?  Seven hundred dollars in one day is a lot for talking about cars and cleaning a pool…  and getting to try drugs for the first time.

            Fuck that though.  I could remember it, I think.  I couldn’t remember taking my clothes off or getting into bed with a psycho…

            But I could remember trying to swim in a brown ocean.  And Dhalia melting.  And…  cloud cereal…  That must have been Dhalias bed.  The sheets were all white.  And Dhalia’s…  body…  had been a forest?

            Grey pine trees came back to me.  It had all been so real, flying above that forest.  And it all turned into light.  Bright white lights.

            “It’s just the drugs.”  I reassured myself.  It had been my first time, and it was nothing like Hollywood made it seem.

            There had been that figure as well.  That must have been Dhalia as well.  She should have looked worse, like a real monster.  Instead she was just some weird smoke creature, like a phantom cyclops.  Why had Dhalia wanted to talk about all that nonsense so bad.  She even let up her smug facade a couple times.  It was hard to imagine, even though I had just been there.  A real psychopath, not like the ones in Hollywood that collect knives and feed people their own clay-roasted leg.

            “Forget about her…”  I rolled over in my bed and buried my face into the pillows.  They still smelled like the Target I’d bought them from.  I ran my fingers under them and found the hole Caitlyn had made.  I mindlessly ran my fingers around it.  Her horn could really do some damage.  Slowly sleep took over my body once more.  Finally.

 

            The strong repetitive retorts of my alarm still elected to awake me at six sharp.  Maybe four hours of sleep then?  Fine.  Whatever.

            Some part of me had grown depressed and jaded, and I wanted to stay that way but couldn’t.  I’d made a promise.

            I sat up and stretched. I needed to see my parents.  I would have to kill some time…  Probably four hours of it.  Videogames are the obvious answer, and I still need to wait for emails back on other interviews…  I need to call Barney too.  He won’t be up for another three hours, and probably won’t answer anyways.

            Time to play Tomb-Tenderizer, God it’s been forever.  I haven’t played since I met with Caitlyn, actually.  What a weird day that was.  Here I was, still wishing and wanting to go back to my stagnant lifestyle.  Part of me wants to cancel on the solar party.

            I have to go though.  To see Caitlyn, introduce Sava, and play her stupid game.  It’s bullshit too, running with me and trusting me until that exact thing comes up?  Everything else in life I’ve thrown at her, and she would just double-check if I was being serious at worst.  But my drunk roommate rambling about a tiger was too much.

            For a girl whose ‘been in the middle before’ you’d think it wasn’t some huge deal anyways.  But suddenly, there’s trust issues.  Maybe she just wants to make sure all her trust in me is merited.  Shit if I know…

            I stared in blank dissatisfaction as the games main menu came up, and faded away.  It started showing gameplay while the soundtrack played, the skinny blond you played as blowing up zombies along the way.  I didn’t want to play videogames after all.  I couldn’t tell what I wanted…

 

            Ten o clock rolled around, leaving me to grab the phone off the desk and going back through the messages where my mom had been texting me off and on ever since I’d told her about the fire.  It was a slew of reassurances from me that I was all right.  They were lies.  My parents didn’t have any money to loan me, they were blowing their savings money as I stared at texts from them.  They were terrible at money management.  Nobody needs their grown ass son begging them for money.  I hit the ringer on my moms contact.

            The phone didn’t ring long.  “James!  Hi!”

            “Hey Mom.”

            “Your father told me you’d said you we’re coming to see us, and I still haven’t seen you.  I know you’re not back at work yet.”

            “That’s why I called, Mom.  I know it’s sudden, but I thought I’d come visit you today.”

            “Well, you’re grandma is here; so today’s the day!”

            “Oh fuck yeah!”

            “James!  Don’t swear at me!”

            “God, I’m sorry Mom.”

            “Ever since you got that construction job you get more vulgar every year!”  It’s not construction.  It’s just kind-of construction.

            “I was excited!  I’m sorry!  I’ve missed getting good news…”

            “Oh, sweetie; I know things are hard now, but…  I know in time they’ll shape up right.”  Easy to say, harder to do.

            “I’m gonna head over mom.  I’m gonna eat all the Werther’s in her purse then hug grandma so hard she goes to the hospital.”

            “James don’t talk like that!”

            “Love you mom!”  I hung up.  This was great, I needed this.  I slid my keys off the desk at mach speed with one hand to shoot them into the other.  I did not catch them, however; and had to pick them up from across the room.

 

            I could see the silver Oldsmobile my grandma drove parked on the shoulder out front of my parents suburban home.  The little one-story house was familiar but at the same time alien.  There’s a gross feeling to visiting a childhood home.  A reminder that you’re old and don’t have the comforts of childhood anymore.

            I walked up the thin concrete path to the front door, seeing the painfully obvious cold-merge where my parents had built a form to porn the stairs before the door into a steep ramp that grandma’s wheelchair could be rolled up with less bumping and pulling.

            I rang the doorbell twice, hearing the funny chime mom had bought when I was younger playing it’s royalty-free tune.  Dumbest Wal-Mart purchase ever.  In no time, dad was there pulling open the door.

            “Who’s this stranger!”  You were there when I was born, dad.  You watched me come out of a vagina.

            “Hey dad.”  I shook his hand with my left hand, and gave a side-hug with my other.  I greeted my mother too as I rounded the corner into the kitchen.  All I can think about is how damn good that food smells…  Veggies, chicken, and that seasoning…  “Fajita’s?”

            “James, how do you always know what I’m cooking?”

            “I don’t know what you’re cooking, my stomach does.”

            “I think your nose-knows is what I think.”  Why would you repeat ‘I think’ multiple times?

            I sat down at the table and hugged my seated grandmother as well.  We pulled away and pinched at my ear for a moment before pretending to produce a piece of candy, smiling big.  “You need to clean out those ears some day James!”  The only magic trick she knows has been her favorite for as long as I can remember…

            “How’ve you been grandma?”

            “Oh just wonderful dear!  You know, I recently learned how to play cribbage!  I used to tease my mom for knowing how, but I think it truly is just a thing you like when you’re older!  I’ve had Amanda and Margine over the last two weekends to play, and it’s quite a charming game!  We’ve been looking for a fourth so we can play correctly, instead of taking turns.”

            I chatted idly with my grandmother while my father brought some dinnerware to the table; laying plates in front of each chair, save two on the end.  The kitchen table had always been just a little bit too big.

            In time my parents had sat down and started doling out the food.  “So, son; other than your work accident, what’s new in life?”

            “Just job hunting, and going on more dates than I should.”

            “New girlfriend?  Really?”  Uh oh.  Maybe I should have left that out.

            “Actually…”  This is super weird.  My family has never really talked about anthros before.  “Caitlyn’s her name, and she’s an anthro.”

            “Well, that’s certainly…  Surprising.”  Thank you for your astute observation dad.  “You never really showed any signs of liking anthro’s, I thought you were into Asian girls.”

            “Jacob!  Don’t be like that!”  My grandmother had used three fingers to cover her mouth

            “Don’t be like what?!  The kids had three girlfriends, they were all Asian!  One plus two equals three Anna!”  I no longer wish to be a part of this meeting between family members.

            “I suppose you’re at least being supportive…”  Can you two stop non-fighting in my presence?

            “Didn’t realize it would be such a big deal…”

            My father was still on defense.  “It’s not a big deal son, I was just surprised, like I said.”

            “Oooo hoo hoo!  Going on the ‘wild-side’ James?”  I blushed against my will.  C’mon grandma, the fuck?  “It’s fine dear, you’re young for as long as you want to be, always try new things!”

            “It’s fine James, what’s she like?”  She’s grumpy cause my roommate stopped me from ‘trying new things’ with her, and I’m grumpy about it to.

            “What species is she?”

            “Jacob!”

            “What?!  What did I do wrong?!  They’re never bothered when you ask them you know!”

            I used them fighting as a chance to finally take a bite out of my fajita, while seeing my grandmother was still oooing and making other gossipy-hen noises.  “Why the giggling, mother?”  Thank you mom for trying to put a stop to this.

            “I think it would be a little funny if our family went full-circle like that.”

            Everyone paused for a moment until my mother spoke up; “What do you mean mom?”

            “Oh, well; if he was to date a fox he’d be going all the way back your great great grandfather.”  Don’t say that, don’t fucking say that, nobody said anything about foxes.

            “What?”  What the fuck?  “Who was a fox?”

            “Well, I don’t remember how many ‘greats’ exactly, but your grandfather and grandmother on my side were married in Canada in…  eighteen-seventy I believe.  And, well; he was a fox.”

            Dhalia was back in my head.  I don’t buy this for a minute, any of it.  “My girlfriend is a gazelle…  not…”

            “Oh, well that’s fine sweetie, it’s all fine!”  She giggled like only a happy old woman could.  “The idea of you meeting an anthro girl just reminded me is all!”

            “You’re related to anthros?”  My father questioned my mother.

            “I…  Is that a problem, Jacob?”

            “Well no!  No not at all!  I just…  You really related to anthros?”  Back on defense.  Worst dinner ever I think.

            My grandmother pinched my arm a bit.  “James dear, run to the living room and fetch me my purse!”

            I walked out of the kitchen while my mother became more offended by the second.  I hooked the battered old leather purse with denim patches on my finger and returned immediately.  “All I’m saying is you definitely don’t look like it!”

            “James comes and visits, and tells us his new girlfriend is an anthro, and you just stay quiet!  Even when you find out my grandfather is an anthro you go quiet!”

            “Everyone was being quiet!  I’m just a little shocked is all!”

            I spoke up.  “Wouldn’t it have been illegal, grandma?  All the way back then, anthros didn’t have rights really.”  She had fished her tablet out of her purse and was putting on her glasses.

            “Well James, you know, those more isolated and rural areas…  And I believe they met on your grandma’s military base, where the anthros we’re still being put to work."  The official term used in place of 'slavery' and other terms that can cause a desire for reparations, of course.  "She was cook, and him a manual laborer…  Alaska is a cold place, after all, and it only gets colder.  I’m sure snowed-in during winter was hard, and a fox gentleman is probably warmer-”

            “Okay!  Thank you mother!  Who wants desert?!”  My mom clapped loudly while she spoke, and rose from her seat to run back around the banister into the kitchen.

            “I’ve got it here somewhere…”  My grandmother mumbled, still swiping at her iPad.  There was a weird feeling rising in my gut.  Like I wasn’t supposed to know any of this…  Like it was a secret.  I needed it to be a secret.  This was something people couldn’t know about me.  I can’t explain it: but I know it.  “Here it is!”

            “What are you looking at, mom?”

            “I went digital!”  She replied, proudly displaying the face of her tablet.  It was just a picture gallery.  “I took good pictures of every page of my scrapbooks and organized them all…”  She was back to swiping, looking through older and older photos.

            “Do you have a picture of him?”  I asked, seeing the photos turning from sepia to black and white.

            “I know I do…”  My father got up and walked around the table at the mention of evidence.  We both stood reading over her shoulders until she shoo’d at us; “Come on now, I’m old!  I need my air!”

            My mother had returned and set down a store bought pie on the table with paper plates on top of it’s box.  “Who wants-”

            “Found him!  Great great grandpa Murk!”

            “Murk?”  Dad, back at it with the questions.  He wasn’t wrong though; what kind of name is Murk?

            “Oh, I heard he couldn’t pronounce his name, Mark, so he would say ‘Murk’ and ended up getting called that.  See on his cheek there: a scar, it went deep and made it hard for him to talk…”

            My grandmother was talking but I wasn’t listening.  I’d finally gotten a good look at the photograph.  It was ancient, but you could plainly make out the woman and anthro in the picture, a woman in a bright apron and wearing a wide hat standing a head taller than a fox in a flannel coat.  “Murk.”  I mumbled.  “What all do you know about him?”

            “Well, I’ve got our family tree somewhere…  it was all one hundred fifty years ago though…  I’m sorry I can’t tell you more, James.”

            “It’s fine grandma.  Thanks.”  I think I say thanks now.  I don’t know.  It’s so strange to think about.

            “You alright son?  You look pale.”

            “Yeah, I’m fine dad.”  I’m not fine.  There’s fox blood floating around inside me somewhere, and I am not on board with it.

            “Well, it’s fine to be a little weirded-out I think.”

            “James, you’re human unless you can point to the fox part of you.”  Thank you mother for your supporting words.  I wished I could hold my face into some kind of permanent smile so people wouldn’t bother me with this shit…

            “I’m fine, really.”  Leave me alone.  I looked at my hand to find it was the same as before: normal and furless.  I guess knowing where you’re from doesn’t change much.

            “See here…”  My grandma had pulled up a new page.  A hybrid woman.  Fox ears and eyes with short fur over her face and small fangs poking down from an almost human mouth.  An actual ‘halfy’.  “This is my great grandmother, Ruby.”  Great grandma probably got a lot of dirty looks…  Halfies were uncommon, usually one or the other set of genes rose up to the top and made the form more clear.

            “She married a human man?”  it was hard to imagine a halfy getting enough action to keep a bloodline going.  Still though…  She had the same fascinating features as the other halfy I’d seen recently…  Where was it?  Fakebook, one of the angry people on Caitlyn’s friends list…  Stop calling them halfies though James; the thought-police will get you for wrong-think…

            “Oh yes, she did, right here is great grandpa.”  We were shown a zoomed-in and blurry photo of an old bald man, quite likely a few years her senior.  The thought gave me a gross taste.  “She did in the end; but she spent most her life 'fox-chasing' as they call it!”  Grandma giggled, but I knew another name for it.  ‘Donovans syndrome'…  Except great grandma apparently just gave up.  Or maybe the human part just came out.  Fuck, now I’m actually curious…

            “Why didn’t you ever tell us this before?”  My question removed the smile from my grandmother’s face.  Oh don’t get all gushy grandma, just answer me.

            “Well I just…  Well nobody ever asked I suppose…”  it felt like a cop out that I shouldn’t pursue.  She showed us a slew of photos of obvious humans claiming they were all related to us.  It was strange to think about: my family had never been big on reunions or lineages like this.  My grandmother was the first person to ever talk about anyone past immediate living relatives that I could even recall.  It made me wonder if, despite growing up being reminded we were all equals, that deep down my family was a little bit ashamed of their origins…  On the other hand, grandma had brought it up only joking.  Maybe I just over thought it all…  But in my gut I knew I still needed to treat this like a secret.

            “Hello!”  Called my mother, breaking all of our thoughts.  Maybe she wanted it to be kept a secret too.  A secret everyone knows but doesn’t talk about.  “Pie!  Enough fox-talk.  Goodness, the fox the other day might have talked my ear off!”

            “Oh, at the grocery store?” Something is wrong…  “Well she was such a charming lady.”

            “What do you mean?”  You already know don’t you James?  Her fucking voice is echoing in your head right now.  ‘I just thought it would be fair of me offer.’  What would make it fair James?  What would make it fucking fair James?!

            “Oh, your mother and I ran into a lady at the grocery store just the other week.”  Uh huh.  “She was really polite, and just started talking to us.”  Uh huh.

            “Your father was more than happy, I might add.”  Yeah, skip ahead a bit.

            “Turns out she was a doctor!”  You fucking bitch, Dhalia; you sick fucking monster I could throttle you…  “Funniest thing too; she told me I should start getting my prostate checked for my age, said men my age always forget!”

            “I thought she might be smitten with him…”  She’s not.  “She started talking about this man she’d met.”  I’m gonna have to choke a bitch, aren’t I?  “Said she was afraid things weren’t working out in her favor…”  Good God in heaven I wonder why?!  “But, to her credit; she was just peaches with me too.  I think I over reacted.”

            “Sounds like…  Quite the encounter…”  I am screaming in a way that can only be heard through the spirit world; and no banshee’s cry can compare.

            My dad opened with a sarcastic tone, setting up for a joke that I don’t want to fucking hear right now…  “Well, we got her card; so if things don’t work out with the Gazelle-”

            “Let’s see it.”  He saw my expression.  The fake smile, stiff neck and shoulders.  He saw when I said it my finger gestured towards him; not quite pointing and not quite wagging: just a soft jab at the air between us, now cold with my calculating demand…

            “I…  Sure thing…  Son.  Let me go and, uh; get it…”  He walked over to my moms purse, the only man willing to stick his hand inside such a cantankerous vessel.  Out from it he produced a small slip of paper with subtle off-white coloring.  I stretched out my hand, pinching it with my thumb and index finger.

            It was different from the one I’d received from her.  Newer, probably fresh from the printers.  I rubbed it between my fingers lightly, admiring the tasteful thickness of it…  Oh my God, it even has a watermark…

            My hand shook for a moment, loosing my fingers and letting the simple and completely-indiscernible-from-any-other business card fall onto the kitchen table.  My fathers voice broke my train of thought.  “Something wrong son?  You’re sweating…”

            She’d hunted them down.  That wretched little thing, looked up my parents.  Followed them to the grocery store.  Pretended to be a stranger just bumping into them.  I could watch the scene unfolding in my head: the falsified trust-building exercise of smashing your shopping cart into somebody who’s identity you know.  “Did she seem…  Strange at all?”

            “Um…  Not really dear, why?”

            “I’ve had…  A bit of a problem.  With a gray fox, lately.  She’s kind of become my stalker.”

            “Oh…  James, God; why didn’t you say something?!”

            “I guess I just thought I could handle it on my own…  But if you see her again, it might be wise to call the cops or something, I don’t know…”

            “Son, you should fill out a police report right after this.”

            “Yeah…  I think I just might…”

 

            I drove home in silence.  Nothing but the sound of the car and rush of wind running over the top of it as I made my way down the freeway.  There was only dark thoughts going through my head.  I wanted her to pay, but I knew she didn’t know what she did was out of line.

            There was something sincerely wrong with her.  She’d expended her usefulness to me for the time being.  Thanksgiving was still a ways away, with Halloween coming up soon.  Maybe when that time comes, I can find a way to ‘repay the favor’.

            My disgust almost has me forgetting that I’m part fox.  Not really though, I can’t look at a part of me that resembles a fox.  I don’t have any behavior that makes me think I might be one.  The past is just…  Buried.  Inside me.  It’s a strange and gross sensation, and it bothers me…

            I can see my exit coming up.  Just a short trip from there to my apartment, where I can be at peace.

            The thought only served to enrage me more.  Once more it was like she was mocking me, accusing me of running to the next situation to escape my problems.  “I’m not escaping anything…”  Bullshit.  I can’t escape my problems if my problem is Dhalia…
